REAUTHORIZATION  OF  THE 
PIPELINE  SAFETY  PROGRAM 

S.  HRG.  109–1139 

HEARING 

BEFORE THE 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, 

SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION 

UNITED STATES SENATE 
ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

NOVEMBER  16,  2006 

Printed  for  the  use  of  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation 

( 

66–984 PDF 

WASHINGTON  : 

2011 

U.S.  GOVERNMENT  PRINTING  OFFICE

For sale by the Superintendent of Documents, U.S. Government Printing Office

Internet: bookstore.gpo.gov Phone: toll free (866) 512–1800; DC area (202) 512–1800

Fax: (202) 512–2104 Mail: Stop IDCC, Washington, DC 20402–0001

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00001 Fmt 5011 Sfmt 5011 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

SENATE  COMMITTEE  ON  COMMERCE,  SCIENCE,  AND  TRANSPORTATION 

ONE  HUNDRED  NINTH  CONGRESS 

SECOND  SESSION 

TED  STEVENS,  Alaska,  Chairman 

JOHN  MCCAIN,  Arizona 
CONRAD  BURNS,  Montana 
TRENT  LOTT,  Mississippi 
KAY  BAILEY  HUTCHISON,  Texas 
OLYMPIA  J.  SNOWE,  Maine 
GORDON  H.  SMITH,  Oregon 
JOHN  ENSIGN,  Nevada 
GEORGE  ALLEN,  Virginia 
JOHN  E.  SUNUNU,  New  Hampshire 
JIM  DEMINT,  South  Carolina 
DAVID  VITTER,  Louisiana 

DANIEL  K.  INOUYE,  Hawaii,  Co-Chairman 
JOHN  D.  ROCKEFELLER  IV,  West  Virginia 
JOHN  F.  KERRY,  Massachusetts 
BYRON  L.  DORGAN,  North  Dakota 
BARBARA  BOXER,  California 
BILL  NELSON,  Florida 
MARIA  CANTWELL,  Washington 
FRANK  R.  LAUTENBERG,  New  Jersey 
E.  BENJAMIN  NELSON,  Nebraska 
MARK  PRYOR,  Arkansas 

LISA J.  SUTHERLAND,  Republican  Staff  Director 

CHRISTINE DRAGER KURTH,  Republican  Deputy  Staff  Director 

KENNETH R.  NAHIGIAN,  Republican  Chief  Counsel 

MARGARET L.  CUMMISKY,  Democratic  Staff  Director  and  Chief  Counsel 

SAMUEL E.  WHITEHORN,  Democratic  Deputy  Staff  Director  and  General  Counsel 

LILA HARPER HELMS,  Democratic  Policy  Director 

(II) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00002 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

C O N T E N T S 

Hearing held on November 16, 2006  ......................................................................
Statement of Senator Inouye  ..................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Statement of Senator Lautenberg  ..........................................................................
Statement of Senator Pryor  ....................................................................................
Statement of Senator Stevens 
................................................................................

WITNESSES 

Barrett,  Thomas  J.,  Vice  Admiral,  USCG  (Retired);  Administrator,  Pipeline 
and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration,  Department  of  Transpor-
tation  .....................................................................................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Bender,  E.  Frank,  Vice  President,  Gas  Distribution  and  New  Business  Divi-
sion,  Baltimore  Gas  and  Electric  Company;  on  behalf  of  the  American 
Gas Association and the American Public Gas Association 
.............................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Boss,  Terry,  Senior  Vice  President,  Environment,  Safety  and  Operations, 
Interstate Natural Gas Association of America  .................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
Felt,  Timothy,  President/CEO,  Explorer  Pipeline  Company;  Member,  Amer-
ican  Petroleum  Institute  Pipeline  Committee;  and  Vice  Chairman/Treas-
urer-Elect, Association of Oil Pipe Lines 
...........................................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................
....................................
Prepared statement  ..........................................................................................

Weimer, Carl, Executive Director, Pipeline Safety Trust 

APPENDIX 

dated December 4, 2006, to Hon. Jim DeMint 

Barrett,  Thomas  H.,  Administrator,  Department  of  Transportation,  letter, 
..................................................
Peters,  Hon.  Mary  E.,  Secretary  of  Transportation,  letter,  dated  November 
............................................................................

28, 2006, to Hon. Ted Stevens 

Response to written questions submitted by Hon. Daniel K. Inouye to: 

Thomas J. Barrett  ............................................................................................
E. Frank Bender  ...............................................................................................
Terry Boss  .........................................................................................................
Timothy Felt 
.....................................................................................................
Carl Weimer  ......................................................................................................
Sandherr, Stephen E., CEO, Associated General Contractors of America, pre-
...................................................................................................

pared statement 

Page 
1 
2 
2 
13 
51 
1 

3 
4 

42 
44 

31 
33 

24 
26 
17 
18 

55 

56 

58 
58 
59 
60 
61 

56 

(III) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00003 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00004 Fmt 5904 Sfmt 5904 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

REAUTHORIZATION  OF  THE 
PIPELINE  SAFETY  PROGRAM 

THURSDAY,  NOVEMBER  16,  2006 

COMMITTEE ON COMMERCE, SCIENCE, AND TRANSPORTATION, 

U.S. SENATE, 

Washington, DC. 

The  Committee  met,  pursuant  to  notice,  at  10  a.m.  in  room  SR– 
253,  Russell  Senate  Office  Building,  Hon.  Ted  Stevens,  Chairman 
of the Committee, presiding. 

OPENING STATEMENT OF HON. TED STEVENS, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ALASKA 

The CHAIRMAN. We are here today to hear testimony on the reau-

thorization of the pipeline safety program. 

The Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration has 
jurisdiction  that  covers  approximately  160,000  miles  of  hazardous 
liquid  interstate  transmission  pipelines,  305,000  miles  of  natural 
gas transmission pipelines, and 1.9 million miles of natural gas dis-
tribution pipelines throughout our Nation. Generally, this Adminis-
tration  is  responsible  for  overseeing  interstate  transmission  pipe-
lines,  while  the  states  are  responsible  for  monitoring  the  safety  of 
intrastate pipelines. 

The  state’s  authority  is  delegated  by  the  Administration  to  the 
intrastate  pipelines  safety  offices.  The  Administration  also  allows 
state  officials  to  act  as  agents  in  administering  interstate  pipeline 
safety  programs  excluding  enforcement  actions  which  are  handled 
by  the  Administration  directly  for  those  sections  of  the  interstate 
pipelines which are within a state’s boundaries. 

Now,  pipelines  are  one  of  the  safest  forms  of  transportation,  in 
most  cases  their  safety  records  have  steadily  improved.  Unfortu-
nately,  recent  events  in  our  State  of  Alaska  demonstrate  there  is 
much  that  can  be  done.  All  of  that,  by  the  way,  occurred  in  22 
miles of pipe. 

In September, Senator Inouye, Senator Lott, Senator Lautenberg 
and I introduced legislation known as the PIPES Act to reauthorize 
and  strengthen  the  Federal  pipeline  safety  programs  through  the 
Fiscal Years 2007–2010. This comprehensive bill is based upon the 
draft pipeline safety authorization legislation submitted by the Ad-
ministration, reports and testimony from the Government Account-
ability Office and the Department of Transportation Inspector Gen-
eral.  In  addition,  representatives  from  the  pipeline  industry  and 
pipeline  safety  advocate  community,  many  of  whom  are  rep-
resented by the witnesses here today, also provided valuable input 
and perspective. 

(1) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00005 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6633 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

2 

The House Transportation and Infrastructure Committee and the 
House Energy and Commerce Committee are also working on pipe-
line safety legislation. A total of three hearings pertaining to pipe-
line safety were held in the House, and our Alaska delegation held 
a listening session in October on the overall topic in Alaska. 

I  appreciate  Vice  Admiral  Barrett  and  his  staff  for  driving  down 
to Anchorage to be with us at that listening session. It is my hope 
that  the  three  of  our  committees  can  work  together  to  develop  a 
joint  legislative  product  that  both  Chambers  will  pass  this  year. 
We’ve had contact with the House, and the House has been willing 
to  work  toward  a  bill  prepared  that  it  will  be  a  joint  bill  that  can 
pass in the first week of December. As far as I know, there are no 
political  differences  with  regard  to  the  goals  of  this  bill  so  I  hope 
that  this  hearing  will  produce  the  information  we  need  to  proceed 
to work with the House and to work out a bill before the first week 
in December. Senator Inouye? 

STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 

Senator  INOUYE.  Thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  hope 
that  our  presence  here  this  morning  would  indicate  to  one  and  all 
that  this  is  a  bipartisan  matter.  That  our  energy  supply  depends 
on a safe and efficient pipeline system. The House has similar leg-
islation,  and  time  is  of  the  essence.  We  hope  to  get  this  through 
right  away.  I  ask  that  my  statement  be  made  part  of  the  record. 

[The prepared statement of Senator Inouye follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE, U.S. SENATOR FROM HAWAII 
Our  Nation’s  energy  supply  depends  on  a  safe  and  efficient  pipeline  system.  As 
we  saw  this  summer  in  Alaska,  pipeline  disruptions  can  have  a  major  impact  on 
consumers.  With  this  in  mind,  Chairman  Stevens  and  I,  together  with  Chairman 
Lott  and  Senator  Lautenberg,  approached  the  task  of  reauthorizing  the  Federal 
pipeline safety program with great care and keen interest. 

We  met  with  the  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration  (Pipe-
line Administration) to review the Administration’s reauthorization proposal and lis-
tened  to  the  interests  and  concerns  of  the  pipeline  industry  and  pipeline  safety  ad-
vocates.  We  then  crafted  S.  3961,  the  Pipeline  Inspection,  Protection,  Enforcement, 
and  Safety  Act  of  2006,  known  as  the  PIPES  Act,  this  September.  The  bill  builds 
upon  the  successes  of  the  reauthorization  in  2002  and  all  of  the  good  work  already 
done by the Office of Pipeline Safety and the Pipeline Administration over the past 
several  years.  Much  of  the  bill  comes  from  the  Administration’s  own  proposal  and 
refines  the  current  Federal  safety  program  to  ensure  that  we  have  the  safest  and 
most dependable pipeline system in the world. 

Additionally, our bill takes several new steps to address areas of growing concern 
including  the  prevention  of  third-party  damage,  low-stress  pipeline  standards, 
human  factors  mitigation,  and  increased  pipeline  security  and  disaster  recovery. 
Most importantly, the bill also significantly increases funding for pipeline safety in-
spectors and pipeline safety research, allowing us to double our efforts on these im-
portant fronts. 

I  know  many  of  the  witnesses  here  represent  different  elements  of  our  complex 
pipeline  system  and  you  each  have  different  interests.  I  believe  our  legislation  pre-
sents  an  excellent  opportunity  to  strengthen  our  current  system,  and  I  hope  that 
you will work with us toward this goal. I understand that the House Transportation 
and  Infrastructure  and  Energy  and  Commerce  Committees  both  have  bills  similar 
to  ours  and  I  look  forward  to  working  with  them  to  quickly  pass  a  bill  into  law  as 
soon as the opportunity arises. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much,  it  will  be  part  of  the 
record.  The  statements  of  the  witnesses  will  be  printed  in  full  in 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00006 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

3 

the  record,  we  hope  that  you  will  summarize  them  to  the  extent 
that  you  can.  Our  first  panel  is  just  one  person.  Once  again,  Vice 
Admiral  Thomas  Barrett,  retired.  He’s  the  Administrator  of  the 
Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Materials  Safety  Administration.  Thank 
you for appearing, we’d be pleased to have your statement. 
STATEMENT  OF  THOMAS  J.  BARRETT,  VICE  ADMIRAL,  USCG 
(RETIRED);  ADMINISTRATOR,  PIPELINE  AND  HAZARDOUS 
MATERIALS  SAFETY  ADMINISTRATION,  DEPARTMENT  OF 
TRANSPORTATION 
Admiral  BARRETT.  Mr.  Chairman,  thank  you.  Mr.  Co-Chairman, 
thank  you  both  for  your  opportunity  to  testify  and  for  the  leader-
ship  you’ve  exhibited  on  this  particular  issue.  I’m  pleased  to  dis-
cuss  your  proposal  to  reauthorize  the  Federal  Pipeline  Safety  Pro-
gram. 

As  you  know,  pipelines—as  you  mentioned,  Mr.  Chairman—are 
a  safe  way  to  transmit  and  transfer  energy.  But  the  data  shows 
that  we  have  an  opportunity  here  to  close  some  remaining  gaps  in 
the  pipeline  safety  program  and  do  a  better  job  for  the  public  in 
terms  of  ensuring  that  energy  can  be  transmitted  across  our  coun-
try safely. 

It’s abundantly clear at this time that the risk posed by construc-
tion-related  damage  to  underground  gas  distribution  systems  is 
growing.  In  fact,  it’s  the  only  area  where  our  safety  trends  are 
headed  in  the  wrong  direction.  It  is  the  leading  cause  of  pipeline 
accidents  in  which  people  are  killed  or  seriously  hurt.  And  that’s 
why I ask for your help in passing this legislation now. 

On a daily basis I see reports reflecting incidents on gas distribu-
tion  pipelines.  These  distribution  pipelines  are  located  where  the 
majority  of  American  families  live,  where  schools  are  located.  Re-
cently,  for  example,  in  Oklahoma,  a  residential  developer  using 
Earth-moving  equipment  struck  a  natural  gas  pipeline  and  caused 
the  evacuation  of  a  nearby  elementary  school.  Over  14,000  schools 
nationwide, from elementary through colleges, are located near dis-
tribution  pipelines.  And  in  my  judgment,  the  safety  margin  be-
tween a precautionary evacuation of a school and tragedy following 
an incident is not adequate. 

We  need  to  cut  these  incidents  off  better,  up-front.  And  we  be-
lieve the best approach, as proposed by the Administration and re-
flected in your Committee proposal is to support our state partners 
who  oversee  nearly  1.7  million  miles  of  distribution  pipeline  sys-
tems  with  incentives  that  would  raise  the  cap  on  grants  to  their 
agencies  from  50  percent  to  80  percent  over  6  years,  an  incentive 
approach  coupled  with  stronger  civil  enforcement  authority.  And 
we need this authority to be successful, and the states need it. 

The  benefits  of  this  enhanced  authority  and  enhanced  damage 
prevention  programs  will  benefit  oil  and  gas  distribution  lines  and 
the gas distribution system in particular. 

I would invite your attention and maybe we can turn that picture 
so  you  can  see  it,  I  was  up  recently  at  Baltimore  Gas  &  Electric, 
this is a picture—can you see all right, sir? This is what the under-
ground  looks  like—you  have  telecommunications,  you  have  water, 
you  have  gas,  you  have  sewer  all  in  very  compacted  areas.  In  this 
case, you had a telecommunication line run across the top of a gas 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00007 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

4 

line. That runs the risk of taking the coating off the line. Perhaps, 
eventually—had it not been discovered, leading to a failure and the 
resultant risk of breach. 

And  the  benefits  of  preventing  distribution  problems,  the  One- 
Call systems, the incentive programs, better state enforcement, run 
to  not  simply  the  gas  lines,  but  they  run  to  everybody  in  that  un-
derground—the  telecommunications  industry,  they  run  to  the 
water  supply,  they  run  to  the  sewer  lines—you  will  have  less  dis-
ruption, less accidents, less traffic jams, if we are able to move this 
program forward successfully, to say nothing of less safety risks to 
life and property. 

I particularly appreciate the Committee’s attention also, to better 
leadership  accountability.  I  think  that  is  a  key  way  of  improving 
the emphasis on the accuracy and the data that are reported to the 
Federal  Government,  and  allows  us  to  assess  and  get  at  problems. 
I  particularly  appreciate  your  personal  leadership  on  that.  I  think 
it’s key to involve senior corporate leadership in understanding the 
conditions  that  are  reflected  in  their  own  organizations  and  what 
they report to us. 

I would point out as you indicated, that the core reauthorization 
concepts are supported very broadly across our stakeholder commu-
nity.  And  as  you  indicated  there  are—as  far  as  we  can  tell—this 
is a bipartisan issue, it is a fundamental safety issue. And I believe 
that  the  core  concepts  in  the  Senate  provision  as  you  work  out 
issues with the House are fundamentally sound. And I am hopeful 
that with your support, we will be able to bring this to a successful 
conclusion. 

I assure the members of the Committee, that the Administration, 
Secretary Peters and the men and women of PHMSA draw on your 
strong personal and Committee commitment to improving the safe-
ty, the liability and public confidence in our Nation’s pipeline infra-
structure  safety.  I  appreciate  the  opportunity  to  be  here,  and  I 
would  be  pleased  to  answer  any  questions  that  you  have  for  me. 
Thank you, sir. 

[The prepared statement of Admiral Barrett follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF THOMAS J.  BARRETT,  VICE ADMIRAL,  USCG  (RETIRED); 
ADMINISTRATOR,  PIPELINE AND HAZARDOUS MATERIALS SAFETY ADMINISTRATION, 
DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

I. Introduction 

Chairman  Stevens,  Co-Chairman  Inouye,  members  of  the  Committee,  thank  you 
for  the  invitation  to  appear  today  to  discuss  your  proposal  to  reauthorize  the  Fed-
eral  program  our  Nation  depends  on  to  maintain  safety  in  its  energy  pipeline  net-
work.  I  very  much  appreciate  the  Committee’s  interest  in  pipeline  safety  and  I  am 
pleased to provide my testimony on your proposal and the need to pass a reauthor-
ization bill this year. 

I believe your bill embodies key concepts that will help us reach our goal of elimi-
nating pipeline safety incidents. It provides a solid foundation for the energy trans-
portation  infrastructure  we  need  to  continue  our  strong  economic  growth  into  the 
future. 

Your  bill  addresses  the  most  important  safety  concern  we  face—the  growing  rate 
of construction-related pipeline accidents, driven by a growing economy. These acci-
dents,  the  leading  cause  of  pipeline-related  injuries  and  deaths,  can  and  must  be 
prevented.  To  do  so,  we  need  to  strengthen  the  ability  and  authority  of  the  states 
and  ourselves  to  address  these  safety  issues.  That  is  why  we  need  reauthorization 
now. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00008 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

II. Why Two Issues Matter More Than Any Others 

5 

In  the  past  few  years,  PHMSA  has  taken  a  hard  look  at  incidents,  their  causes 
and what can be done to prevent them. Issue number one is crystal clear—the lead-
ing  cause  of  incidents  in  which  people  are  hurt  or  killed  is  construction-related  ac-
tivities  that  cause  an  immediate  rupture  or  damage  which  later  grows  to  failure. 
Construction related damages on gas distribution systems has increased at a rate 
of 50 percent from 1996 to 2005 and will continue to get worse if we don’t do some-
thing about it. These gas distribution systems run through the neighborhoods where 
people  live  and  work  and,  even  more  concerning  near  our  children’s  schools.  Just 
last  week  a  careless  residential  developer  using  Earth-moving  equipment,  ruptured 
a  natural  gas  pipeline  and  caused  the  evacuation  of  an  elementary  school  in  Okla-
homa. Over 14,000 schools nationwide, including elementary and secondary schools, 
are  located  in  the  vicinity  of  pipelines.  Fortunately,  this  school  and  its  community 
experienced  only  an  evacuation  and  a  temporary  suspension  of  natural  gas  service. 
It  could  have  been  worse.  Reducing  the  frequency  and  community  impacts  of  inci-
dents  such  as  this  receives  the  foremost  attention  of  PHMSA  and  our  closest  part-
ners  in  public  safety,  state  pipeline  safety  agencies.  The  natural  gas  pipeline  dis-
tribution network is almost entirely under the jurisdiction of states. 

Where  operators  are  improving  their  pipeline  safety  performance,  the  gains  come 
because  operators  are  managing  pipeline  safety  based  on  system  risk.  Clearly,  to 
make a difference in saving lives, we must minimize damage to pipelines and other 
underground  utilities,  associated  with  construction  related  activity.  Construction 
damage is almost always preventable and we have worked to find practices that will 
eliminate  this  problem.  The  challenge  is  managing  this  activity  without  damaging 
a  very  crowded  underground  infrastructure—one  that  gets  more  crowded  everyday, 
not  just  with  pipelines  but  new  telecommunications,  electric,  water  and  sewer,  and 
other infrastructure. 

The  photo  below  is  a  depiction  of  this  crowded  infrastructure  and  the  very  prob-
lem we’re continuing to face. The photo shows an instance in which an operator dis-
covered newly installed fiber optic lines directly over its natural gas pipeline. In this 
case, One-Call was not contacted and the operator was unaware of construction tak-
ing place in the vicinity of its pipeline. 

Several  states  including  Virginia  and  Minnesota  have  led  the  way  with  strong 
damage prevention programs and have seen up to 50 percent reductions in this and 
other construction-related damages. We need to prioritize the resources for pipeline 
safety to be sure that our state partners have sufficient resources to share responsi-
bility  with  us  in  getting  this  job  done.  The  Committee’s  proposal  recognizes  this 
need by adopting important concepts which the Administration forwarded, including 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00009 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
1
r
a
b

6 

new  civil  enforcement  authority,  incentives  for  states  to  improve  their  damage  pre-
vention programs, technology grants to advance the safety and efficiency of the One- 
Call notification process, and more funding for state pipeline safety programs. 

The following chart from a PHMSA report gives a picture of the progress possible 
with  a  strong  enforcement  program.  There  are  degrees  of  success  with  enforcement 
and two model states, Virginia and Minnesota both have fewer than 3 damages per 
1,000  One-Call  tickets  by  enforcing  the  practice  of  calling  before  digging.  (A  ‘‘One- 
Call’’  ticket  is  a  record  of  receipt  by  a  state  agency  of  a  notice  of  the  caller’s  inten-
tion to excavate.) 

Issue  number  two  is  helping  states  more.  We  need  new  authority  to  address  this 
concern  by  establishing  a  grant  program  to  encourage  states  to  develop  effective 
damage prevention programs. State agencies and PHMSA would also gain authority 
to  conduct  civil  enforcement  actions  against  anyone  who  fails  to  contact  ‘‘One-Call’’ 
prior  to  digging.  Our  focus,  however,  will  continue  to  be  placed  on  state  enforce-
ment. 

Ensuring  the  safety  of  2.3  million  miles  of  pipelines  is  an  enormous  task.  Our 
state partners oversee 90 percent of operator compliance with pipeline safety regula-
tions.  We  seek  to  raise  the  cap  on  grants  provided  to  state  pipeline  agencies  over 
6  years  from  50  percent  to  80  percent  to  offset  the  increasing  cost  of  the  programs 
they  execute,  consistent  with  the  programs  of  the  Department.  State  agencies  do 
utilize PHMSA’s national regulatory pipeline safety standards to inspect the major-
ity  of  the  pipeline  infrastructure  and  we  increasingly  invest  in  state  training  and 
decision-support as we function as a coordinated workforce. We need them, and they 
need our help to be most effective. 
III. Senate Reauthorization Proposal 

Your  proposal  incorporates  the  Administration’s  proposed  core  safety  improve-
ments  to  address  these  top  two  issues—additional  authority  to  extend  effective  en-
forcement  of  state  ‘‘one-call’’  laws  to  any  violator  and  improve  damage  prevention 
programs  through  greater  incentives,  and  additional  authority  to  strengthen  state 
oversight of distribution pipelines generally. 

Your  proposal  also  addresses  a  third  issue,  the  importance  of  a  strong  and  resil-
ient  energy  transportation  infrastructure.  Americans  depend  on  pipeline  transpor-
tation  for  the  safe  movement  of  the  vast  majority  of  critical  energy  supplies.  Over 
97  percent  of  the  Nation’s  transportation  energy  needs  are  met  by  petroleum  prod-
ucts, and 64 percent of these energy products are moved through America’s pipeline 
networks. The system is near capacity all the time. 

Your proposal would authorize the Administration’s proposed petroleum transpor-
tation  capacity  study,  intended  to  identify  limitations  in  the  pipeline  network  that 
could  adversely  affect  supply.  This  is  important  to  improving  our  understanding  of 
how to protect strategic energy supplies, a question that has been of increasing con-
cern in recent months. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00010 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
2
r
a
b

7 

In  times  of  emergencies,  a  lack  of  redundancy  and  system  capacity  makes  it  im-
portant  for  PHMSA  to  work  along  with  our  state  partners  and  other  Federal  agen-
cies to assure that energy product transportation is not interrupted. Last year’s dev-
astating Gulf Coast storms taught us lessons about the vulnerability of pipelines to 
natural and man-made disasters. We believe we can help minimize pipeline system 
disruption while maintaining safe operations. To clarify our objective, we sought au-
thority  in  the  statute  to  address  the  need  for  PHMSA  coordination  within  the  Fed-
eral family to assist with recovery of the energy infrastructure. In the years to come, 
we hope to contribute to increasing the resiliency of this infrastructure. 

Your Committee’s proposal reflects significant bipartisan collaboration on a range 
of  proposals,  some  of  which  have  been  offered  by  the  Administration  and  some 
which have not. We believe that the Administration’s interests would be best served 
by passage of a bill this year, and we do not believe that any one or the combination 
of  provisions  we  did  not  propose  presents  a  serious  concern.  Some  of  the  provisions 
are welcome additions. 

We  support  the  initiative  on  executive  certification  of  integrity  management  per-
formance. This places an increased emphasis on the importance and accuracy of per-
formance  reporting.  To  get  the  results  we  want  out  of  pipeline  operators,  we  need 
to  increase  management’s  accountability  and  place  additional  attention  on  the  im-
portance of having more precise information to target safety risks. 

We strongly favor a systems-based approach to assessing and managing safety re-
lated  risk,  especially  as  the  risks  to  large  infrastructure  systems,  like  pipelines, 
often  change  over  time.  We  expect  to  see  increasing  results  from  our  effective  sys-
tems risk management approach, which this committee helped devise. For integrity 
management  programs  to  be  effective,  operators  must  be  free  to  focus  on  making 
the best use of information as it becomes available. This must be a dynamic process 
in which the operator is able to deploy attention and resources against the greatest 
risks, worst first. 

In  keeping  with  this  approach,  we  urge  the  Committee  to  grant  the  Secretary 
broader authority to adjust the inspection intervals for natural gas pipelines on the 
basis  of  risk  factors.  Reliance  on  prescribed  7  year  retest  intervals  as  established 
in  current  law  goes  against  this  process.  It  seems  a  disincentive  to  the  continuous 
evaluation and readjustment of a dynamic systems approach that is a basic element 
of  an  ongoing  ‘‘whole-health’’  review  of  a  pipeline  system.  The  goal  is  to  regularly 
and  systematically  utilize  the  most  current  information  about  the  pipeline  system 
so  that  it  may  be  maintained  to  operate  safely  in  the  best  condition  for  the  longest 
amount of time. We believe that if the Secretary determines that pipeline safety will 
be enhanced by establishing risk-based reassessment intervals, the Secretary should 
be able to issue rules establishing criteria for reassessing natural gas pipeline facili-
ties on shorter and longer intervals not exceeding 10 years. 

In issuing such rules, the Secretary should be able to consider all significant risk 
factors, including, but not limited to, design, fabrication, and environmental and op-
erating conditions. The Secretary should be able to determine the pipelines to which 
these  rules  apply.  For  a  pipeline  to  be  subject  to  a  reassessment  interval  in  excess 
of 7 years, we would consider as a prerequisite that the pipeline is operating under 
an integrity management program that has been reviewed by the Department or an 
authorized state agency and a determination is made that the operator is providing 
appropriate risk analysis and control. 

Your  proposal  would  also  require  DOT  to  impose  standards  for  low-stress  liquid 
transmission  lines.  Although  we  already  have  a  notice  of  proposed  rulemaking  on 
this  subject,  we  have  not  determined  yet  whether  covering  more  pipeline  mileage 
and  imposing  more  requirements  can  be  justified  by  cost/benefit  analysis.  We  have 
this matter under consideration and would appreciate having flexibility for the Sec-
retary  to  make  an  appropriate  decision  to  maximize  protection  of  public  safety,  the 
environment and the reliability of energy supply. 

Another provision would require DOT to develop standards to address risks asso-
ciated  with  pipeline  control  operations  and  would  require  some  limitation  on  hours 
of service. In keeping with our systems risk management philosophy, we believe op-
erators should have flexibility to develop their own systems plans to assess pipeline 
control  management  risks  associated  with  human  factors.  We  find  this  provision 
limits  the  development  of  risk  control  measures  to  certain  prescribed  solutions.  We 
believe  the  Secretary  should  have  more  flexibility  to  consider  the  need  for  proce-
dures, processes and other system measures to ensure effective performance in pipe-
line  control  functions,  communication,  information  exchange,  warning,  or  manage-
ment of controller schedules and rest periods. 

We  appreciate  the  Committee’s  leadership  in  recognizing  the  importance  of  sev-
eral other issues, such as pipeline security and incident recovery; corrosion research; 
the  advancement  of  national  consensus  standards;  and  inspection  and  enforcement 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00011 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

8 

staffing.  These  provisions  can  each  strengthen  the  Department’s  hand  in  meeting 
the growing challenges of pipeline safety. The Administration is making progress in 
pipeline  security  and  incident  recovery  through  the  Department’s  and  Department 
of  Homeland  Security’s  Memorandum  of  Understanding  (MOU)  and  PHMSA  and 
TSA’s  recently  implemented  annex  to  the  MOU.  We  appreciate  the  concern  about 
the  need  to  plan  to  build  a  workforce  for  building  pipelines  in  the  future,  and  we 
will be happy to work with the Congress on making use of existing programs within 
the government. 

We would be concerned that the added costs of the provisions significantly exceed 
that  of  the  Administration’s  proposal.  We  would  be  pleased  to  work  with  the  Com-
mittee  to  ensure  appropriate  fiscal  controls  and  accountability  are  provided  in  any 
mechanism  for  recovering  extraordinary  inspection  expenses.  Perhaps  the  Congress 
also should consider providing for a more equitable distribution of cost over the en-
tire  pipeline  industry,  instead  of  limiting  the  burden  to  the  transmission  industry. 
The  vast  majority  of  the  benefits  of  this  proposal,  if  authorized,  accrue  for  the  first 
time to the distribution segment of the pipeline industry. 
IV. Conclusion 

Over the past 5 years we have seen a steady decline in the leading causes of pipe-
line failures, with the exception of construction damage in distribution systems. We 
need to step up our efforts to address this problem. Each of the authorizing commit-
tees with jurisdiction over the pipeline safety program has developed a proposal for 
reauthorizing  the  program  for  the  years  2007–2010.  Each  of  the  proposals  incor-
porates the Administration’s core safety reforms—strengthening the ability of states 
to address our most serious safety concerns. The similarities are much more signifi-
cant than the differences. 

We  understand  that  some  efforts  are  being  made  to  reconcile  differences  among 
the bills at the Committee level, with the hope that a single proposal could be voted 
on  in  both  Houses  before  the  end  of  the  session.  We  ask  Congress  to  pass  a  reau-
thorization bill this year, focusing on the key similarities among the bills. 

As  important  as  a  reauthorization  bill  will  be  for  the  enhancement  of  pipeline 
safety, especially natural gas distribution lines, benefits of a final bill would extend 
far  beyond  pipelines.  Indirectly,  additional  customers  of  a  reauthorized  pipeline 
safety program include other stakeholders in America’s underground infrastructure, 
the electric, telecommunications, water and sewer and other industries. 

The  following  chart  shows  the  rate  of  which  one  of  our  leading  states  in  under-
ground  damage  prevention  receives  locate  requests  from  utility  sectors  not  related 
to  pipelines—over  80  percent.  Strengthening  the  Nation’s  pipeline  safety  program 
to include increased resources for states will ensure the safety of not only pipelines, 
but  the  underground  infrastructure  owned  and  operated  by  these  utilities  as  well. 

I  assure  the  members  of  this  committee,  that  the  Administration,  Secretary 
Peters,  and  the  dedicated  men  and  women  of  PHMSA  share  your  strong  commit-
ment  to  improving  safety,  reliability,  and  public  confidence  in  our  Nation’s  pipeline 
infrastructure. 

Like  you,  we  understand  the  importance  of  our  mission  to  the  safety  of  our  citi-
zens and the energy reliability and continued economic growth of our great Nation. 
I would be pleased to answer any questions you may have. 

Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00012 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

.

s
p
e
3
r
a
b

9 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, thank you very much. Are there any devel-
oping new technologies that will be put into place into pipelines to 
increase the safety of them? 

Admiral  BARRETT.  There  are  multiple  technologies,  Senator,  and 
we  have  a  quite  robust  research  and  development  program— 
partnered  with  industry,  I  might  add—on  a  cost-sharing  basis  to 
bring  those  forward.  They  are  extensive  in  the  areas  of  corrosion 
detection and prevention in terms of assessing the condition of the 
pipelines,  and  in  terms  of  maintaining  the  integrity  of  the  system. 
Our  key  program,  as  you  know,  is  integrity  management,  so  in 
terms  of  understanding  the  condition  of  the  lines,  you  are  very  fa-
miliar with the pigging, the inline inspection devices, making those 
devices able to detect better the conditions of the internal portions 
of the lines as well as external corrosion, is enormously important. 
And  as  technologies  are  coming  forward,  we  will  continue  to  push 
for them. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  The  2002  Act  required  regulations  to  be  issued 
by  your  agency,  and  operators  were  required  to  complete  their  ini-
tial  baseline  assessments  within  10  years  of  that  Act  and  to  reas-
sess  the  lines  not  less  than  7  years  on  an  ongoing  basis.  Do  you 
believe that that Act has been followed so far? 

Admiral  BARRETT.  Yes,  sir.  The  baseline  assessments  are  pro-
gressing  quite  well,  more  than  50  percent  of  them  are  completed, 
the  others  are  moving  forward  timely.  I  do  not  believe  that  the 
mandatory  7  year  assessment  is  the  most  desirable  approach—I 
would  prefer  that  the  assessment  interval  be  based  on  an  ongoing 
system  risk  analysis  of  the  line  and  as  an  agency  also  we  would 
be  prepared  to  address  that  through  waiver  provisions  on  a  case- 
by-case basis if we have to. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Do  you  have  that  power  now,  to  have  a  waiver? 
Admiral BARRETT. We do, sir. And we can exercise it—it is more 
resource  intensive,  it’s  a  company-by-company,  specific  -by-specific 
approach—it’s more burdensome on the particular company and on 
us,  I’d  rather  have  a  set  of  standard  criteria,  but  yes  sir,  we  do 
have that authority. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  One  of  the  provisions  of  our  bill  would  prohibit 
that  future  exercise  of  that  power  to  exempt  operators  from  the  7 
year assessment, do you object to that? 

Admiral  BARRETT.  Yes  sir,  I  would.  I  would  want  the  ability  to 
exercise  the  waiver  authority  where  it’s  suitable,  because  from  a 
safety management point-of-view, I believe some flexibility is desir-
able. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Why  would  we  want  to  exempt  them  altogether 

from a reassessment? 

Admiral  BARRETT.  From  a  reassessment,  no.  I  believe  you  abso-
lutely have to have a reassessment. The integrity management pro-
gram fundamentally requires, on an annual basis, that an operator 
look at the condition of their lines and determine where the great-
est safety risks are and address those risks in a timely manner and 
we  oversee  that.  And  in  some  cases  that—all  I  was  saying  is  7 
years  may  not  be  the  right  interval—in  some  cases  it  might  need 
to be earlier, in other cases it could well be later, as much as, say, 
10 years. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00013 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

10 

The CHAIRMAN. I understood that you did object to that, all that 
really  does  is  prohibit  you  from  exempting  any  operator  from  the 
7 year reassessment. 

Admiral BARRETT. Maybe I misunderstood your question. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  I’d  appreciate  it  if  you’d  take  a  look  at  that  be-
cause  we  heard  that  you  disagreed  with  it,  but  I  don’t  know  why. 
I  understand  you’re  working  on  a  low-stress  pipeline  rule  and 
you  have  a  proposed  rulemaking  with  regard  to,  not  all  low-stress 
pipelines, but to some. The bill that the four of us have introduced 
would require you to regulate a wider portion of the pipeline indus-
try,  particularly  low-stress  pipeline.  What  are  your  thoughts  on 
that? 

Admiral BARRETT. Sir, as you know, we have proposed regulating 
a  portion  of  those  lines,  including  the  type  of  lines  that  BP  oper-
ated  up  at  Prudhoe  Bay,  the  low-stress  transmission  lines  and 
gathering  lines.  We  received  a  fairly  broad  range  of  comments  in 
response,  our  rulemaking  period  just  closed  November  6th.  The 
commentary  ranges  from,  what  we  proposed  is  too  stringent  and 
should  not  include  mandatory  cleaning  or  pigging  requirements  on 
one  end,  to  another  end  that  says  we  should  regulate  every  low- 
stress  line  in  the  country  and  we  are  in  the  process  of  evaluating 
those comments right now. And obviously we will, early next year, 
bring forth a final ruling in that regard. But we are still evaluating 
the comments we received. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Those  16  miles  of  transit  lines  were  actually 
high-stress  pipelines  but  they’re  operated  at  a  low-stress  pressure 
level. 

Admiral BARRETT. Yes sir, that’s correct. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  They  were  exempt,  then,  by  means  of  operation 

in spite of the fact that they were designed for higher stress. 

Admiral BARRETT. Yes, sir. Our rules exempt lines that are oper-
ated  at  less  than  20  percent  of  the  maximum  operating  rated 
strength of the lines. 

The CHAIRMAN. Why? 
Admiral  BARRETT.  Again,  because  of  the  perceived  risk  prior  to 
this  summer  of  those  lines.  We  had  started  a  rulemaking  proposal 
to  bring  those  lines  under  regulation  about  2  years  ago,  and  we’re 
working that forward. Our view was not that they didn’t need more 
oversight,  but  that  was  not  the  agency’s  highest  priority,  we  were 
more  concerned  with  getting  at  lines  where  there  was  a  dem-
onstrated  greater  safety  risk  to  life  and  the  performance  record  on 
lines  of  that  type  prior  to  this  summer  was  relatively—I  use  that 
term—relatively, better. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well,  I’m  still  mystified  by  what  happened  up 
our  way  that  the  very  fact  that  there  are  so  many  miles  and  it’s 
just those 16 miles which were low-pressure which built up the cor-
rosion which led to the leaks. Now, what you’re saying is, is if they 
operate  at  a  low  enough  pressure,  we  don’t  pay  any  attention  to 
them. Why? 

Admiral BARRETT. Again, I’m not saying that we not pay any at-
tention  to  it,  we  had  not  gotten  a  regulatory  package  in  place  on 
those lines prior to the BP spills. 

But what I’d also say, too, and you’re of course very familiar with 
this—we  also,  frankly,  would  not  have  expected  anybody  to  not 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00014 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

11 

clean  lines  like  that  regularly,  to  not  pig  lines  like  that  regularly. 
The  standard  of  care  exercised  by  BP  on  those  lines  was  surpris-
ingly  well  below  what  we  typically  see  elsewhere  in  the  industry. 
And  the  history  of  failures  on  lines  like  that,  it  has  been  modest 
in  terms  of  oil  spills  or  damage.  And  we  were  discouraged,  and 
frankly it’s a mystery to me why BP in contrast to other operators 
up there, did not maintain those lines better. 

The CHAIRMAN. Well, I’ve taken up to the North Slope of Alaska 
over  the  years,  probably  the  entire  Senate  at  one  time  or  another, 
and  we  got  briefings  about  all  of  the  safety  programs  and  how  all 
of  these  things  were  pigged  and  how  there  was  this  maintenance, 
and  yet  here  these  16  miles  of  lines  which  carry  the  basic  product 
after  they’ve  gone  through  the  conditioning  plants  to  the  big  pipe-
line,  not  only  did  they  not  pig  it,  but  they  didn’t  have  a  shunt  to 
take out any material that gathered in that pipeline, in those pipe-
lines before they had a pig pipeline. 

Admiral BARRETT. Yes, sir, that’s correct. 
The CHAIRMAN. And one of the reasons for the low pressure was 
that  they  didn’t  want  to  try  to  push  that  stuff  so  it  actually  went 
into  the  big  pipeline,  because  they  would  have  had  liability  in  the 
big  pipeline  if  something  happened.  But  I  really  don’t  understand 
a  system  that  allows  the  operator  to  determine  regulations  simply 
by the amount of pressure. 

Admiral BARRETT. Again, it was relatively—in the Agency’s judg-
ment—a relatively lower risk. There’s the risk of failure to the line 
at lower pressure is less than the risk of failure on a line operating 
at  high  pressure,  near  its  maximum  operating  strength.  Particu-
larly,  as  you  always  run  the  risk  of  some  type  of  overpressure  in 
a line that could test the rated strength of the line. So the pressure 
is one of the factors that affects the integrity of the line, or the risk 
that the line would fail, as will corrosion as you earlier mentioned. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Well  there  was  some  indication  that  at  times 
that  pressure  may  have  been  increased  in  order  to  do  some  clean-
ing of the line instead of pigging, did you know that? 

Admiral BARRETT. Not specifically for that purpose, I know when 
you start-up a line or shut it down you may see some modest fluc-
tuation around the pressure, so you might have seen a small bump 
on  start-up,  but  not  specifically  for  the  purpose  that  you  men-
tioned, I’m not aware of that. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Our  bill  will  allow  low-stress  pipelines  to  be 
mapped in the National Pipeline Mapping System, and comply with 
regulations  in  place  for  other  pipelines  with  respect  to  instant  re-
porting. Have you looked at that provision? 

Admiral BARRETT. Yes, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Do you agree with that? 
Admiral BARRETT. We support that. Yes, sir, we do. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Inouye? 
Senator  INOUYE.  In  the  year  2000,  the  El  Paso  Pipeline  had  a 

terrible accident. 

Admiral BARRETT. Yes, sir. 
Senator  INOUYE.  And  the  Pipeline  agency  announced  a  $2.5  mil-
lion  fine,  but  apparently  nothing  has  happened  to  it.  Can  you  tell 
us what happened? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00015 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

12 

Admiral  BARRETT.  Yes,  sir,  I  can.  And  that’s  not  completely 
closed,  but  the  Agency’s  penalty,  if  you  will,  is  wrapped  into  a 
broader  approach  with  the  Department  of  Justice  in  terms  of  a 
more  macro-settlement  of  issues  related  to  that  incident.  Our  pen-
alty  became  wrapped  up  in  a  larger  penalty  settlement.  I  can  pro-
vide  the  specifics  on  it,  but  I  don’t  believe  that  is  quite  settled  out 
yet. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Do  you  think  there  should  be  better  trans-

parency? 

Admiral  BARRETT.  I  think  that  transparency  is  always  welcome, 
I  strongly  support  it,  and  one  of  our  objectives  certainly  is  to  im-
prove  the  transparency  of  enforcement  and  inspection  results  gen-
erally  so  that  everybody  knows  where  we  are  taking  enforcement 
actions and what the ultimate outcomes are. And we have recently 
posted  up  on  our  website  better  information  on  our  enforcement 
record over the last 5 years, shows a steadily increasing use of that 
authority.  It  has  about  quadrupled  over  the  last  5  years,  but  we 
will  be  looking  to  make  our  actions  more  transparent  and  more 
traceable. I take your point, though, I agree with you. 

Senator  INOUYE.  On  the  National  Pipeline  Mapping  System, 
there are those who say you should do away with it, others say let’s 
have  it  because  otherwise  states  would  have  to  bear  the  burden. 
What are your thoughts? 

Admiral  BARRETT.  I  think  the  mapping  system  is  essential  for 
several  reasons.  First,  it’s  a  terrific  aid  to  local,  county-level  com-
munity  planning  efforts.  And  if  you’re  deciding  where  to  put  in  a 
new  subdivision,  where  to  locate  a  school,  I  think  both  local  offi-
cials  and  quite  frankly  the  public  needs  to  understand  what  lines 
are  running  through  those  neighborhoods,  and  generally  where 
those lines are. 

Post-9/11,  obviously  the  security  of  the  national  energy  infra-
structure and knowledge about key nodes on those systems and on 
a  national  level  knowing  where  all  of  those  lines  are  poses  a  secu-
rity  risk.  We  have  been  working  closely—I’ve  been  working  with 
Kip Hawley and TSA to find a way to reconcile both of these needs. 
But I think both, in terms of community planning and, by the way, 
we’re fairly close to finding ways to accommodate that and also pro-
tecting our security interests—I think the mapping system provides 
substantial  benefit  to  the  public,  and  also  to  local  planning  and 
state planning officials. And I think the lines, as you know, in some 
cases are simply at a state level, but in many cases they are inter-
state. And I believe, to use your word, Senator, transparency to the 
extent it’s consistent with security, is very helpful. 

Senator  INOUYE.  Mr.  Chairman,  may  I  submit  a  couple  of  ques-

The  CHAIRMAN.  Go  ahead.  Oh,  you  want  to  submit  them.  The 
Senator wishes to submit some questions to the record, he’d appre-
ciate it if you could respond to them. 
Admiral BARRETT. Absolutely, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Lautenberg? 

tions? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00016 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

13 

STATEMENT OF HON. FRANK R. LAUTENBERG, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM NEW JERSEY 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Yes, thanks Mr. Chairman for holding this 
really timely hearing as we see the capacity requirements for mov-
ing  our  energy  supplies  increasing  fairly  rapidly.  And  we  in  New 
Jersey  had  a  terrible  incident  in  1994,  residents  of  Edison,  New 
Jersey,  fast  asleep,  suddenly  a  gas  pipeline  exploded  and  sent  fire 
nearly  400  feet  into  the  sky.  And  the  Mayor  of  the  town  recalled 
that  it  was  daylight  at  midnight,  the  fire  consumed  8  apartment 
buildings,  left  128  families  with  no  homes,  sent  some  1,500  men, 
women  and  children  fleeing  into  the  night.  Just  this  past  August, 
I  understand,  Mr.  Chairman,  you  discussed  the  BP  spill  up  in 
Prudhoe  Bay,  and  with  Prudhoe  Bay  producing  some  400,000  bar-
rels  of  oil  a  day.  And  this  summer  when  we’re  faced  with  a  major 
oil supply shortage due to severe corrosion in the pipeline for main-
tenance  and  inspection  seemed  out  of  sync  with  what  it  was  that 
we could have done to prevent that. 

Now  that  private  companies  own  and  operate  so  many  of  these 
pipelines  that  bring  natural  gas  to  us  and  these  pipelines  supply 
25  percent  of  the  energy  that  we  use  in  the  United  States.  So,  if 
anything,  the  last  decade  has  demonstrated  that  strong  Federal 
regulations  can  lead  to  better  pipeline  safety,  stronger  industry, 
safer  homes  and  offices  for  everyone.  And  I’m  pleased  to  be  a  co- 
sponsor  of  the  PIPES  Act  that,  Mr.  Chairman,  you  and  Senator 
Inouye have authored, affording introduction of new technology, ex-
cess  flow  valves  for  new  or  replacement  pipes.  These  valves  auto-
matically  shut  off  when  there’s  a  line  that’s  ruptured  to  help  pre-
vent  injury,  protect  property  and  most  importantly,  save  lives.  So, 
I  hope  our  colleagues  will  support  this  bill  and  Admiral  Barrett, 
thanks for being here today. 

When  we  look  out  at  things  and  we,  I’m  sure,  can’t  possibly  see 
reductions  in  the  need  for  increased  capacity,  so  how  do  we  con-
tinue  to  expand  that  capacity?  Do  we  just,  exchange  sizes  of  pipe 
or lay pipe alongside the—what do we do to keep up with this, even 
as  we  make  sure  that  the  pipelines  that  we  presently  have,  have 
the capability and are operating in the most efficient manner? 

Admiral  BARRETT.  Senator,  thank  you.  And  I  do  appreciate,  sin-

cerely, your support for this bill. 

I  think  you  need  to  do  several  things,  and  the  list  I  would  give 
you is not exhaustive. One solution we recently took action on, was 
to allow some new construction pipelines to operate at higher oper-
ating  pressure,  and  that  is,  instead  of  limiting  them  to  70  percent 
of  their  maximum  operating  strength,  allow  them  to  operate  at  80 
percent, which allows the line to carry more capacity, these are gas 
lines  we’re  talking  about.  But  that  was  conditioned  on  new  mate-
rials,  new  design,  construction  oversight  and  agreements  on  oper-
ating  practices  and  procedures  and  inspection.  So  by  providing  a 
more  rigorous,  if  you  will,  regime,  we  were  able  to  issue  waivers 
to  let  some  newly  constructed  lines  operate  at  higher  pressure.  So 
that  was  on  the  margins,  but  6  or  7  percent  more  product  moving 
through a line is very positive. So that’s one approach. 

I  think  we  have  to  work  more  broadly  and  more  closely  with  all 
communities, if you will, that are affected by new lines so that they 
can be put in with the assurance that they can be operated safely. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00017 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

14 

And by that I mean, we have an agreement and we work with the 
National  Association  of  State  Fire  Marshals,  we’re  working  with 
the  fire  services,  first  responders,  we  do  support  and  have— 
through  hazmat  grant  programs  helped  to  train  first  responders, 
but  fundamentally  to,  through  a  public  process,  understand  the 
risks  to  an  area  of  bringing  in  new  lines,  and  then  provide  a  vehi-
cle to manage those risks safely. And I believe that the job of pipe-
line  safety  with  the  support  of  this  committee,  the  types  of  things 
we’re  talking  about  in  this  bill,  the  damage  prevention  programs 
with  our  state  partners,  can  manage  the  risks  in  a  way  that  will 
allow  these  developments  to  go  forward  with  more  confidence  that 
they do not pose an unacceptable risk for our schools or our Nation. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Admiral  Barrett,  I’m  sure  that  the  phys-
ical  ability  to  do  these,  to  increase  pipelines  and  increase  capacity 
can  be  found,  but  the  community  resistance  to  these  things  is  yet 
another  major  problem.  Especially  where  there  has  been  an  inci-
dent  along  the  way  in  a  state  or  a  town  and  people  see  what  kind 
of a threat this poses. And I can tell you, we’ve tried to help compa-
nies  put  more  pipe  down  and  improve  efficiency,  and  it’s  a  battle 
of major proportions. 

Admiral BARRETT. Senator, I could not agree with you more, and 
to  take  Senator  Inouye’s  word,  though,  I  believe  what  can  help 
most  is  transparency,  transparency  in  where  the  lines  are,  what 
the  benefits  are  that  they  provide,  what  the  risks  are  and  how 
those risks can be managed. 

You  have  a  witness  later,  Carl  Weimer  from  Pipeline  Safety 
Trust,  I  was  recently  down  in  New  Orleans  at  their  annual  meet-
ing, I was up in Bellingham at the site of a tragedy up there, simi-
lar  to  the  one  you  mention  in  New  Jersey.  I  met  with  the  families 
involved,  and  the  commitment  I  gave  them  was  that  I  understand 
how  tragic  these  incidents  can  be.  And  I  am  committed,  and  this 
agency is committed to doing everything we can to ensure lines op-
erate  safely.  And  I  think  that’s  the  assurance  that  we  have  to  be 
able  to  provide  communities,  and  to  get  there,  is  to  have  honest 
dialogue  and  robust  dialogue  about  the  concerns  they  have  and 
how we would propose to address them. 

And I agree with you, it is not an easy process. 
Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  would  propose  your  presence  when  we 

have these town meetings, I think. 

derstand. 

Admiral BARRETT. I would be delighted to that, and—— 
Senator LAUTENBERG. I don’t know whether you’ll be delighted— 

you’re nice to volunteer, but that’s true of your background. 

Admiral  BARRETT.  Senator,  I  do  think  we  have  to  listen  and  un-

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  You  have  the  jurisdiction  under  the 
PHMSA as it is to issue technical assistance grants to local commu-
nities, have you done any? 

Admiral BARRETT. Not specifically, and I believe there are provi-
sions in some of the bills that would actually require us to do some 
demonstration  grants.  And  part  of  the  issue  is  devising  criteria  to 
make  those  grants  smart  and  effective.  And  I  believe  we  would 
support  having  a  provision  that  would  allow  us  to  do  some  dem-
onstrations, determine if they’re effective, and go forward. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00018 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

15 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Hard  to  understand  why  something  like 
that  couldn’t  be  expedited,  especially  if  we’re  turning  more  to  the 
states and the localities to participate more actively. 

Your  testimony  calls  for  restoring  public  access,  Senator  Inouye 
talked  about  transparency  to  the  National  Pipeline  Mapping  Sys-
tem.  Do  you  believe  there  are  any  valid  security-related  concerns 
about making that information more widely available? 

Admiral  BARRETT.  Yes,  sir,  I  do.  We  met  with  TSA  and  depend-
ing  on  how  much  fidelity  is  provided  in  the  information  and  what 
type of information, but I think there’s a way to balance those secu-
rity  concerns  that  are  legitimate  and  they  are  serious  in  some 
cases. But nonetheless, I believe on a local level we can provide the 
information  that  community  planners  and  community  citizens 
need,  and  we  are  working  closely  with  TSA  to  achieve  that.  And 
TSA,  by  the  way,  I  would  add,  is  supportive  of  finding  a  way  to 
meet  the  public  information  need,  at  the  same  time  protecting  the 
legitimate security concerns. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Chairman, I think it’s awful tough to have 
transparency,  full  knowledge  in  the  communities  without  having 
those we do not like to see the map be able to see it. So, there are 
a compliment of problems here. I, for one, can’t see how we can by-
pass the communities in terms of that information. 

Mr. Chairman, thanks very much for having this hearing. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you. 
Admiral BARRETT. thank you, Senator. 
The  CHAIRMAN.  Admiral  one  of  the  things  that  came  out  of  our 
listening  session  in  Alaska  was  that  the  Trans-Alaskan  Pipeline, 
because  of  some  apparent  action  and  the  Pipeline  having  become 
a  conductor  for  induced  electrical  current,  developed  a  series  of 
grounds  so  that  that  current  could  not  lead  like  electrolysis  to  af-
fect  any  water  that  might  be  inside  the  pipeline.  As  we  looked  at 
these transit lines, they were supposed to have been cleaned by the 
cleaning  plants,  and  the  oil  in  the  transit  line  is  supposed  to  be 
free  of  gas  and  water  and  sludge.  However,  all  three  built-up  in 
those  transit  lines,  and  the  question  has  been  asked,  why  doesn’t 
your Administration look at the problem of this concept of induced 
electricity and the possibility of electrolysis having something to do 
with  the  erosion  and  corrosion  inside  the  pipeline  that  lead  to  the 
leaked sections we had? 

Admiral  BARRETT.  Senator,  I  think  you’re  correct  but  we  do.  I 
think  electrolysis-electrochemical  reactions  obviously  are  a  risk  of 
corrosion  in  any  line,  and  in  northern  latitudes,  you  also  have  the 
possible,  the  telluric-type  current  effect  from  things  like  the  Au-
rora. That has been an issue on the Trans-Alaska Pipeline. 

I  met,  about  2  weeks  ago,  with  Dr.  Wong  to  talk  about  how  we 
could get a better handle on that type of risk with respect to north-
ern  latitude  pipelines  in  general.  But  it  is  an  area  that  warrants 
attention and research and it is one that is actively looked at. But 
I agree with you that it’s an area we will—— 

The CHAIRMAN. Are you going to pursue that? I think the Aurora 
comes down to, or Canada comes down to the northern part of what 
we  call  the  South  48  states,  but  beyond  that,  some  of  it  could  be 
induced just from electrical storms. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00019 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

16 

Admiral  BARRETT.  Yes,  sir.  And  we  are  going  to  pursue  the  fur-
ther  research  in  some  appropriate  way  in  that  area,  and  I  also  in-
tend  to  talk  to  the  State  of  Alaska  about  it  as  well,  because  they 
obviously have some concerns, particularly in northern latitudes. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  My  last  question—are  you  going  to  do  anything 
about  putting  additional  burdens  on  states?  After  all,  they  are 
monitoring  the  vast  majority  of  the  pipelines  in  this  country,  not 
you.  They  only  come  to  you  when  there’s  a  problem.  But  are  you 
going  to  put  them  on  notice  of  additional  requirements  if  they  are 
going  to  be  delegated  the  right,  as  you  do  now,  you  delegate  your 
authority under the law to the states. 

Admiral  BARRETT.  We  delegate  a  lot  of  authority  to  them,  we  do 
assess  how  strong  their  programs  are  and  as  you  know  this  pro-
posal  would  not  simply  strengthen  their  enforcement  authority  on 
damage  prevention.  But  we’re  also  looking  to  increase  the  grants 
authority from up to as much as 80 percent to help better resource 
them to execute the programs that they help us do. We view them 
very  much  as  partners,  and  I  believe  they  view  us  the  same  way. 
And  as  you  indicated,  they  have  more  than  three  times,  three  and 
a half times the number of inspectors that the Federal Government 
does, and it’s absolutely essential that our inspections and enforce-
ment actions be coordinated. 

But, fundamentally, also they are closer to the problems in many 
cases, certainly the gas distribution line issue that Senator Lauten-
berg  mentioned,  they’re  going  to  be  closer  to  it  in  many  cases, 
they’ll  get  quicker,  smarter  solutions  than  we  could  from  a  little 
distance back. So, our goal would be to strengthen their programs, 
but also with the help of the Congress, provide additional resources 
to back-stop them. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much for your testimony, Admi-
ral,  I  appreciate  it  and  look  forward  to  working  with  you  on  the 
subject, we hope to get you a bill before the Congress recesses. 

Admiral  BARRETT.  Senator,  thank  you  very  much,  Mr.  Co-Chair-
man, thank you, Senator Lautenberg, thank you for coming in and 
I look forward to working with you all the time. Thanks, sir. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Our  second  panel  is  Mr.  Carl  Weimer,  he  is  the 
Executive  Director  of  the  Pipeline  Safety  Trust  of  Bellingham, 
Washington,  Mr.  Timothy  Felt,  the  President  and  CEO  of  the  Ex-
plorer  Pipeline  Company  of  Tulsa,  Oklahoma,  he’s  speaking  on  be-
half  of  the  Association  of  Oil  Pipe  Lines  and  the  American  Petro-
leum Institute. Third witness is Mr. Terry Boss, Senior Vice Presi-
dent for Environment, Safety and Operations to the Interstate Nat-
ural Gas Association of America and Mr. Frank Bender, Vice Presi-
dent  of  Gas  Distribution  and  New  Business  Division  of  Baltimore 
Gas and Electric Company in Baltimore, Maryland on behalf of the 
American Gas Association and American Public Gas Association. 

Gentlemen, we appreciate your courtesy in coming to be with us 
today.  This  hearing  is  necessary  in  order  that  we  may  move  our 
bill,  and  we  would  appreciate  your  statements  as  I  indicated,  your 
statements will be printed in the record in full, we look forward to 
your comments. Mr. Weimer, may we call on you first, please. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00020 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

17 

STATEMENT OF CARL WEIMER, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

PIPELINE SAFETY TRUST 

Mr. WEIMER. Yes, Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee, 
thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  speak  here  today  on  the  important 
subject of pipeline safety. 

The  Pipeline  Safety  Trust  came  into  being  after  the  Olympic 
Pipeline  tragedy  in  Bellingham  that  left  three  young  people  dead, 
killed  every  living  thing  in  a  beautiful  salmon  stream,  and  caused 
millions  of  dollars  of  economic  disruption.  Similar  tragedies  have 
happened in other places before and since the Bellingham tragedy. 
I’d  like  to  start  this  morning  by  saying  we’re  quite  pleased  with 
S.  3961  and  we  want  to  thank  you  for  bringing  it  forward.  In  our 
opinion,  there  are  many  things  in  it  that  will  increase  pipeline 
safety. Just to mention some of our favorites, we support the provi-
sions  in  the  Senate  bill  regarding  low-stress  pipelines.  We  support 
the inclusion in the Senate bill that requires an executive signature 
on  integrity  management  reports.  We  support  the  1-year  require-
ment  for  the  development  of  integrity  management  standards  for 
gas distribution systems, and we support the language in the Sen-
ate bill which requires PHMSA to electronically post monthly sum-
maries of its enforcement actions. 

The  House  Energy  and  Commerce  bill  provided  language  that 
provides  operators  the  opportunity  to  provide  response  to  PHMSA 
enforcement  actions,  to  better  illustrate  both  sides  of  the  enforce-
ment  story.  This  only  seems  fair,  and  we  hope  the  Committee  will 
adopt  this  and  additional  enforcement  transparency  language  as 
well. 

We support the language in the Senate bill which would author-
ize technical assistance grants to communities and provide PHMSA 
incentive  to  move  demonstrations  of  this  program  forward  sooner 
rather  than  later.  There  is  one  small  change  of  an  item  already  in 
the bill which we think would make the bill even stronger. The Na-
tional  Transportation  Safety  Board,  and  the  International  Associa-
tion  of  Fire  Chiefs  has  recommended  to  PHMSA  that  excess  flow 
valve installation be mandatory in new construction when pipelines 
are being replaced or upgraded. 

The  Pipeline  Safety  Trust  commissioned  a  review  of  excess  flow 
valves,  and  that  review  came  to  the  same  mandatory  installation 
conclusion. For these reasons, we support the language in the Sen-
ate  bill  that  includes  the  development  of  criteria  for  requiring  the 
installation  of  excess  flow  valves,  but  ask  that  that  language  be 
strengthened  to  ensure  that  these  inexpensive  safety  devices  are 
installed,  unless  a  company  can  prove  that  they  will  not  operate 
correctly  on  their  particular  system.  In  our  opinion,  the  current 
language,  which  requires  these  valves  on  the  basis  of  feasibility 
and risk analysis, provides too much wiggle room. 

The  only  disagreement  we  have  with  the  Senate  bill  is  con-
cerning  permit  streamlining.  We  have  not  seen  any  documented 
need  for  streamlining  for  the  construction  and  expansion  of  pipe-
lines. Until such need is proven, we oppose the language in Section 
13 of the Senate bill. 

Since  my  time  today  is  so  short,  let  me  just  briefly  mention  im-
portant areas where we believe all the bills still need improvement. 
After  the  2001  terrorist  attacks,  the  National  Pipeline  Mapping 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00021 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

18 

System was removed from public access. We believe that maps that 
allow  local  government  to  know  where  pipelines  are  in  relation  to 
housing  developments  and  businesses  are  critical  to  prevent  pipe-
line  damage  and  to  increase  pipeline  safety.  Current  security  con-
cerns  makes  the  mapping  system  mainly  useless  for  local  govern-
ment, since the map information cannot be added to local GIS sys-
tems  or  planning  maps  because  of  the  required  nondisclosure.  The 
location  of  pipelines  are  no  secret,  in  fact,  they  are  required  to  be 
marked  at  each  public  road  crossing  and  railroad  crossing  and  in 
sufficient number along each buried line, so that the location is ac-
curately known. If terrorists want to find pipeline, they will. 

For  these  reasons,  we  ask  that  you  direct  PHMSA  to  reinstate 
access  to  the  National  Pipeline  Mapping  System  so  that  local  gov-
ernments can plan safely. 

One of the most important functions that PHMSA provides is the 
ongoing  independent  inspection  of  pipeline  companies’  operations. 
We  support  the  additional  inspectors  in  the  bill.  Unfortunately, 
none of these inspection findings are available to local government, 
or  the  public  for  review.  PHMSA  should  be  required  to  create  an 
Internet-accessible  inspection  docket  similar  to  the  enforcement 
transparency  requirements  in  the  Senate  bill  where  the  public 
could review basic company inspection information. 

And finally, in 2004, the Transportation Research Board released 
a  study  on  developing  risk-informed  land-use  guidance  near  trans-
mission  guidance  near  transmission  pipelines  for  use  by  state  and 
local  governments.  One  of  the  major  pieces  of  that  report  was  the 
recommendation to PHMSA for the establishment of a Pipeline and 
Informed  Planning  Alliance,  a  multi-stakeholder  effort  aimed  at 
moving this risk-informed land-use guidance forward. 

The Pipeline Safety Trust was invited to be on the steering com-
mittee  for  that  effort  in  early  2005.  Since  that  time  not  one  meet-
ing has been held, and progress on this important initiative seems 
to  have  stalled.  We  think  that  Congress  should  help  move  this 
process  forward  by  setting  a  date  certain  for  this  initiative  to  get 
started,  and  require  PHMSA  to  report  to  Congress  on  progress 
made at regular intervals. 

Thank you again for this opportunity to testify today. In the past 
5 years, pipeline safety has moved forward on many fronts, and we 
appreciate  the  part  that  PHMSA,  the  industry,  and  particularly 
Congress  has  had  in  this  progress.  We  hope  you  will  consider  the 
ideas  we  have  brought  forward  today,  which  we  believe  will  take 
pipeline safety up another significant notch, and I’m glad to answer 
any  questions  now,  that  you  have  now,  or  any  time  in  the  future. 
Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Weimer follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF CARL WEIMER, EXECUTIVE DIRECTOR, 

PIPELINE SAFETY TRUST 

Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee: 
Good  morning,  and  thank  you  for  inviting  me  to  speak  today  on  the  important 
subject  of  pipeline  safety.  My  name  is  Carl  Weimer  and  I  am  testifying  today  as 
the  Executive  Director  of  the  Pipeline  Safety  Trust.  I  am  also  a  member  of  the  Of-
fice of Pipeline Safety’s Technical Hazardous Liquid Pipeline Safety Standard Com-
mittee,  as  well  as  the  Chairman  of  the  Governor-appointed  Washington  State  Citi-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00022 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

19 

zens  Committee  on  Pipeline  Safety.  I  also  bring  a  local  government  perspective  to 
these discussions as an elected County Commissioner in Washington State. 

The  Pipeline  Safety  Trust  came  into  being  after  the  1999  Olympic  Pipeline  trag-
edy  in  Bellingham  Washington  that  left  three  young  people  dead,  wiped  out  every 
living thing in a beautiful salmon stream, and caused millions of dollars of economic 
disruption  to  our  region.  After  investigating  this  tragedy,  the  U.S.  Justice  Depart-
ment  recognized  the  need  for  an  independent  organization  that  would  provide  in-
formed comment and advice to both pipeline companies and government regulators; 
and,  would  provide  the  public  with  an  independent  clearinghouse  of  pipeline  safety 
information.  The  Federal  trial  court  agreed  with  the  Justice  Department’s  rec-
ommendation and awarded the Pipeline Safety Trust $4 million which was used as 
an initial endowment for the long-term continuation of the Trust’s mission. 

The  vision  of  the  Pipeline  Safety  Trust  is  simple.  We  believe  that  communities 
should feel safe when pipelines run through them, and trust that their government 
is proactively working to prevent pipeline hazards. We believe that the local commu-
nities who have the most to lose if a pipeline fails should be included in discussions 
of  how  better  to  prevent  pipeline  failures.  And  we  believe  that  only  when  trusted 
partnerships between pipeline companies, government, communities, and safety ad-
vocates are formed, will pipelines truly be safer. 

The  Pipeline  Safety  Trust  is  the  only  nonprofit  organization  in  the  country  that 
strives to provide a voice for those affected by pipelines that normally have no voice 
at  proceedings  like  this.  With  that  in  mind,  I  am  here  to  speak  today  for  the  fami-
lies who lost their husbands and fathers in the 2004 Walnut Creek California pipe-
line explosion caused when the pipeline company incorrectly marked the location of 
their  pipeline.  I  am  speaking  today  on  behalf  of  the  people  living  along  the  Ken-
tucky  and  Ohio  Rivers  who  in  2005  awoke  to  find  290,000  gallons  of  crude  oil  had 
been dumped by a pipeline into those rivers. And I am here to speak today on behalf 
of  the  people  who  were  affected  by  the  more  than  $846  million  of  property  damage 
that pipelines are responsible for in the past 5 years. 

The  Pipeline  Safety  Trust  has  already  provided  testimony  this  year  to  both  the 
House  Transportation  and  Infrastructure  Committee  and  the  House  Energy  and 
Commerce Committee. As the reauthorization process has proceeded many different 
ideas have been incorporated into the different bill versions, so I would like to start 
this  morning  by  providing  our  opinion  on  which  of  these  ideas  will  do  the  most  to 
make pipelines safer. 
Best Provisions in the Different Bills 

Low-Stress  Pipelines—We  support  the  provisions  in  S.  3961,  and  appreciate  the 
addition  in  Section  3(3)  that  clarifies  that  certain  exemptions  do  not  apply  to  inci-
dent reporting and the National Pipeline Mapping System. 

The  200,000  gallon  crude  oil  leak  on  the  North  Slope  of  Alaska  last  winter,  the 
additional  leak  found  this  past  summer  followed  by  a  partial  shut-down  of  the 
Prudhoe  Bay  Oil  Field,  and  the  ensuing  fiasco  concerning  BP’s  previously  inad-
equate pipeline maintenance and testing have made it clear that all such low-stress 
pipelines  should  fall  under  the  same  minimum  Federal  standards  as  other  trans-
mission pipelines. Likewise, those sections of pipeline, which could affect Unusually 
Sensitive  Areas,  should  be  required  to  meet  the  same  integrity  management  provi-
sions as other transmission pipelines. 

The  Pipeline  and  Hazardous  Material  Safety  Administration  (PHMSA)  is  cur-
rently engaged in a rulemaking on these low-stress pipelines that has as a starting 
point  a  proposal  that  is  much  weaker,  and  more  confusing,  than  what  is  included 
in  S.  3961,  and  the  version  of  the  bill  coming  forward  from  the  House  Energy  and 
Commerce  Committee.  We  hope  that  Congress  will  pass  these  provisions  soon  so 
that PHMSA understands the importance Congress has put on ensuring these pipe-
lines are maintained in a way that protects the environment and the economy. 

Senior Executive Signature on Integrity Management Reports—We support this in-
clusion  in  S.  3961,  and  believe  it  is  an  excellent  method  to  ensure  that  the  senior 
management that makes decisions regarding maintenance, testing, and budget deci-
sions affecting pipeline safety are also aware of the current integrity of their feder-
ally-regulated pipelines. 

Distribution  Integrity  Management  Program  &  Deadline—The  majority  of  deaths 
and injuries from pipelines occur from incidents on the distribution pipeline systems 
that  bring  gas  to  our  towns,  businesses,  and  homes.  From  the  period  2001  through 
2005 sixty-one people died along these pipelines, and two hundred and thirty seven 
were  injured.  PHMSA,  states,  industry,  and  private  organizations  have  undertaken 
an aggressive work plan to come up with an integrity management program for dis-
tribution  pipelines.  The  Phase  1  report  on  this  plan  was  released  earlier  this  year, 
and all involved deserve our thanks for their efforts. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00023 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

20 

It is imperative that this plan now moves to the adoption of rules as soon as pos-
sible.  We  applaud  and  support  the  one-year  requirement  in  all  the  present  bills  for 
the development of such standards. 

One area that bills differ is regarding requirements to include criteria for the in-
stallation  of  excess  flow  valves.  The  National  Transportation  Safety  Board  (NTSB) 
has  recommended  to  PHMSA  that  excess  flow  valve  installation  be  mandatory  in 
new  construction  and  when  existing  service  pipelines  are  being  replaced  or  up-
graded. The International Association of Fire Chiefs supports this mandatory instal-
lation  position.  The  Pipeline  Safety  Trust  commissioned  an  independent  review  of 
the  literature  and  science  on  excess  flow  valves,  and  that  review  came  to  the  same 
mandatory installation conclusion. 

For  these  reasons  we  support  the  language  in  S.  3961  that  includes  the  develop-

ment of criteria for requiring the installation of excess flow valves. 

Enforcement Transparency—One of the things that PHMSA has been criticized for 
in  the  past  is  the  lack  of  the  use  of  enforcement  to  deter  future  accidents.  In  our 
own Bellingham tragedy, PHMSA announced with great fanfare a proposed penalty 
of  $3.02  million.  Then  for  nearly  5  years  the  regulators  and  the  pipeline  company 
went  behind  closed  doors,  and  when  they  emerged  the  fine  had  been  mysteriously 
reduced  to  $250,000.  The  only  information  available  to  the  public  regarding  why 
this  drastic  reduction  had  occurred  was  the  short  phrase  in  the  Settlement  Order 
that  said  ‘‘In  order  to  avoid  further  litigation  or  expense,  OPS  and  Olympic  resolve 
this  case.’’  This  did  not  sit  well  with  the  people  in  Bellingham,  and  certainly  does 
not instill confidence or trust in a regulatory agency. 

In  2000,  the  El  Paso  Pipeline  in  New  Mexico  blew  up  killing  an  entire  extended 
family of twelve. Again PHMSA announced with much fanfare a proposed $2.52 mil-
lion fine. Now, over 6 years later, there is no information available about the status 
of that penalty, and it appears that not one cent of it has been collected. 

Most law enforcement in this country takes place in public for good reasons. Pub-
lic scrutiny enhances credibility, accountability and fairness. Seeing PHMSA expedi-
tiously  enforce  its  regulations  would  instill  confidence  that  safe  pipeline  operation 
is a requirement rather than a guideline. If companies challenge fines because regu-
lations are poorly crafted, the public could demand better rules. 

We support the language in S. 3961, which requires PHMSA to electronically post 
monthly summaries of its enforcement actions. We also support the language in the 
House  Energy  and  Commerce  Bill  that  provides  operators  the  ability  to  provide  re-
sponse to PHMSA enforcement actions to better illustrate both sides of the enforce-
ment  story.  This  only  seems  fair,  and  we  hope  the  Senate  Commerce,  Science,  and 
Transportation Committee will adopt this additional language as well. 

Technical  Assistance  Grants—The  Pipeline  Safety  Improvement  Act  of  2002  in-
cluded a new program to enhance the understanding and involvement of local com-
munities  and  state  initiatives  in  pipeline  safety  issues  by  making  grants  of  up  to 
$50,000  available  for  ‘‘technical  assistance  to  local  communities  and  groups  of  indi-
viduals relating to the safety of pipeline facilities in local communities.’’ 

These  grants  were  envisioned  as  a  way  to  keep  valuable  independent  pipeline 
safety  initiatives  moving  forward,  and  to  ensure  that  those  most  directly  impacted 
by  pipeline  failures  have  the  resources  to  become  legitimate  stakeholders  in  proc-
esses  to  improve  pipeline  safety.  Examples  of  groups  that  could  benefit  from  such 
grants include the Washington City and County Pipeline Safety Consortium and the 
Kentucky  Pipeline  Safety  Advisory  Committee.  Both  of  these  groups  formed  after 
major pipeline failures and involve a broad spectrum of stakeholders looking for so-
lutions  to  keep  their  communities  safe  and  avoid  further  pipeline  accidents.  These 
grants  would  be  a  small  price  to  pay  to  help  foster  such  outstanding  examples  of 
independent  pipeline  safety  initiatives,  and  pipeline  safety  involvement.  Such  local 
involvement  is  critical  as  PHMSA  moves  forward  in  the  areas  of  pipeline  damage 
prevention  and  encroachment.  Another  potential  use  of  the  grants  is  to  pay  for  in-
creased public and local government involvement in industry standards development 
and to assist in public comments on technical regulations. 

To  date  none  of  these  grants  have  been  awarded,  and  to  our  knowledge  PHMSA 
has not even begun the process to develop procedures to award such grants. We sup-
port  the  language  in  S.  3961,  which  would  reauthorize  these  grants,  and  provide 
PHMSA an incentive to move demonstrations of this program forward sooner rather 
than later. 

State  pipeline  damage  prevention  programs—For  years  now  PHMSA  has 
partnered with the Common Ground Alliance and One-Call centers to provide a na-
tionwide structure to educate contractors, utilities, local government, and the public 
on  the  need  to  be  aware  of  the  underground  pipeline  infrastructure,  develop  best 
management  practices,  and  use  one-call  locator  services.  These  have  been  valuable 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00024 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

programs, and have laid the start of a national network to improve pipeline damage 
prevention. 

21 

It  has  become  apparent  over  the  past  few  years  that  for  these  efforts  to  be  truly 
effective there needs to be enforceable laws, and adequate local enforcement of those 
laws,  to  provide  the  incentive  for  all  who  dig  to  pay  attention  to  how  and  where 
they  dig.  Progressive  states  such  as  Virginia  and  Minnesota  have  proven  that  with 
good education programs coupled with data collection and adequate and fair enforce-
ment, the number of incidents of damage to pipelines decreases considerably. 

The  only  way  that  state  and  local  enforcement  will  increase  is  if  Congress  pro-
vides increased funding to the state’s pipeline programs, and allows PHMSA to dis-
tribute that funding in such a way that it is an incentive for states to increase their 
capacity  for  enforcement.  We  support  the  language  in  S.  3961,  which  provides  for 
greater  funding  of  state  damage  prevention  programs,  and  provides  clarity  of  what 
such programs should include. We also believe that at this point in time it is impor-
tant  that  this  money  is  available  to  help  states  develop  such  programs,  so  we  also 
support  the  language  that  was  included  in  the  House  Energy  and  Commerce  Bill 
that amends 60105(b)(4) to make it clear that a state that is ‘‘encouraging and pro-
moting  the  establishment  of  a  program’’  can  receive  the  grant  funding  even  if  the 
program is not yet fully in place. 

Safety  Orders—We  fully  support  the  language  in  S.  3961,  which  allows  PHMSA 
to waive notice and a hearing in an emergency. We oppose the language in the Sen-
ate bill, which requires the new rules be in place before a safety order can be issued. 
We  hope  that  these  rules  will  be  promulgated  swiftly,  and  support  the  ‘‘within  1 
year’’  provision  in  the  House  Energy  and  Commerce  Bill,  but  we  do  not  believe 
issuance  of  such  important  orders  should  be  put  on  hold  until  these  new  rules  are 
promulgated. 

Permit  Streamlining—We  supported  the  language  in  Section  16  of  the  Pipeline 
Safety  Improvement  Act  of  2002  that  gave  PHMSA  authority  to  help  expedite  and 
coordinate the repair of existing pipelines to help ensure timely safety repairs with-
out  preempting  any  Federal,  state,  or  local  environmental  laws.  We  have  not  seen 
any documented need for permit streamlining for the construction and expansion of 
pipelines. Until such documented need is proven we oppose the language in Section 
13  of  S.  3961.  Additionally,  this  section  does  not  contain  critical  language  prohib-
iting preemption of Federal, state, or local environmental laws. 

One-Call  Civil  Enforcement—We  support  the  language  in  S.  3961.  We  agree  that 
PHMSA’s authority should not be limited in any state, and that calling 911 to report 
damage should not be the only method included. We also support the language that 
includes  operators  who  fail  to  respond  to  location  requests  in  a  timely  manner,  or 
who mark pipelines incorrectly. 

Gas Pipeline Integrity Reassessment Interval—The first cycle of integrity manage-
ment  assessment  for  gas  pipelines  has  not  even  been  completed  yet,  so  we  support 
the Senate bill’s authors who chose not to address the reassessment interval at this 
early date. 

Human Factor Risk Management Rulemaking—We support the 18 month require-
ment  for  development  of  these  standards,  and  also  support  the  specific  language  in 
S. 3961 that requires these standards to address work hours and schedules. 

Leak Detection Technology Report—We support the language in S. 3961 which re-
quires  a  report  from  PHMSA  within  1  year  on  the  effectiveness  of  current  leak  de-
tection technology. 

Although  S.  3961  and  the  associated  House  Bills  contain  many  important  im-
provements to pipeline safety, we feel that there are still some significant omissions 
from all of these bills. We ask that you amend S. 3961 to include the following pro-
visions. 
Needed Improvements Missing at This Time 
The Need for More Publicly Available Information 

One  of  the  Pipeline  Safety  Trust’s  highest  priorities  is  to  ensure  that  there  is 
enough accurate information easily available to local governments and the public to 
allow them to independently gauge the safety of the pipelines that run through their 
communities.  PHMSA  has  made  a  good  deal  of  progress  in  this  area,  but  some  of 
the most important information pieces are still missing. We ask that you help make 
this information available. 

Maps—Maps  that  allow  local  government  emergency  responders,  planners,  and 
zoning officials to know where pipelines are in relation to housing developments and 
a variety of infrastructure are critical to prevent pipeline damage and increase pipe-
line  safety.  Maps  that  allow  the  public  to  see  what  pipelines  run  through  their 
neighborhoods are also the best way to capture the public’s attention regarding pipe-
line  safety,  increase  their  awareness  of  pipeline  damage  issues,  and  enlist  them  to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00025 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

22 

be the eyes to help prevent pipeline damage. Maps also allow homebuyers to decide 
their own comfort level with living near pipelines. 

The 2002 Pipeline Safety Improvement Act required that pipeline companies pro-
vide  PHMSA  with  data  for  the  National  Pipeline  Mapping  System  (NPMS)  so  such 
maps  could  be  available  for  the  above  purposes.  Unfortunately  after  the  September 
11, 2001 terrorist attacks the NPMS system was removed from easy access and be-
came  a  password-protected  system  that  approved  users  have  to  agree  not  to  share 
with  anyone  else.  This  new  NPMS  security  removes  the  maps  from  the  public  alto-
gether,  and  makes  the  system  mainly  useless  for  local  government  since  the  map 
information can not be added to local GIS systems or planning maps because of the 
required nondisclosure. 

This removal of maps out of fear that terrorists may use them to find targets flies 
in the face of common sense. The location of pipelines are no secret, in fact 49 CFR 
195.410  requires  that  ‘‘Markers  must  be  located  at  each  public  road  crossing,  at 
each railroad crossing, and in sufficient number along the remainder of each buried 
line  so  that  its  location  is  accurately  known.’’  If  terrorists  want  to  find  pipelines, 
they  will.  All  that  has  been  accomplished  by  removing  maps  from  the  public  is  to 
increase  the  growing  problem  of  encroachment  near  pipelines,  and  of  unintentional 
damage to pipelines. 

This  removal  of  the  NPMS  from  the  public  has  also  caused  some  states,  such  as 
Washington,  Texas  and  Louisiana,  to  spend  their  limited  state  dollars  to  duplicate 
this  mapping  system  so  that  local  government  and  the  public  have  access  to  this 
valuable information. 

For  these  reasons  we  ask  that  you  direct  PHMSA  to  reinstate  access  to  the 
NPMS,  so  local  governments  can  plan  safely  and  the  public  can  be  aware  of  the 
pipelines that run through their midst. 

Access to Inspection Findings—One of the most important functions that PHMSA 
provides  is  the  ongoing  independent  inspection  of  pipeline  companies’  operations, 
maintenance,  and  training  programs.  The  findings  of  these  inspections  form  one  of 
the very basic protections to the public. Unfortunately none of these inspection find-
ings are available for local government or the public to review, leaving them to only 
guess the condition of pipelines, or even if such inspections are taking place. 

The pipeline industry themselves complains about this system. Individual compa-
nies  do  know  when  they  have  been  inspected,  but  often  have  to  wait  months  or 
years  to  learn  the  outcome  of  the  inspections,  and  most  times  if  no  problems  were 
found  they  hear  absolutely  nothing.  This  lengthy,  or  nonexistent,  feedback  system 
to pipeline companies is unfair, and does not improve safety the way a timely feed-
back system would. 

Somewhere  there  must  exist,  or  there  should  exist,  a  simple  coversheet  for  each 
inspection  that  includes  basic  information  such  as  pipeline  segment  included,  the 
date  of  the  inspection,  type  of  inspection,  concerns  noted,  and  corrections  required. 
If  this  basic  information,  along  with  associated  correspondence  between  the  agency 
and  the  pipeline  company,  were  provided  on  an  Internet-based  docket  system  that 
could be searched by state or pipeline company name, we believe it would go a long 
way  toward  demonstrating  progress,  and  thus  increasing  trust  in  pipeline  safety. 
This  inspection  transparency  would  go  hand-in-hand  with  the  enforcement  trans-
parency that is already included in S. 3961. 

Reporting  of  Over-Pressurization  Events—One  of  the  clearest  measurements  of 
whether a pipeline company has good control of their pipeline system is the number 
of  times  that  they  allow  their  pipeline  to  exceed  the  maximum  allowable  operating 
pressure  plus  a  permitted  accumulation  pressure  for  gas  pipelines,  or  110  percent 
of the maximum operating pressure for liquid pipelines. Unfortunately the vast ma-
jority of these events are not required to be reported to PHMSA, so neither PHMSA 
nor  the  public  can  use  this  indicator  to  determine  whether  the  pipeline  company  is 
causing  unwarranted  stress  on  their  pipeline  and  therefore  needs  greater  scrutiny. 
In  the  1980s  when  it  was  decided  to  provide  an  exemption  to  reporting  most  of 
these  important  events  the  reasoning  was  that  the  reporting  would  be  extremely 
time  intensive  and  costly  for  the  industry,  and  PHMSA  (RSPA  at  that  time)  had 
no  database  that  would  handle  the  data  in  a  way  that  would  be  valuable  for  the 
agency.  Fifteen  years  ago  e-mail,  the  Internet,  and  integrated  databases  were  a 
vague  dream.  That  has  all  changed,  so  the  arguments  used  against  the  collection 
of  this  valuable  information  no  longer  apply.  Furthermore,  with  increased  capabili-
ties in control room technology, remote communications, and integrity management 
the number of over-pressurization events should have reduced. Without this report-
ing requirement we have no way to know. 

For  these  reasons  the  exemptions  from  reporting  these  events  contained  in  49 

CFR 191.23(b) and 49 CFR 195.55(b) should be removed. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00026 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Pipelines and Informed Planning Alliance (PIPA) 

23 

In August of 2004, the Transportation Research Board of the National Academies 
released  a  study  on  the  feasibility  of  developing  risk-informed  land  use  guidance 
near  existing  and  future  transmission  pipelines  for  use  by  state  and  local  govern-
ments. This study was an attempt to address the need for local governments to use 
land use and zoning laws to try to protect citizens and pipelines from encroachment 
by development near existing pipelines and in the siting of new pipelines. 

The  vast  majority  of  local  planning  departments  have  little  expertise  or  knowl-
edge of pipelines, so developing such guidance is a crucial part in the overall strat-
egy  of  damage  prevention.  PHMSA  provided  a  report  to  Congress  on  the  develop-
ment of these guidance activities in January of 2005. One of the major pieces of that 
report  was  the  establishment  of  the  Pipelines  and  Informed  Planning  Alliance 
(PIPA), a multi-stakeholder effort aimed at designing and moving this risk-informed 
land use guidance forward. 

This effort will not be easy because many of these stakeholders have little reason 
to add concern for pipelines very high up on their already crowded list of priorities, 
but  it  is  essential  that  this  effort  get  underway.  This  is  another  area  where  in-
creased funding for state participation, and funding of the Pipeline Safety Informa-
tion  Grants  to  allow  these  stakeholder  groups  to  participate  as  equal  partners,  will 
be required for a successful outcome. 

The  Pipeline  Safety  Trust  was  invited  to  be  on  the  steering  committee  for  the 
PIPA  effort  in  early  2005.  Since  that  time  not  one  meeting  has  been  held,  and 
progress on this important initiative seems to have stalled. We think that Congress 
should  help  move  this  process  forward  by  setting  a  date-certain  for  this  initiative 
to  get  started,  and  require  PHMSA  to  report  to  Congress  on  progress  made  at  reg-
ular intervals. 
Greater Citizen Involvement—State Pipeline Advisory Committees 

The Pipeline Safety Improvement Act of 2002 provided a vehicle for greater public 
involvement in pipeline safety issues for pipeline advisory committees appointed by 
state  Governors.  The  states  of  Washington  and  Kentucky  have  both  taken  advan-
tage of this opportunity to involve a broader range of stakeholders in pipeline safety 
discussions. The creation of state advisory committees is essential for greater public 
involvement, especially as PHMSA moves forward on efforts to involve local commu-
nities  on  issues  regarding  pipelines,  encroachment  and  smart  local  planning.  In 
Washington State the Citizen Committee on Pipeline Safety has become an integral 
part  of  rulemaking  and  public  involvement,  as  well  as  a  valuable  sounding  board 
for concerned citizens, local government, industry, and the state legislature. 

We  believe  that  greater  public  involvement,  leads  to  greater  trust  and  under-
standing,  which  leads  to  smarter,  more  comprehensive  pipeline  safety  initiatives. 
For  this  reason  we  hope  that  Congress  will  encourage  the  creation  of  more  state 
pipeline  advisory  committees.  This  could  be  accomplished  by  having  PHMSA  pro-
mote such advisory committees, while tying a small percentage of the state pipeline 
safety  program  grant  to  the  appointment  and  ongoing  meeting  of  such  a  Governor- 
appointed committee. 
Financial Responsibility Requirements for Pipeline Corporations 

Large  corporations  can  shield  themselves  from  liability  for  poor  safety  practices 
through  certain  strategies,  such  as  holding  assets  that  may  generate  liability  (e.g., 
pipelines) in subsidiaries or as shares of separate corporations. As part of this strat-
egy,  the  parent  corporation  drastically  undercapitalizes  its  subsidiary.  In  the  case 
of pipelines, this is common. It is not unusual for a pipeline company to be capital-
ized by virtually 100 percent debt, lent by the large corporate shareholders. 

In  fact,  the  owners  of  the  Olympic  Pipeline  used  a  similar  strategy.  In  a  major 
spill  like  Bellingham,  the  undercapitalized  pipeline  company  is  forced  into  bank-
ruptcy  when  the  owners  decline  to  provide  further  financing.  In  the  usual  bank-
ruptcy,  the  shareholders  lose  the  company  assets  to  the  debt  holders,  but  in  this 
case,  those  are  the  same  entities.  Bankruptcy  presents  no  meaningful  threat  to 
these  shareholders  but  it  does  allow  pipeline  companies  to  avoid  financial  con-
sequences for inadequate safety measures. 

Congress  should  consider  imposing  financial  responsibility  requirements  for  pipe-
lines  as  it  already  does  for  other  companies  under  the  Resources  Conservation  and 
Recovery  Act  (RCRA)  and  the  Oil  Pollution  Act  (OPA).  To  get  this  process  started 
we  urge  Congress  to  ask  for  a  study  from  either  GAO  or  CRS,  to  describe  how  this 
works  in  other  regulatory  realms,  and  how  it  could  best  be  adapted  for  pipelines. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00027 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

Expansion of High Consequence Areas (HCA) 

24 

Finally,  we  would  like  Congress  to  consider  a  phased  expansion  of  what  is  in-
cluded  within  the  definition  of  high  consequence  areas  (HCA).  This  definition,  to  a 
large extent, is what determines which transmission pipelines are required to be in-
spected  under  the  integrity  management  rules.  At  this  time  HCA’s  mainly  include 
populated  areas,  areas  where  people  congregate,  and  for  liquid  pipelines  drinking 
water sources, and navigable waterways. This was a good starting place for integrity 
management  since  it  represented  the  most  crucial  areas  and  a  significant  under-
taking for the industry. 

As the first phase of integrity management testing is accomplished we believe op-
erator and regulator experience, along with the increases in industry infrastructure 
needed  to  undertake  these  inspections,  makes  it  possible  to  expand  the  definition 
of HCA to include important areas that were left out of the initial definition. These 
left  out  areas  would  include  things  like  important  historical  sites,  national  parks 
and  wildlife  refuges,  and  in  the  case  of  liquid  pipelines  swimable  and  fishable 
waters. 

Before  I  finish  I  would  like  to  comment  on  the  progress  that  PHMSA  has  made 
under  its  current  leadership.  In  the  past  seven  and  a  half  years,  since  the  Bel-
lingham pipeline tragedy, due to strong efforts from citizens, Members of Congress, 
PHMSA,  and  the  industry  itself,  progress  has  been  made  to  prevent  further  trage-
dies like those that have occurred in Edison, NJ; Walnut Creek, CA; Blenheim, NY; 
Mounds  View,  MN;  Lively,  TX;  San  Bernardino,  CA;  Bellingham,  WA;  Carlsbad, 
NM; and elsewhere. 

For  the  first  time  parts  of  gas  and  liquid  transmission  pipelines  now  have  to  be 
internally inspected, and rulemaking is proceeding to include integrity management 
requirements  for  gas  distribution  pipelines  where  the  majority  of  deaths  and  inju-
ries occur. Pipeline operators now have clear requirements for communicating to the 
public  and  local  government,  and  OPS  has  unveiled  new  additions  to  their  own 
website and communication programs. Perhaps just as significant, many progressive 
thinking  pipeline  companies  have  taken  pipeline  safety  seriously  enough  that  they 
are  now  leading  by  example  by  operating  and  maintaining  their  pipelines  in  ways 
that go beyond the minimum Federal standards. 

We  should  all  celebrate  this  progress,  while  acknowledging  that  continuous  eval-
uation and improvement can make pipelines considerably safer yet, and thereby re-
store the public’s trust in pipelines. 

Thank you again for this opportunity to testify today. We hope that you will con-
sider  the  ideas  we  have  brought  forward  today,  which  we  believe  can  take  pipeline 
safety  up  another  significant  notch.  If  you  have  any  questions  now,  or  at  anytime 
in the future, I would be glad to try to answer them. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Felt? 

STATEMENT  OF  TIMOTHY  FELT,  PRESIDENT/CEO,  EXPLORER 
PIPELINE  COMPANY;  MEMBER,  AMERICAN  PETROLEUM 
INSTITUTE  PIPELINE  COMMITTEE;  AND  VICE  CHAIRMAN/ 
TREASURER-ELECT, ASSOCIATION OF OIL PIPE LINES 
Mr.  FELT.  Mr.  Chairman,  Mr.  Co-Chairman,  members  of  the 
Committee,  my  name  is  Tim  Felt,  I  am  President  and  CEO  of  Ex-
plorer Pipeline, headquartered in Tulsa, Oklahoma. 

Explorer  operates  1,400  miles  of  petroleum  products  pipeline, 
serving  16  states,  extending  from  the  Gulf  Coast  and  throughout 
the mid-western United States. I appreciate the opportunity to ap-
pear  today  on  behalf  of  API  and  AOPL.  Together,  these  organiza-
tions  represent  the  companies  responsible  for  the  vast  majority  of 
U.S. oil pipeline transportation. I will summarize my written testi-
mony,  and  ask  that  the  full  text  and  attachments  be  included  in 
the record of this hearing for the Committee’s consideration. 

Our  primary  message  today  is  that  we  believe  a  pipeline  safety 
reauthorization  bill  can  be  passed  in  this  Congress.  Congress 
should act now, not at some indefinite future date, to reaffirm and 
strengthen  a  program  put  in  place  with  the  Pipeline  Safety  Im-
provement  Act  of  2002.  The  2002  Act  is  a  success—industry  and 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00028 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

25 

DOT  have  cooperated  to  achieve  significant  improvement  in  pipe-
line  safety,  and  this  improvement  is  demonstrated  by  our  indus-
try’s  record.  This  record  is  reflected  in  the  charts  that  accompany 
my testimony. 

The  oil  pipeline  industry  plans  to  invest  over  $1  billion  in  pipe-
line  safety  improvements  over  the  next  5  years.  Because  of  this,  it 
is very important that Congress reauthorize the DOT pipeline safe-
ty program in 2006. Reauthorization sends a clear signal that these 
investments  are  appropriate,  and  that  DOT  is  on  the  right  track 
in implementing the Pipeline Safety Improvement Act of 2002. 

In  addition,  several  billions  of  dollars  of  investment  in  new  oil 
pipeline  infrastructure  are  underway  or  planned  in  the  near-term. 
Certainty in the safety requirements this infrastructure must meet 
is  very  important  for  these  investments.  The  prospects  for  a  com-
promise  pipeline  safety  reauthorization  bill  should  be  excellent— 
the proposals before us have a number of elements in common, and 
address for the most part, the same issues. 

We’ve  come  this  far  and  worked  together  so  well  that  we  must 
achieve passage of a bill. We should not wait for some future Con-
gress to enact a compromise bill that could be passed now. 

Let me discuss a few provisions of interest. Damage prevention— 
at the center of all bills are similar provisions that will strengthen 
enforcement  of  state  laws  designed  to  prevent  underground  dam-
age.  All  include  a  comprehensive  list  of  the  elements,  including  ef-
fective enforcement, that characterize successful state underground 
damage prevention programs. DOT is given important new author-
ity to assist in enforcing damage prevention laws. We strongly sup-
port  these  provisions  and  urge  the  Committees  to  build  their  final 
legislative product around underground damage prevention. 

I  serve  on  the  Common  Ground  Alliance  Board  as  a  Member  for 
the  oil  pipeline  industry.  The  CGA  is  one  of  the  best  things  that 
has  happened  to  pipeline  safety  in  many  years.  The  CGA  provides 
a  forum  to  work  underground  damage  prevention  issues  that  sim-
ply doesn’t exist anywhere else. 

One of the current roles is to lead the public awareness campaign 
to  promote  use  of  the  nationwide  toll-free  8-1-1  telephone  number 
for  One-Call  notification  that  was  required  by  the  2002  Act.  Your 
bill  should  explicitly  authorize  funds  to  support  the  8-1-1  cam-
paign. 

Regarding  safety  orders—section  6  of  S.  3961  contains  a  provi-
sion  that  modifies  DOT  current  authority  to  issue  mandatory  or-
ders  to  pipeline  operators.  As  I  explain  in  more  detail  in  my  writ-
ten  statement,  we  have  concerns  with  this  provision.  As  drafted, 
the Secretary of Transportation may order an operator to make ex-
tensive expenditures, including replacement of the operator’s entire 
system to address any condition that poses a risk based on any fac-
tors  the  Secretary  considers  appropriate.  Under  these  provisions, 
an operator could be powerless to contest a DOT order for unneces-
sary expenditures of scarce resources to address questionable risks. 
We  urge  the  Committee  to  transform  the  provision  into  a  prob-
lem-solving  tool  instead  of  a  provision  that  assumes  a  contest 
among lawyers is always necessary. We suggest the Committee di-
rect  that  the  administrative  procedures  implementing  this  order 
offer the pipeline operator an opportunity to confer informally with 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00029 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

26 

DOT before exercising the operator’s right to a hearing. Any action 
by  mutual  agreement  as  a  result  of  the  consultation  could  be  re-
duced to words and made both public and enforceable. This simple 
modification  will  save  time  and  legal  costs  and  bring  about  safety 
improvements  sooner.  If  the  operator  and  DOT  cannot  agree 
promptly on a remedy, the DOT would still retain authority to con-
duct a formal hearing and issue its order. 

In summary, current pipeline safety law is working, and working 
very well. The legislative proposals before Congress all would make 
real  improvements  in  an  already  sound  DOT  safety  program.  The 
important  goal  at  this  point  is  enactment  of  the  legislation  reau-
thorizing  this  program.  The  passage  of  compromise  legislation  is 
more  important  than  any  concerns  we  have  with  individual  provi-
sions.  We  need  to  move  promptly  to  agree  on  the  improvements 
that can gain broad support and incorporate these improvements in 
a pipeline safety reauthorization bill that can be enacted this year. 
The public should not have to wait until next Congress to make the 
improvements we can agree on now. 

We  need  to  pass  a  pipeline  safety  reauthorization  bill  in  this 
Congress and the oil pipeline industry stands ready to help in any 
way we can to achieve this worthwhile goal. Thank you. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Felt follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF TIMOTHY FELT,  PRESIDENT/CEO,  EXPLORER PIPELINE 
COMPANY;  MEMBER,  AMERICAN PETROLEUM INSTITUTE PIPELINE COMMITTEE;  AND 
VICE CHAIRMAN/TREASURER-ELECT, ASSOCIATION OF OIL PIPE LINES 
Mr. Chairman, members of the Committee, my name is Tim Felt. I am President 
and  CEO  of  Explorer  Pipeline  Company,  headquartered  in  Tulsa,  Oklahoma.  Ex-
plorer operates 1,400 miles of petroleum products pipeline serving 16 states extend-
ing from the Gulf Coast throughout the mid-western United States. 

I  am  a  member  of  the  API  Pipeline  Committee,  Vice  Chairman  and  Treasurer- 
Elect  of  the  Association  of  Oil  Pipe  Lines,  and  the  oil  pipeline  industry’s  Board 
Member  for  the  Common  Ground  Alliance,  a  voluntary,  private-sector  organization 
dedicated to the prevention of excavation damage to underground facilities. I appre-
ciate  the  opportunity  to  appear  today  on  behalf  of  API  and  AOPL.  Together,  API 
and  AOPL  represent  the  companies  responsible  for  the  vast  majority  of  U.S.  oil 
pipeline transportation. 
Summary 

As  the  Committee  reviews  the  current  state  of  pipeline  safety  and  the  progress 
that  has  been  made  since  the  2002  Act,  these  are  the  main  points  I  would  like  to 
emphasize: 

• We  need  to  enact  pipeline  safety  reauthorization  legislation  before  the  end  of 
this  Congress.  A  lot  of  work  has  gone  into  the  current  bills,  and  there  are  no 
major  disagreements  about  what  a  compromise  among  the  various  bills  should 
look like. Let’s get a good bill passed now. 

• The  Pipeline  Safety  Improvement  Act  of  2002  is  a  success.  Industry  and  DOT 
have cooperated to achieve significant improvement in pipeline safety, and this 
improvement  is  demonstrated  by  our  industry’s  record.  This  record  is  reflected 
on the charts that accompany my testimony. 

• The oil pipeline industry is making the investments needed to fully comply with 
the law and related regulations and in many cases to exceed their requirements. 
We plan to invest over $1 billion in pipeline safety improvements over the next 
5 years. Because of this, it is very important that Congress reauthorize the DOT 
pipeline safety program in 2006. Reauthorization sends a clear signal that these 
investments  are  appropriate,  and  DOT  is  on  the  right  track  in  implementing 
the 2002 Act. 

• In  addition,  several  billions  of  dollars  of  investments  in  new  oil  pipeline  infra-
structure are underway or planned in the near-term. Certainty in the safety re-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00030 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

27 

quirements  this  infrastructure  must  meet  is  very  important  for  these  invest-
ments. 
• The Administration, the jurisdictional Committees of the House and Senate, the 
industry and the pipeline advocates are in virtual agreement on the core provi-
sions of a compromise reauthorization bill that could be passed in 2006. Passage 
of a bill before final Congressional adjournment is our shared goal. 
• If  this  Congress  passes  a  reauthorization  bill,  the  protections  provided  by  this 
compromise will be available now. If this Congress fails to pass a bill, a subse-
quent  Congress  must  start  over  to  adopt  new  legislation  approving  the  needed 
authority.  That  could  take  months  or  years.  Congress  can  act  now  and  should 
act now. 

We urge you to act promptly to reconcile any differences between the Senate bill, 
S.  3961,  and  the  bills  approved  by  the  House  Committees  and  send  a  compromise 
bill to the President this year. 
The Role of Pipelines in Petroleum Supply 

In  discussing  pipeline  safety  legislation,  it  is  useful  to  remind  the  Committee  of 
the  role  oil  pipelines  play  in  energy  supply.  An  understanding  of  this  role  leads  to 
appreciation  of  the  need  for  effective  and  workable  policies  that  provide  certainty 
so this key part of the petroleum distribution system operates efficiently and safely. 
About  40  percent  of  the  total  U.S.  energy  supply  comes  from  petroleum,  but  the 
transportation sector depends on petroleum for 97 percent of its energy. Two-thirds 
of  domestic  crude  oil  and  refined  products  transportation  is  provided  by  pipeline. 
Pipelines  do  this  safely  and  efficiently.  The  cost  to  deliver  a  gallon  of  petroleum  by 
pipeline  is  very  low,  typically  2–3  cents  per  gallon.  Transportation—airlines,  auto-
mobiles,  trucks,  barges  and  ships—could  not  function  without  pipelines  to  deliver 
crude oil to refineries and refinery output of petroleum fuels to consumers in various 
parts  of  the  country.  The  national  oil  pipeline  system  is  a  bargain  for  consumers 
and an absolutely essential part of the U.S. economy. 

Oil  pipelines  are  common  carriers  whose  rates  are  regulated  by  the  Federal  En-
ergy Regulatory Commission. Oil pipeline income is driven by the volume delivered 
and  does  not  depend  on  the  price  of  the  products  transported.  Oil  pipeline  compa-
nies do not profit from high oil prices. In fact, high oil prices have a negative impact 
on  oil  pipeline  income  by  raising  power  costs  and  reducing  demand  for  petroleum. 
Progress in Pipeline Safety 

Oil  pipeline  operators  have  been  subject  to  the  DOT’s  pipeline  integrity  manage-
ment regulations since March 2001, before enactment of the 2002 Act. DOT’s inspec-
tions  of  operators’  plans  show  that  integrity  testing  will  eventually  cover  approxi-
mately 82 percent of the Nation’s oil pipeline infrastructure. The oil pipeline indus-
try  is  well  past  the  halfway  point  in  the  implementation  of  integrity  management. 
DOT  has  audited  each  of  these  operators  under  these  regulations  at  least  two 
times—an initial ‘‘quick hit’’ audit and one subsequent full audit. Many are involved 
in a third audit cycle. Operators are finding and repairing conditions in need of re-
pair and less serious conditions discovered in the course of investigating defects. Op-
erators are fixing what they find, often going beyond the requirements of the regula-
tions. 
Improved Spill Record 

These inspections and repairs have improved the oil pipeline spill record dramati-
cally  in  the  last  5  years,  as  the  exhibits  show.  The  data  for  these  exhibits  comes 
from  a  voluntary  industry  program  that  since  1999  has  collected  extensive  data  on 
oil pipeline performance. These figures represent line pipe releases, which are those 
that occur outside the company’s facilities and are the releases most likely to impact 
the public and the environment. Line pipe is rightly the primary focus of DOT’s pro-
gram, so the improvement in our record is direct evidence of the wisdom of the DOT 
approach. 

The  trend  in  oil  pipeline  incidents  is  down  for  each  cause  category.  The  number 
of  total  releases  dropped  51  percent,  releases  due  to  corrosion  dropped  67  percent, 
and  releases  due  to  operator  error  dropped  by  63  percent.  Finally,  releases  from 
third-party damage from excavation dropped 37 percent. 

This  safety  improvement  record  only  covers  half  the  7-year  baseline  assessment 
period for oil pipelines. We expect the record to show continued improvement as we 
complete  the  first  full  cycle  and  move  through  subsequent  mandatory  5-year  reas-
sessment intervals. 

The  Federal  pipeline  safety  program  is  working.  Congress  needs  to  pass  a  reau-
thorization bill that endorses and, where appropriate, strengthens this excellent pro-
gram. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00031 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

28 

Legislation 

The  legislative  proposals—the  Administration’s  H.R.  5678,  the  House  versions  of 
H.R.  5782  and  the  Senate’s  S.  3961—all  assume  continuation  of  the  current  DOT 
program and seek to make it better. I would like to highlight the provisions of these 
proposals  that  we  believe  are  the  most  significant  and  deserve  the  most  attention 
by the Committee. My testimony will also discuss improvements we recommend for 
certain of the provisions. While none of these bills are perfect from our perspective, 
the Committee should understand that we see nothing that would cause AOPL and 
API  to  oppose  enactment  of  compromise  pipeline  safety  reauthorization  legislation 
based  on  these  bills.  Enactment  of  the  legislation  is  more  important  than  any  con-
cerns we have with individual provisions. 
Underground Damage Prevention 

Pipeline  releases  caused  by  excavation  damage  are  the  most  traumatic,  the  larg-
est, and are the most likely to threaten the public and the environment. At the cen-
ter of H.R. 5678, H.R. 5782 and S. 3961 are similar provisions that will strengthen 
the  impact  of  state  laws  designed  to  prevent  underground  damage.  Incentives  are 
provided  to  states  that  adopt  strong  damage  prevention  laws  and  programs.  To 
qualify  for  these  incentives  a  state  must  also  be  adequately  enforcing  its  damage 
prevention  laws.  Improvement  in  enforcement  of  state  damage  prevention  laws 
would make real improvement in pipeline safety. 

In addition, these bills all make it a Federal civil violation to ignore state under-
ground  damage  prevention  laws.  We  believe  this  expression  of  the  seriousness  the 
Federal Government attaches to damage prevention enforcement is one of the most 
important safety advances proposed in these or any recent pipeline safety bills. 
Common Ground Alliance 

As  noted  at  the  beginning  of  my  testimony,  I  serve  as  the  Common  Ground  Alli-
ance Board Member for the oil pipeline industry. The CGA is one of the best things 
that has happened in pipeline safety in many years. CGA provides a forum to work 
underground  damage  prevention  issues  that  simply  doesn’t  exist  anywhere  else. 
CGA  brings  solutions  to  the  table  instead  of  problems.  One  of  CGA’s  current  roles 
is to lead the public awareness campaign to promote use of the nationwide, toll-free 
8-1-1  telephone  number  for  one-call  notification  that  was  required  by  the  2002  Act. 
Section  17  of  S.  3961  should  specifically  authorize  funds  to  support  the  8-1-1  cam-
paign. 
Low-Stress Pipelines 

Earlier  this  year  there  was  a  significant  leak  from  a  crude  oil  pipeline  on  the 
North Slope of Alaska that was under DOT’s jurisdiction, but was operating at less 
than  20  percent  of  specified  minimum  yield  strength—low-stress.  Crude  oil  from 
this  release  covered  an  approximately  two-acre  area.  Based  on  API’s  Pipeline  Per-
formance Tracking System, our industry’s internal data library on oil pipeline spills, 
this  particular  leak  was  a  statistical  anomaly  in  its  size  and  is  not  at  all  typical 
of  releases  from  low-stress  pipelines.  Nevertheless,  the  leak  shows  that  anomalies 
do occur and must be considered in managing the risks pipelines present. That pipe-
line  was  regulated  by  the  Alaska  Department  of  Environmental  Conservation,  but 
was  not  covered  by  the  DOT  regulations  then  in  effect  because  it  was  operating  at 
low-stress,  did  not  cross  a  navigable  waterway,  was  in  a  rural  area  and  did  not 
transport highly volatile liquids. 

DOT has accelerated a rulemaking process that was underway before the leak oc-
curred  to  address  the  regulation  of  low-stress  pipelines.  In  the  House,  one  of  the 
pipeline  safety  reauthorization  bills  directly  addresses  the  regulation  of  low-stress 
pipelines other than gathering lines. AOPL and API worked with the House Energy 
and  Commerce  Committee  and  are  supporting  a  provision  in  that  Committee’s 
version of H.R. 5782 that would subject the pipeline on the North Slope that leaked 
and  similar  pipelines  to  the  same  DOT  regulation  that  currently  covers  high-stress 
pipelines.  Section  13  of  S.  3961  is  similar  to  this  House  provision.  We  continue  to 
support the House Energy and Commerce Committee low-stress provision and urge 
this committee to adopt the same language so that the treatment of low-stress pipe-
lines will be the same in each bill. 
Safety Orders 

Sec.  6  of  S.  3691  modifies  DOT’s  current  authority  to  issue  mandatory  orders  to 
pipeline  operators.  Title  49  section  60117(l)  was  added  by  the  Pipeline  Safety  Im-
provement Act of 2002 to allow DOT to issue a ‘‘safety order’’ to an individual oper-
ator in situations that appear to require action, but do not rise to the level of danger 
implied  in  a  ‘‘hazardous  facility’’  designation  under  section  60112,  the  principal  au-
thority available to DOT to order actions by an operator. The intent in 2002, as we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00032 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

29 

understand it, was to provide DOT with an enforcement tool with a lower threshold 
that  would  not  require  DOT  to  first  declare  that  an  operator’s  facility  ‘‘is  or  would 
be  hazardous’’  before  actions  would  be  required  of  the  operator  that  could  be  docu-
mented  in  the  public  record.  Unfortunately,  the  existing  section  60117(l)  does  not 
provide  for  notice  or  an  opportunity  for  a  hearing  before  an  order  would  be  issued. 
This existing provision is seriously lacking in due process protection for pipeline op-
erators who might be subject to such an order. 

The  Administration’s  bill,  the  House  Energy  and  Commerce  bill  and  Sec.  6  of  S. 
3961  all  amend  section  60117(l)  to  add  a  welcome  notice  requirement  and  oppor-
tunity for a hearing at DOT before any order could be issued. Ensuring a modicum 
of  due  process  addresses  a  significant  omission  in  the  2002  Act.  However,  Sec.  6 
goes on, in effect, to eliminate the due process benefit by practically abolishing any 
threshold  or  burden  of  proof  for  DOT  in  triggering  a  safety  order.  The  Secretary  of 
Transportation  may  order  an  operator  to  make  possibly  extensive  expenditures  on 
all or a portion of the operator’s system to address ‘‘any condition that poses a risk’’ 
based  on  any  ‘‘factors  the  Secretary  considers  appropriate’’.  Under  these  provisions 
an operator could be virtually powerless to contest effectively any DOT requirement 
to  make  what  the  operator  believes  to  be  unnecessary  expenditures  of  scarce  re-
sources to address questionable risks. 

Notwithstanding these concerns, we recognize that some version of Sec. 6 is likely 
to  be  included  in  any  final  pipeline  safety  reauthorization  bill.  Therefore  we  urge 
the  Committee  to  transform  the  provision  into  a  problem-solving  tool  instead  of  a 
provision  that  assumes  a  contest  among  lawyers  is  always  necessary.  We  suggest 
the  Committee  direct  that  the  administrative  procedures  implementing  this  order 
offer  the  pipeline  operator  an  opportunity  to  confer  informally  with  DOT  before  ex-
ercising  the  operator’s  right  to  a  hearing.  We  believe  informal  consultation  will 
produce  remedies  acceptable  to  both  operator  and  DOT  that  will  resolve  the  vast 
majority of DOT’s concerns without the need for a formal hearing. Any action taken 
by mutual agreement as a result of the consultation could be reduced to writing and 
made  both  public  and  enforceable.  We  believe  this  simple  modification  will  save 
time  and  legal  costs  and  bring  about  safety  improvements  sooner.  If  the  operator 
and DOT cannot agree on a remedy, the DOT would retain the authority to conduct 
a formal hearing and issue its order. 

Finally, we suggest the Committee to modify Sec. 6 of S. 3961 to focus the author-
ity  on  pipeline  integrity  risks  and  remove  pipeline  ‘‘replacement’’  as  a  remedy  for 
this  low-threshold  order.  If  DOT  is  going  to  take  the  expensive  step  of  ordering  re-
placement of a pipeline, it should be done under the higher-threshold hazardous fa-
cility order authority of title 49 section 60112. 
Enforcement Transparency 

Sec. 9 of S. 3961 requires DOT to post information on a monthly basis about pipe-
line enforcement actions taken by the Secretary or the Pipeline and Hazardous Ma-
terials  Safety  Administration.  We  have  no  objection  to  this  proposal  as  long  as  the 
normal  due  process  and  confidentiality  attaching  to  negotiation  and  settlement  of 
cases is preserved. The House Energy and Commerce Committee language captures 
these safeguards and in addition ensures that no information will be disclosed under 
this  provision  that  would  not  be  disclosed  under  the  Freedom  of  Information  Act. 
We  believe  consistency  with  the  Freedom  of  Information  Act  should  be  required  in 
whatever bill passes. 
Cost Recovery for Extraordinary Events 

Sec.  19  of  S.  3691  authorizes  DOT  to  recover  DOT’s  costs  of  investigating  major 
pipeline  safety  incidents  ‘‘from  the  person  or  persons  responsible  for  the  incident.’’ 
The  amounts  collected  would  not  be  returned  to  the  Treasury,  but  would  remain 
available  to  DOT  until  expended  to  cover  the  cost  of  investigating  and  monitoring 
incidents.  We  question  the  wisdom  of  this  provision.  DOT  should  budget  for  these 
types  of  expenses  through  the  normal  Federal  budget  process.  The  additional  fees 
authorized  by  Sec.  19  would  not  be  subject  to  Congressional  control  or  oversight 
through  the  appropriations  process.  There  would  be  no  effective  check  on  the  oper-
ation of this authority once this bill passes. 
Other Provisions 

My  comments  today  have  not  addressed  every  provision  of  every  proposal.  Most 
of the provisions I have not discussed we do not oppose or do not directly affect the 
oil pipeline industry. I would reiterate that the important goal at this point is enact-
ment  of  the  legislation.  Passage  of  compromise  legislation  is  more  important  than 
any concerns we have with individual provisions. 

With so little time left in the current Congress, we hope the Committee will work 
with  the  House  to  put  together  (and  quickly)  a  bill  that  has  broad  appeal  and  can 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00033 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

30 

pass  both  Houses.  The  test  for  inclusion  of  a  provision  should  be  whether  it  is  ac-
ceptable  to  all  the  interested  parties.  We  need  to  move  forward  by  consensus,  and 
we need to move rapidly if a bill is to pass. It would be a shame to have come this 
far and worked together so well and yet not achieve passage of the bill. The protec-
tions  for  the  public  that  a  bill  would  provide  are  within  reach,  particularly  in  the 
area of damage prevention and state cooperation. These protections should be made 
available  now.  We  should  not  make  the  public  wait  for  some  future  Congress  to 
enact these protections. 
Closing 

In  summary,  current  pipeline  safety  law  is  working,  and  working  very  well.  Im-
provements  can  be  made,  particularly  in  strengthening  underground  damage  pre-
vention,  but  fundamental  changes  are  not  needed.  The  legislative  proposals  before 
Congress all seek to make improvements in the fundamentally sound DOT pipeline 
safety  program  based  on  the  Pipeline  Safety  Improvement  Act  of  2002.  We  need  to 
move promptly to agree on the improvements that can gain broad support and incor-
porate  these  improvements  in  a  pipeline  safety  reauthorization  bill  that  can  be  en-
acted  this  year.  The  oil  pipeline  industry  stands  ready  to  help  in  any  way  we  can 
in the achievement of this worthy goal. 

This concludes my remarks, I will be happy to respond to questions. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00034 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
1

t
l

e
f

31 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Thank  you  very  much.  Senator  Inouye  has  been 
called away because of a problem relating to the death of a friend, 
so he’s not going to be here the balance of the time. 

Mr. Boss, you’re next, please. 

STATEMENT  OF  TERRY  BOSS,  SENIOR  VICE  PRESIDENT, 
ENVIRONMENT,  SAFETY  AND  OPERATIONS,  INTERSTATE 
NATURAL GAS ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA 
Mr.  BOSS.  Good  morning  Chairman  and  Members  of  the  Com-
mittee.  I  am  Terry  Boss,  Senior  Vice  President  of  Environment, 
Safety and Operations of the Interstate Natural Gas Association of 
America, or INGAA. 

INGAA  is  a  trade  association  that  represents  virtually  all  of  the 
interstate  and  inter-provincial  pipelines  and  natural  gas  pipelines 
in North America. Pipelines represented by INGAA have been reg-
ulated for safety issues by the Federal Government since 1968. Our 
pipelines  were,  in  fact,  the  first  to  be  covered  under  the  Federal 
Pipeline Safety Act. Some of you may know that the 2002 reauthor-
ization of the Pipeline Safety Act included a provision requiring the 
establishment of a natural gas pipeline integrity management pro-
gram. 

This program requires each natural gas pipeline operator first to 
identify all segments located in high consequence areas. Second, to 
develop an integrity management program for reducing risks to the 
public in these areas. Third, to undertake baseline integrity assess-
ments  of  all  of  the  segments  identified  in  these  areas  within  10 
years  of  enactment.  Fourth,  develop  a  process  for  making  repairs 
to any anomalies found as a result of these assessments; and fifth, 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00035 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2

t
l

e
f

32 

reassess  segments  at  least  every  7  years  thereafter  in  order  to 
verify continued pipe integrity. 

How  has  this  program  worked  so  far?  To  quote  the  GAO  in  its 
recent  report,  06–946,  ‘‘The  gas  integrity  management  program  is 
benefiting  public  safety  by  supplementing  existing  safety  require-
ments  with  risk-based  management  principles  that  focus  on  safety 
risks.’’  INGAA  agrees  that  this  largely  has  been  a  successful  pro-
gram. The amount of inspection and repair work completed to date 
is covered in my written testimony. To keep it brief, what I can say 
is that the natural gas pipeline industry is on track for completing 
the baseline assessments within the 10 year requirement. We have 
not found a large number of problems with the pipelines that have 
been  inspected,  but  the  anomalies  that  are  being  found  are  being 
corrected. 

As  I  noted,  the  program  requires  we  focus  on  these  high  con-
sequence  areas,  which  we  call  HCAs.  These  segments  represent 
about  7  percent  of  the  total  natural  gas  transmission  mileage  in 
the U.S. However, because we are principally using internal inspec-
tion  devices  called  smart  pigs  for  the  vast  majority  of  this  work, 
and  because  these  smart  pigs  can  primarily  be  put  into  and  taken 
out  of  the  pipelines  at  compressor  stations  placed  about  75  miles 
apart,  we  are  really  assessing  far  more  than  just  the  HCAs  tar-
geted in the program. In fact, we anticipate we will actually inspect 
between 55 and 60 percent of the total pipeline mileage during this 
baseline  period.  Any  anomalies  found  are  corrected,  even  though 
they are not located in HCA areas. 

In  looking  forward  to  the  current  reauthorization  bill,  I  would 
like  to  focus  on  two  of  the  INGAA  priorities  in  the  limited  time  I 
have.  The  highest  priority  for  INGAA  is  changing  the  current  re-
quirement that all of the reassessments be completed at least once 
every  7  years.  This  static,  one-size-fits-all  number  was—and  re-
mains the source of—continued frustration for the INGAA member-
ship  and  that  it  has  no  basis  in  engineering  or  risk  analysis  and 
actually  limits  the  effectiveness  of  the  program.  A  risk-based  reas-
sessment interval determined for each pipeline segment is the most 
logical  and  effective  alternative  for  focusing  efforts  and  improving 
safety performance overall. 

When  the  House  and  Senate  were  renegotiating  the  2002  bill, 
INGAA agreed to the 10 year baseline requirement, but had strong 
misgivings  about  the  fixed  7  year  reassessment  interval.  Our  sup-
port for that bill hinged on the fact that Congress included a provi-
sion requiring the GAO to perform an analysis on this interval. The 
GAO  has,  in  fact,  released  this  report  in  September,  and  it  sup-
ports  the  idea  of  changing  the  7-year  requirement  with  one  based 
on risk and engineering analysis. The title of the report really says 
it  all.  Risk-Based  Standards  Should  Allow  Pipeline  Operators  To 
Better Tailor Reassessments to Pipeline Threats. 

Mr.  Chairman,  we  urge  the  Committee  to  heed  GAO’s  rec-
ommendation  and  include  risk-based  standards  for  reassessment 
intervals in your reauthorization bill. 

I  also  want  to  mention  one  other  issue—excavation  damage,  the 
primary  cause  of  serious  incidents  on  our  pipelines.  In  1998,  Con-
gress  approved  legislation  to  encourage  improvements  in  state 
damage  prevention  programs.  The  1998  legislation  accomplished  a 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00036 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

33 

great  deal  with  respect  to  improving  these  programs,  but  we  be-
lieve the time has come to take things to the next level. We suggest 
the  development  of  national  standards,  including  enforcement,  for 
state  One-Call  programs.  INGAA  supports  the  damage-prevention 
provisions in S. 3961, and believes these efforts would result in the 
reduction of serious incidents. 

My  written  testimony  includes  comments  on  several  additional 
issues,  but  at  this  point  I  would  like  to  conclude  my  remarks. 
Thank you, Mr. Chairman, for giving me the opportunity to testify 
before the Committee. I’d be happy to answer your questions. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Boss follows:] 
PREPARED STATEMENT OF TERRY BOSS, SENIOR VICE PRESIDENT, ENVIRONMENT, 
SAFETY AND OPERATIONS, INTERSTATE NATURAL GAS ASSOCIATION OF AMERICA 
Mr. Chairman and members of the Committee: 
Good  morning.  My  name  is  Terry  Boss,  and  I  am  Senior  Vice  President  of  Envi-
ronment, Safety and Operations for the Interstate Natural Gas Association of Amer-
ica (INGAA). INGAA represents the interstate and inter-provincial natural gas pipe-
line industry in North America. INGAA’s members transport over 90 percent of the 
natural  gas  consumed  in  the  United  States  through  a  network  of  approximately 
212,000 miles of transmission pipeline. These large capacity pipelines spanning mul-
tiple states or regions are analogous to the interstate highway system. 
Industry Background 

Mr.  Chairman,  natural  gas  provides  25  percent  of  the  energy  consumed  in  the 
U.S. annually, second only to petroleum and exceeding that of coal or nuclear. From 
home heating and cooking, to industrial processes, to power generation, natural gas 
is a versatile and strategically important energy resource. 

As  a  result  of  the  regulatory  restructuring  of  the  industry  during  the  1980s  and 
early 1990s, interstate natural gas pipelines no longer buy or sell natural gas. Inter-
state  pipelines  do  not  take  title  to  the  natural  gas  moving  through  their  pipelines. 
Instead,  pipeline  companies  sell  transportation  capacity  in  much  the  same  way  as 
a railroad, airline or trucking company. 

Because  the  natural  gas  pipeline  network  is  essentially  a  ‘‘just-in-time’’  delivery 
system with limited storage capacity, customers large and small depend on reliable 
around-the-clock service. That is an important reason why the safe and reliable op-
eration  of  our  pipeline  systems  is  so  important.  The  natural  gas  transmission  pipe-
lines operated by INGAA’s members and by others historically have been the safest 
mode of transportation in the United States. The interstate pipeline industry, work-
ing cooperatively with the Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration 
(PHMSA),  is  taking  affirmative  steps  to  make  this  valuable  infrastructure  even 
safer. 

Congressional involvement in pipeline safety dates back almost 40 years to enact-
ment  of  the  Natural  Gas  Pipeline  Safety  Act  in  1968.  This  legislation  borrowed 
heavily  from  the  engineering  standards  that  had  been  developed  over  the  previous 
decades.  The  goals  of  this  Federal  legislation  were  to  ensure  the  consistent  use  of 
best  practices  for  pipeline  safety  across  the  entire  industry,  to  encourage  continual 
improvement in safety procedures and to verify compliance. While subsequent reau-
thorization bills have improved upon the original, the core objectives of the Federal 
pipeline safety law have remained a constant. 
How Safe Are Natural Gas Pipelines? 

While  the  safety  record  of  natural  gas  transmission  lines  is  not  perfect,  it  com-
pares  very  well  with  that  of  other  modes  of  transportation.  Since  natural  gas  pipe-
lines  are  buried  and  isolated  from  the  public,  pipeline  accidents  involving  fatalities 
and injuries are unusual. 

Pipeline  accidents  generally  are  reported  to  the  Department  of  Transportation 
when one of three things occurs: (1) a fatality, (2) an injury, or (3) $50,000 or more 
in  property  damage.  Recently,  the  Department  of  Transportation  has  categorized 
most ‘‘reportable incidents’’ either as ‘‘significant incidents’’ or as ‘‘serious incidents’’ 
and placed that data on its website. 

‘‘Serious  incidents’’  are  defined  as  incidents  that  involve  fatalities  and  injuries. 
The  PHMSA  graph  below  shows  the  decreasing  trend  of  ‘‘serious  incidents’’  on  nat-
ural  gas  transmission  pipelines  from  1989–2005.  For  the  last  5  years,  the  number 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00037 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

of  serious  incidents  that  occurred  on  natural  gas  transmission  pipelines  has  aver-
aged five incidents per year. 

34 

It is instructive to look at the causes of these serious incidents for clues on where 
to  devote  resources  that  can  prevent  serious  incidents  in  the  future.  The  pie  chart 
below depicts the causes of these serious incidents. Since 2002, all the fatalities that 
have occurred during ‘‘serious incidents’’ on natural gas transmission pipelines have 
been excavation-related. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00038 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
2
s
s
o
b

s
p
e

.

1
s
s
o
b

35 

‘‘Significant  incidents’’  include  not  only  the  aforementioned  ‘‘serious  incidents,’’ 
but  also  reportable  incidents  where  property  damage  and  gas  lost  exceeds  $50,000 
in  1984  dollars.  Property  damage  and  natural  gas  cost  are  adjusted  using  the  Con-
sumer Price Index for property damage and the Energy Information Administration 
data for delivered gas cost. The PHMSA graph below shows the trend of ‘‘significant 
incidents’’ on natural gas transmission pipelines since 1989. It is worth noting that 
the  spike  in  ‘‘significant  incidents’’  reported  in  2005  reflects  the  pipeline  damage 
caused  by  hurricanes  Rita  and  Katrina.  Property  damage  jumped  from  an  average 
of  $40  million  a  year  (2005  dollars)  to  over  $220  million  in  2005.  It  is  interesting 
to  note  that  over  75  percent  of  these  property  damage  costs  associated  with  gas 
transmission pipeline incidents are either damage to the pipeline operator’s facilities 
or the value of the natural gas lost (i.e., these are not damages to third-party prop-
erty). 

As  with  the  serious  incidents,  it  is  informative  to  understand  the  causes  of  these 
significant  incidents  so  that  technology  and  management  practices  can  be  focused 
on  preventing  future  incidents.  For  example,  periodic  inspections  using  smart  pig 
technology  are  effective  at  discovering  ‘‘time  dependent’’  defects,  such  as  corrosion, 
before they result in significant incidents. Periodic inspections, however, are not ef-
fective in preventing ‘‘time independent’’ incidents such as external force (i.e., exca-
vation  and  weather-related  damage).  The  pie  chart  below  depicts  the  causes  of  the 
reported significant incidents. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00039 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

s
p
e
.
4
s
s
o
b

s
p
e

.

3
s
s
o
b

36 

One  note  on  the  reportable  incident  statistics.  From  the  raw  data  on  reportable 
natural gas transmission accidents over the last 10 years, it could be concluded that 
the safety of natural gas transmission pipelines has deteriorated, especially over the 
last 6 years. This conclusion would be misleading, however, because the increase in 
the commodity value of natural gas has skewed the number of reportable incidents. 
As noted earlier, ‘‘reportable incidents’’ include those in which property damage ex-
ceeds  $50,000  including  the  value  of  the  natural  gas  lost  in  the  incident.  Natural 
gas  commodity  prices  have  increased  by  over  200  percent  since  2000,  and  this  has 
significantly  affected  the  number  of  incidents  where  property  damage  has  exceeded 
the $50,000 threshold. In examining the natural gas transmission integrity manage-
ment program, the Government Accountability Office (GAO) noted this anomaly (in 
report  06–946)  and  suggested  that  DOT  amend  the  reporting  criteria  to  eliminate 
the linkage to natural gas commodity prices. While the establishment of the signifi-
cant and serious incidents categories by PHMSA accurately depicts incident trends, 
INGAA  agrees  that  the  recommendation  by  GAO  would  provide  more  accurate  and 
useful accident data. 
The Pipeline Safety Improvement Act of 2002 and Integrity Management 

While  the  Pipeline  Safety  Improvement  Act  of  2002  (PSIA)  focused  on  a  variety 
of  issues  (including  operator  qualification  programs,  public  education,  and  popu-
lation encroachment on pipeline rights-of-way), the most significant provision of the 
2002 reauthorization law that would improve long-term pipeline safety was the ‘‘In-
tegrity Management Program’’ (IMP) for natural gas transmission pipelines. 

Section  14  of  the  PSIA  requires  operators  of  natural  gas  transmission  pipelines 
to:  (1)  identify  all  the  segments  of  their  pipelines  located  in  ‘‘high  consequence 
areas’’  (areas  adjacent  to  significant  population);  (2)  develop  an  integrity  manage-
ment program to reduce the risks to the public in these high consequence areas; (3) 
undertake  baseline  integrity  assessments  (inspections)  at  all  pipeline  segments  lo-
cated  in  high  consequence  areas,  to  be  completed  within  10  years  of  enactment;  (4) 
develop  a  process  for  making  repairs  to  any  anomalies  found  as  a  result  of  these 
inspections; and (5) reassess these segments of pipeline at least every 7 years there-
after in order to verify continued pipe integrity. 

The PSIA requires that these integrity inspections be performed by one of the fol-
lowing  methods:  (1)  an  internal  inspection  device  (or  a  ‘‘smart  pig’’);  (2)  hydrostatic 
pressure testing (filling the pipe with water and pressurizing it well above operating 
pressures  to  verify  a  safety  margin);  (3)  direct  assessment  (digging  up  and  visually 
inspecting  sections  of  pipe  selected  based  on  various  electronic  measurements  and 
other characteristics); or (4) ‘‘other alternative methods that the Secretary of Trans-
portation determines would provide an equal or greater level of safety.’’ The pipeline 
operator is required by regulations implementing the 2002 law to repair all non-in-
nocuous  imperfections  and  adjust  operation  and  maintenance  practices  to  minimize 
‘‘reportable  incidents.’’  For  natural  gas  transmission  pipelines,  internal  inspection 
devices  are  the  primary  means  for  assessing  integrity  because,  when  they  can  be 
used,  such  devices  are  more  versatile  and  efficient.  The  other  assessment  methods 
enumerated in the reauthorization law are useful when smart pig technology cannot 
be  effectively  used.  A  drawback  associated  with  such  alternatives  is  that  they  re-
quire a pipeline to cease or significantly curtail gas delivery operations for a period. 
There are some practical issues that must be addressed in order to utilize ‘‘smart 

pig’’ inspection devices more fully: 

• First,  older  pipelines  were  not  engineered  to  accept  such  inspection  devices  be-
cause these pipelines often were built with tight pipe bends, or non-full pipe di-
ameter valves, continuous sections of pipe with varying diameters, and side lat-
eral  piping.  While  these  features  do  not  impede  the  movement  of  natural  gas 
through  the  pipeline  (because  natural  gas  can  be  compressed),  moving  a  solid 
object  through  such  pipelines  is  another  matter.  These  older  pipeline  systems 
must be modified to allow the use of internal inspection devices. 

• Another  legacy  issue  is  modifying  pipelines  to  launch  and  receive  internal  in-
spection  devices.  Since  a  pipeline  is  buried  underground  for  virtually  its  entire 
length,  the  installation  of  above-ground  pig  launchers  and  receivers  is  usually 
done  at  or  near  other  above-ground  locations,  such  as  compressor  stations.  Oc-
casionally, however, new sites must be obtained for these facilities. Compressor 
stations  are  typically  located  along  the  pipeline  at  a  spacing  of  75  to  100  miles 
apart.  Therefore,  a  set  of  launchers  and  receivers  must  be  installed  for  every 
pipeline  segment  between  compressor  stations  because  the  inspection  device 
cannot  go  through  a  compressor.  Once  installed,  these  launchers  and  receivers 
can usually remain in place permanently. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00040 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

37 

Surveys  conducted  by  our  industry  about  5  years  ago  suggested  that  almost  one- 
third  of  transmission  pipeline  mileage  could  immediately  accommodate  smart  pigs, 
another  one-quarter  could  accommodate  smart  pigs  with  the  addition  of  permanent 
or  temporary  launching  and  receiving  facilities,  and  the  remainder,  about  40–45 
percent,  would  either  require  extensive  modifications  or  never  be  able  to  accommo-
date  smart  pigs  due  to  the  physical  or  operational  characteristics  of  the  pipeline. 
Scheduling  these  extensive  modifications  to  minimize  consumer  delivery  impacts 
has been one of the most challenging aspects of the integrity management program. 
The natural gas pipeline industry will use hydrostatic pressure testing and direct 
assessment for segments of transmission pipeline that cannot be modified to accom-
modate smart pigs, or in other special circumstances. There are issues worth noting 
with both hydrostatic testing and direct assessment. In the case of hydrostatic test-
ing, an entire section of pipeline must be taken out of service for an extended period 
of time, limiting the ability to deliver gas to downstream customers and potentially 
causing  market  disruptions  as  a  result.  In  addition,  hydrostatic  testing—filling  a 
pipeline  up  with  water  at  great  pressure  to  see  if  the  pipe  fails—is  a  destructive 
or  ‘‘go—no  go’’  testing  method  that  must  take  into  account  pipeline  characteristics 
so that it does not exacerbate some conditions while resolving others. Also, because 
of  this  ‘‘go—no  go’’  nature,  testing  must  go  on  continuously  until  the  segment  suc-
cessfully completes the test, generally 8 hours at pressure, with no leaks or failures. 
Direct  assessment  is  generally  defined  as  an  inspection  method  whereby  statis-
tically  chosen  sections  of  pipe  are  excavated  and  visually  inspected  at  certain  dis-
tance intervals along the pipeline right-of-way based on sophisticated above ground 
electrical  survey  measurements  that  predict  problem  areas.  The  amount  of  exca-
vation  and  subsequent  disturbance  of  landowner’s  property  involved  with  this  tech-
nology  is  significant  and  does  not  decrease  with  future  reassessments.  Disturbing 
other  infrastructure,  including  roads  and  other  utilities,  also  creates  a  risk  and  an 
inconvenience for the public. 

Finally, while the pipeline modifications and inspection activity generally can fol-
low a pre-arranged schedule, repair work is an unpredictable factor. A pipeline oper-
ator does not know ahead of time how many anomalies an inspection will find, how 
severe  such  anomalies  will  be,  and  how  quickly  they  must  be  repaired.  Only  the 
completed inspection data can provide such information. Repair work often requires 
systems  to  be  shut  down  even  if  the  original  inspection  work  did  not  effect  system 
operations.  The  unpredictable  nature  of  repair  work  must  be  kept  in  mind,  espe-
cially during the baseline inspection period, when it can be expected the number of 
required repairs to be the greatest. 
Integrity Management Progress to Date 

The  integrity  management  program  mandated  by  the  PSIA  is  performing  very 
well.  The  program  is  doing  what  Congress  intended;  that  is,  verifying  the  safety  of 
gas transmission pipelines located in populated areas and identifying and removing 
potential  problems  before  they  occur.  Based  on  2  years  of  data,  the  trend  is  that 
natural gas transmission pipelines are safe and becoming safer. 

PHMSA  immediately  initiated  a  rulemaking  to  implement  the  gas  integrity  re-
quirements  upon  enactment  of  PSIA  in  December  of  2002.  The  Administration  suc-
cessfully  met  the  one-year  deadline  set  by  the  law  for  issuing  a  final  IMP  rule. 
Therefore,  2004  was  the  first  full  year  of  what  will  end  up  being  a  nine-year  base-
line  testing  period  (the  statute  mandates  that  baseline  tests  on  all  pipeline  seg-
ments  in  high  consequence  areas  must  be  completed  by  December  of  2012). 
PHMSA’s  final  rule  credits  pipeline  companies  for  some  integrity  assessments  com-
pleted before the rule took effect, thereby mitigating the effects of the shorter base-
line period. 

PHMSA has summarized the progress achieved through 2005 as follows: 

1.  Total  Gas  Transmission  Mileage  in  the  United  States—There  are  295,665 
miles of gas transmission pipeline in the U.S. (INGAA’s members own approxi-
mately  200,000  miles  of  this  total,  with  the  remainder  being  owned  by 
intrastate transmission systems or local distribution companies.) 
2.  Total  High  Consequence  Area  (HCA)  Mileage—There  are  20,191  miles  of 
pipeline  in  HCAs  (i.e.,  mileage  subject  to  gas  integrity  rule).  This  represents 
about 7 percent of total mileage. 
3. HCA Pipeline Miles Inspected through 2005— 

• 2004—3,979  miles  (incorporated  some  prior  inspections  before  rule  took  ef-
fect). 
• 2005—2,744 miles. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00041 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

38 

• Therefore,  6,723  miles  of  HCA  pipeline  inspected  to  date,  or  33  percent  of 
total. 

4. Total Pipeline Miles Inspected (including non-HCA pipeline)— 

• 2004—30,452 miles (7.65 to 1 over-test ratio). 
• 2005—19,884 miles (7.24 to 1 over-test ratio). 
• Therefore,  50,366  total  miles,  or  approximately  17  percent  of  total  trans-
mission pipeline mileage. 

The  total  HCA  pipeline  mileage  inspected  to  date  suggests  that  the  industry  is 
generally  on  track  to  meet  the  10-year  baseline  requirement.  With  3  years  of  the 
baseline period completed at the end of 2005, about 30 percent of the HCA mileage 
had  been  inspected.  This  translates  into  10  percent  being  completed  annually—ex-
actly the volume of work needed in order to meet the baseline requirement. 

The  2002  law  also  required  a  risk-based  prioritization  of  these  HCA  assessments 
so  that  higher-ranking  HCA  pipeline  segments  would  be  scheduled  for  assessment 
within  5  years  of  enactment.  This  means  that  by  December  of  2007,  the  industry 
must  complete  at  least  half  of  the  total  HCA  assessments,  by  mileage;  and  that 
work  contains  the  segments  with  the  highest  probability  of  failure.  Again,  we  ap-
pear to be on track for meeting this requirement. 

The mileage counted as being assessed in 2004 is higher than what we anticipate 
will be the average annual mileage going forward because the industry was able to 
include  some  HCA  segments  that  had  been  inspected  in  the  few  years  immediately 
prior  to  the  rule  taking  effect.  As  mentioned,  this  jump-started  the  program  and 
compensated  some  for  the  fact  that  the  final  IMP  rule  did  not  take  effect  until  De-
cember of 2003, thus reducing the de facto baseline period to 9 years. 

The  vast  majority  of  the  assessments  to  date  have  been  completed  using  smart 
pig  devices.  As  discussed,  these  devices  can  only  operate  across  large  segments  of 
pipeline—typically between two compressor stations. A 100-mile segment of pipeline 
may,  for  example,  only  contain  5  miles  of  HCA,  but  in  order  to  assess  that  5  miles 
of HCA, the entire 100-mile segment between compressor stations must be assessed. 
This  dynamic  is  resulting  in  a  large  amount  of  ‘‘over-testing’’  on  gas  transmission 
systems.  While  it  has  completed  assessments  on  6,723  miles  of  HCA  pipe  thus  far, 
the  industry  actually  has  inspected  over  50,000  miles  of  pipe  up  through  2005  in 
order  to  capture  the  HCA  segments.  Any  problems  identified  as  a  result  of  inspec-
tions, whether in an HCA or not, are repaired. 

In summary, while only about 7 percent of total gas transmission pipeline mileage 
is  located  in  HCAs,  it  is  anticipated  that,  due  to  over-testing  situations,  about  55 
to  60  percent  of  total  transmission  mileage  actually  will  be  inspected  during  the 
baseline period. 

In  addition,  PHMSA  has  made  the  data  available  for  the  first  half  of  the  2006. 
This shows that an additional 1,885 miles of natural gas transmission line in HCAs 
were inspected during this period, keeping the program on track to meet its target. 
Now  let  us  look  at  what  the  integrity  inspections  have  found  through  2005.  This 
data  focuses  on  information  from  HCA  segments  since  these  segments  are  the  only 
ones specifically covered under the integrity management program. 

1. Reportable Incidents in HCAs (in 20,191 miles) 

• 2004—9 (2 time-dependent). 
• 2005—10 (0 time-dependent). 

2. Leaks (too small to be classified as a reportable incident) in HCAs (in 20,191 
miles) 

• 2004—117 (29 time-dependent). 
• 2005—104 (20 time-dependent). 

3. Immediate Repairs in HCAs Found by Inspections (repair within 5 days) 

• 2004—101 (3,979 miles inspected). 
• 2005—237 (2,744 miles inspected). 

4.  Scheduled  Repairs  in  HCAs  Found  by  Inspections  (repair  generally  within  1 
year) 

• 2004—595 (3,979 miles inspected). 
• 2005—403 (2,744 miles inspected). 

Time-dependent  defects  are  separated  out  in  the  data  for  incidents  and  leaks  be-
cause these types of defects are the prime target of reassessment under the integrity 
management program. By time-dependent, we mean problems with the pipeline that 
develop  and  grow  over  time  and,  therefore,  can  be  managed  by  reinspecting  on  a 
periodic basis. The most prevalent time-dependent defect is corrosion; therefore, the 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00042 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

39 

IMP  effort  focuses  most  intently  on  corrosion  identification  and  mitigation.  These 
same assessments might also be able to identify other pipeline defects such as origi-
nal  construction  defects  or  excavation  damage.  Original  construction  defects  (stable 
defects)  are  usually  found  and  addressed  during  post-construction  inspections;  any 
construction defects found with this new, more sensitive inspection technology would 
be  fixed  ‘‘for  good’’  so  that  future  assessments  looking  for  these  types  of  anomalies 
will  be  unnecessary.  Most  reportable  incidents  caused  by  excavation  damage  (more 
than 85 percent of the incidents in these HCA areas during this time period) result 
in an immediate pipeline failure, so periodic assessments are unlikely to reduce the 
number of these types of time-independent incidents in any significant way. Periodic 
assessments on a reasonable schedule are, therefore, most effective for time-depend-
ent defects. 

The  number  of  incidents  associated  with  time-dependent  defects  in  HCA  areas  is 
fairly low, and these reportable incidents (e.g., one reportable incident per year aver-
age)  have  occurred  in  HCA  areas  not  yet  assessed  under  this  program.  As  critical 
time-dependent  defects  are  found  and  repaired,  these  incident  and  leak  numbers 
should  approach  zero  since  the  gestation  period  for  these  defects  is  significantly 
longer than the reassessment interval. 

As for repairs, we have identified the number of ‘‘immediate’’ and ‘‘scheduled’’ re-
pairs  that  have  been  generated  by  the  IMP  inspections  through  2005.  These  are 
anomalies  in  pipelines  that  have  not  resulted  in  a  reportable  incident  or  leak  but 
are  repaired  as  a  precautionary  measure.  ‘‘Immediate  repairs’’  and  ‘‘scheduled  re-
pairs’’ are defined terms under both PHMSA regulations and engineering standards. 
As  the  name  suggests,  immediate  repairs  require  immediate  action  by  the  operator 
due  to  the  higher  probability  of  a  reportable  incident  or  leak  in  the  future.  Sched-
uled  repair  situations  are  those  that  require  repair  within  a  longer  time  period  be-
cause of their lower probability of failure. 

Even though it is early in the baseline assessment period, the data suggest a very 
positive  conclusion  regarding  present  state  of  the  gas  transmission  pipeline  system 
and  the  effectiveness  of  the  integrity  management  programs.  ‘‘Immediate  repairs’’ 
in HCAs removed 50 anomalies for every 1,000 pipeline miles inspected. ‘‘Scheduled 
repairs’’  removed  an  additional  140  anomalies  per  1,000  miles  inspected.  By  com-
pleting  these  immediate  and  scheduled  repairs  in  a  timely  fashion,  the  pipeline  in-
dustry  is  reducing  the  possibility  of  future  reportable  incidents  or  leaks.  Also,  data 
from  operators  who  have  completed  more  than  one  such  periodic  assessment  over 
a  number  of  years  strongly  suggests  there  will  be  a  dramatic  decrease  in  time-de-
pendent defects requiring repairs the second time around. 

For  the  inspections  that  have  occurred  during  the  first  half  of  2006,  the  trend  is 
continuing  with  removing  38  ‘‘immediate’’  anomalies  and  50  ‘‘scheduled’’  anomalies 
for every 1,000 miles inspected. 

Many of the gas pipelines being inspected under this program are 50 to 60 years 
old. While is it often hard for non-engineers to accept, well-maintained pipelines can 
operate  safely  for  many  decades.  Policymakers  often  compare  pipelines  to  vehicles 
and  ask  questions  such  as:  Would  you  fly  in  a  50-year-old  airplane?  From  an  engi-
neering  standpoint,  the  comparison  to  aircraft  or  automobiles  is  an  unsound  one. 
Natural  gas  pipelines  are  built  to  be  robust  and  are  not  subject  to  the  same  oper-
ational stresses as vehicles. Much of the above inspection data comes from pipelines 
that  were  built  in  the  1940s  and  1950s.  And  yet,  the  number  of  anomalies  found 
on  a  per-mile  basis  is  low.  Once  these  anomalies  are  repaired,  the  ‘‘clock  can  be 
reset’’  and  these  pipelines  can  operate  safely  and  reliably  for  many  additional  dec-
ades. One important benefit of the integrity management program is the verification 
and  re-establishment  of  the  known  safety  factors  on  these  older  pipeline  systems. 
Issues for the 2006 Reauthorization 

The  PSIA  authorized  the  Federal  pipeline  safety  program  at  the  Department  of 
Transportation  through  Fiscal  Year  2006,  and  it  has,  therefore,  expired.  INGAA 
would  like  the  Committee  to  consider  amendments  addressing  three  issues  in  the 
pipeline safety law. Each of these would achieve an evolutionary change in the cur-
rent pipeline safety program: (1) reconsideration of the seven-year reassessment in-
terval,  to  one  based  instead  upon  a  more  reasoned,  data-driven  and  scientific  ap-
proach;  (2)  improvements  in  state  excavation  damage  prevention  programs;  and  (3) 
change in the jurisdictional status for direct sales lateral lines. 
Seven-Year Reassessment Interval 

Under  the  PSIA,  gas  transmission  pipeline  operators  have  10  years  in  which  to 
conduct  baseline  integrity  assessments  on  all  pipeline  segments  located  in  HCAs. 
Operators  are  also  required  by  law  to  begin  reassessing  previously-inspected  pipe 
7  years  after  the  initial  baseline  and  every  7  years  thereafter.  PHMSA  has  inter-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00043 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

40 

preted  these  two  requirements  to  mean  that,  for  those  segments  baseline-inspected 
in 2003 through 2005 (including those for which a prior assessment is relied upon), 
reassessments  must  be  done  in  years  2010  through  2012—even  though  baseline  in-
spections are still being conducted. 

In 2001, INGAA provided Congress with a proposed industry consensus standard 
on  reassessment  intervals  that  had  been  developed  by  the  American  Society  of  Me-
chanical Engineers (ASME). The ASME standard used several criteria to determine 
a reassessment interval for a particular segment of pipe, such as the operating pres-
sure of a pipe relative to its strength and the type of inspection technique used. This 
standard relied upon authoritative technical analyses and a ‘‘decision matrix’’ based 
on more than 50 years of operational and performance data for gas pipelines. 

For  most  natural  gas  transmission  pipelines  (operating  at  high  pressures),  the 
ASME  standard  proposed  a  conservative  10-year  reassessment  interval.  The  stand-
ard  suggested  longer  inspection  intervals  for  lower  pressure  lines  (a  small  number 
of  pipelines  that  are  lower  in  risk  due  to  their  lower  operating  pressures).  The 
standard also suggested shorter intervals for pipeline segments operating in higher- 
risk  environments,  including  those  where  unusually  aggressive  corrosion  would  be 
more  likely  to  occur.  Recent  and  past  pipeline  inspection  data  confirms  that  the 
ASME criteria are conservative. 

There are several reasons for being concerned about whether the seven-year reas-
sessment interval is appropriate. First, there is the ‘‘overlap’’ in years 2010 through 
2012.  The  ability  to  meet  the  required  volume  of  inspections  is  daunting  given  the 
limited  number  of  inspection  contractors  and  equipment  available.  In  addition,  this 
stepped-up level of inspection activity would be difficult to accommodate without ef-
fecting  gas  system  deliverability.  This  last  point  is  critical.  Some  assume  that  we 
are  focusing  on  the  re-assessment  interval  only  because  of  the  costs  to  industry.  In 
fact,  our  costs  will  be  modest  compared  to  the  potential  costs  to  consumers  in  the 
form  of  higher  natural  gas  commodity  prices  if  pipeline  capacity  becomes  too  con-
strained. Some regions of the country can handle more frequent reductions in pipe-
line deliverability due to the volume of pipeline capacity serving those regions. The 
Chicago  region  and  the  Gulf  Coast,  for  example,  are  better  equipped  to  handle  fre-
quent  pipeline  capacity  interruptions  due  to  the  abundance  of  pipeline  capacity  in 
those  regions.  Other  regions,  such  as  the  Northeast  and  Southern  California,  face 
greater risk that gas commodity prices will spike if pipeline capacity is reduced too 
often.  These  downstream  market  effects  should  be  carefully  considered,  especially 
during  the  baseline  inspection  period  when  pipeline  modifications  (to  accommodate 
inspection equipment), inspections, and repair work will all be at peak levels. 

Some also suggest that if the pipeline industry is technically capable of inspecting 
its lines for corrosion more frequently than engineering standards suggest, it should 
do  so  and  not  worry  about  the  costs  or  the  logistics.  It  is  certainly  true  that  large 
interstate  pipelines  could,  in  fact,  be  inspected  more  frequently  than  every  7  years, 
especially  once  systems  have  been  modified  to  accommodate  smart  pig  devices.  But 
just  because  pipelines  can  be  inspected  more  often  does  not  mean  it  is  rational  to 
require  a  one-size-fits-all  inspection  policy.  Most  automobile  manufacturers  rec-
ommend vehicle oil changes every 3,000 miles. Congress could instead mandate that 
all vehicles have oil changes every 1,000 miles, but, of course, there would be little, 
if any, additional benefit to the more frequent oil changes, and the costs associated 
with the more frequent oil changes would take money away from other, more bene-
ficial maintenance activities. 

The  integrity  management  program  requires  that  the  industry  identify  and  miti-
gate risks to the public associated with operating our pipelines. Inspections are but 
one  tool  to  achieve  that  end  and  they  do  not  accomplish  all  of  the  required  goals 
of  the  program.  The  inspections  carried  out  pursuant  to  the  integrity  management 
program  focus  primarily  on  one  cause  of  pipeline  accidents—corrosion.  Corrosion 
causes  about  25  percent  of  the  failures  on  gas  transmission  lines.  What  about  the 
other  75  percent  of  accidents?  What  can  be  done  to  mitigate  the  risks  of  those?  A 
credible  and  effective  integrity  management  program  prioritizes  risks  and  develops 
strategies  for  addressing  all  risks.  A  program  that  mandates  system-wide  inspec-
tions  too  frequently  can  seriously  affect  an  operator’s  ability  to  perform  even  more 
frequent inspections at the very few locations that may warrant shorter time-frames 
and  may  detract  from  other  important  integrity  activities  such  as  damage  preven-
tion.  Focusing  attention  and  resources  on  unnecessarily  frequent  inspections  may 
also lead to a false sense of security that such inspections are addressing all signifi-
cant threats to pipeline safety. 

We  recognize  that  some  lawmakers  may  be  hesitant  to  change  to  the  seven-year 
reassessment  interval  given  the  debate  on  this  issue  in  2002.  The  authors  of  the 
PSIA realized this discussion would be ongoing and requested that the Government 
Accountability Office (GAO) review this issue. GAO has completed its report (Report 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00044 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

41 

06–945)  and  has  concluded  that  the  fixed  re-inspection  interval  (i.e.,  7  years)  is  too 
conservative  for  the  majority  of  the  natural  gas  transmission  pipelines  and,  there-
fore, has recommended intervals be based on risk and engineering analysis. INGAA 
concurs  with  the  GAO  recommendation.  The  baseline  assessments  already  under-
way are yielding valuable information from which to make reasoned decisions about 
re-assessment  intervals  going  forward.  INGAA  therefore  urges  the  Congress  to  ad-
dress  the  reassessment  issue  in  this  reauthorization  bill.  As  the  GAO  stated  in  its 
report, there is no compelling reason to wait and address this issue at a later time— 
the facts already support a risk-based program of re-assessments. 
Damage Prevention 

In  1998,  the  Transportation  Equity  Act  for  the  21st  Century  (TEA–21)  highway 
legislation  included  a  relatively  modest  program  called  the  ‘‘One-Call  Notification 
Act.’’  The  goal  of  this  legislation  was  to  improve  the  quality  and  effectiveness  of 
state  one-call  (or  ‘‘call-before-you-dig’’)  damage  prevention  programs.  By  developing 
Federal minimum standards and then giving grants to those states that adopted the 
minimum  standards,  this  law  contributed  to  improving  damage  prevention  efforts 
all across the Nation. And it did so without mandating that states adopt the Federal 
minimum standards. 

Over the last 8 years, there has been a great deal of improvement in damage pre-
vention.  INGAA  believes  that  the  time  has  come  to  take  these  efforts  to  the  next 
level. Excavation damage prevention has been, and should remain, a major focus for 
pipeline  safety.  On  gas  transmission  pipelines,  accidental  damage  from  excavation 
equipment  is  the  leading  cause  of  fatalities  and  injuries.  The  majority  of  incidents 
that  have  raised  public  and  Congressional  concern  have  been  due  to  excavation 
damage. These accidents are the most preventable of all, and better communication 
between  pipeline  companies,  excavators  and  the  public  is  the  key  to  such  accident 
prevention. Despite all the progress that has been made since 1998, some excavators 
still do not call before they dig. 

Unfortunately,  there  was  a  fatal  accident  involving  excavation  damage  to  one  of 
our  member  company  pipelines  just  last  week  in  Wyoming.  While  the  investigation 
is  still  in  progress,  it  is  not  unreasonable  to  assume  that  there  was  at  least  some 
level  of  misunderstanding  between  the  excavator  and  the  pipeline  operator.  With 
the  right  level  of  communication  and  understanding,  however,  these  accidents  are 
avoidable. 

One  state,  in  particular,  has  developed  an  outstanding  damage  prevention  pro-
gram  based  on  improved  communication,  information  management,  and  perform-
ance monitoring and enforcement. That state is Virginia. Not only does Virginia re-
quire  broad  participation  by  all  utilities  and  excavators,  but  also  it  has  effective 
public  education  programs  and  effective  enforcement  of  its  rules.  INGAA  believes 
that  effective  enforcement  is  the  most  important  element  to  improving  state  pro-
grams  beyond  the  progress  already  made,  and  we  believe  Virginia  offers  a  model 
for  other  states  to  adopt.  Statistics  demonstrate  the  success  of  the  Virginia  pro-
gram—the  state  has  experienced  a  50  percent  decrease  in  the  excavation  damage 
since implementing its program. 

For  2006,  INGAA  asks  the  Congress  to  emphasize  once  again  the  importance  of 
excavation  damage  prevention  by  including  a  new  program  of  incentives  for  state 
action.  A  modest  amount  of  focused  grant  funds  could  go  a  long  way  to  encourage 
states  to  improve  the  content  and  enforcement  of  their  damage  prevention  pro-
grams. 
Safety Regulation of Direct Sales Laterals 

One of the goals of the original Pipeline Safety Act enacted in 1968 was to estab-
lish a clear line of demarcation between Federal and state authority to enforce pipe-
line safety regulations. Prior to 1968, many states had established their own safety 
requirements  for  interstate  natural  gas  pipelines,  and  there  was  no  particular  con-
sistency in such regulations across the states. This created compliance problems for 
interstate  pipeline  operators  whose  facilities  crossed  multiple  states.  The  Pipeline 
Safety Act resolved this conflict by investing the U.S. Department of Transportation 
with  exclusive  jurisdiction  over  interstate  pipeline  safety  while  delegating  to  the 
states  authority  to  regulate  intrastate  pipeline  systems  (generally,  pipelines  whose 
facilities are wholly within a single state). 

The  statutory  definition  of  an  ‘‘interstate  gas  pipeline  facility’’  subject  to  Federal 
regulation was clarified further when the Congress reauthorized the Pipeline Safety 
Act in 1976 (Pub. L. 94–477). As part of this clarification, the Congress stated that 
‘‘direct  sales’’  lateral  pipelines  were  not  subject  to  Federal  jurisdiction.  Direct  sales 
laterals are typically smaller-diameter pipelines that connect a large-diameter inter-
state  transmission  pipeline  to  a  single,  large  end-use  customer,  such  as  a  power 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00045 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

42 

plant or a factory. Such direct sales laterals often are owned and maintained by the 
interstate transmission pipeline operator to which they are connected. 

This  clarification  was  made  necessary  by  a  1972  U.S.  Supreme  Court  decision 
(Federal  Power  Commission  v.  Louisiana  Power  and  Light,  406  U.S.  621)  in  which 
the Court ruled that for purposes of economic regulation (i.e., rate regulation), direct 
sales  laterals  were  subject  to  preemptive  Federal  jurisdiction.  This  ruling  created 
uncertainty regarding the authority to regulate the safety of direct sales laterals be-
cause  when  the  Pipeline  Safety  Act  was  enacted  in  1968,  it  was  assumed  by  the 
Congress  that  such  pipelines  would  be  subject  to  both  economic  and  safety  regula-
tion at the state level. 

While  this  exemption  from  Federal  jurisdiction  may  have  made  sense  30  years 
ago,  it  now  is  an  anachronism.  As  mentioned,  many  of  these  direct  sales  laterals 
are owned and operated by interstate pipelines. The natural gas transported in such 
lines  travels  in  interstate  commerce,  and  the  lateral  lines  are  extensions  of  the 
interstate pipelines to which they are interconnected. 

Additionally, interstate natural gas pipelines are now subject to the PHMSA’s Gas 
Integrity  Management  Program  and  are  required  to  undergo  a  specific  regimen  of 
Congressionally-mandated  inspections  and  safety  verification.  State-regulated  pipe-
lines are not covered under the Federal program. Instead, states are allowed to cre-
ate  their  own  safety  programs,  which  may  have  different  processes/procedures  cov-
ered  than  the  Federal  integrity  management  program.  Given  the  comprehensive 
Federal  program,  there  is  no  particular  reason  for  small  segments  of  the  interstate 
pipeline  system  to  be  subject  to  differing  and  potentially  inconsistent  regulation  at 
the  state  level.  The  inefficiency  of  this  approach  is  further  compounded  by  the  fact 
that an interstate pipeline operator with direct sales laterals in multiple states like-
ly  will  be  subject  to  inconsistent  regulation  across  the  states.  It  is  therefore  under-
standable  that  interstate  pipelines  wish  to  have  their  direct  sales  laterals  subject 
to the same Federal integrity management requirements as mainline facilities. This 
would  ensure  a  consistent  and  rational  approach  to  integrity  management  system- 
wide, in contrast to being compelled to exclude parts of the pipeline network on the 
basis of an outdated set of definitions. 

INGAA  supports  amending  the  definitions  of  ‘‘interstate  gas  pipeline  facilities’’ 
and  ‘‘intrastate  gas  pipeline  facilities’’  in  the  Pipeline  Safety  Act  to  eliminate  the 
jurisdictional  distinction  between  direct  sales  laterals  and  other  segments  of  an  op-
erator’s  interstate  natural  gas  pipeline  system.  This  would  make  such  segments  of 
pipeline subject to Federal safety regulation consistent with the approach taken for 
the economic regulation of such pipeline facilities. 

Direct  sales  laterals  that  are  not  owned  by  an  interstate  pipeline  would  still  be 
regulated  by  states.  This  amendment  also  would  have  the  benefit  of  permitting  the 
states to concentrate their resources on developing and enforcing integrity manage-
ment programs for their natural gas distribution lines. 
Conclusion 

Mr. Chairman, thank you once again for inviting INGAA to participate in today’s 
hearing.  I  would  like  to  provide  some  written  comments  on  S.  3961  for  the  record. 
INGAA has made the reauthorization of the Pipeline Safety Act a top legislative pri-
ority,  and  we  want  to  work  with  you  and  the  Committee  to  move  a  bill  forward  as 
soon  as  possible.  Please  let  us  know  if  you  have  any  additional  questions,  or  need 
additional information. 

The CHAIRMAN. Thank you very much, Mr. Boss. Mr. Bender? 

STATEMENT OF E. FRANK BENDER, VICE PRESIDENT, 

GAS DISTRIBUTION AND NEW BUSINESS DIVISION, 

BALTIMORE GAS AND ELECTRIC COMPANY; ON BEHALF OF 

THE AMERICAN GAS ASSOCIATION AND 

THE AMERICAN PUBLIC GAS ASSOCIATION 

Mr. BENDER. Thank you, Senator. 
Good morning, I’m pleased to appear before you today and would 
like to thank the Committee for convening this hearing on the im-
portant topic of pipeline safety. My name is Frank Bender, I’m Vice 
President  of  Gas  Distribution  and  New  Business  at  Baltimore  Gas 
and  Electric  Company,  and  we  deliver  natural  gas  to  634,000  cus-
tomers in Maryland. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00046 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

43 

I’m  testifying  today  on  behalf  of  the  American  Gas  Association, 
and  the  American  Public  Gas  Association.  Together,  AGA  and 
APGA  represent  more  than  850  local  gas  utilities  serving  more 
than 56 million customers nationwide. 

I’d  like  to  begin  my  testimony  by  first  commending  the  Com-
mittee,  particularly  Chairman  Stevens  and  Co-Chairman  Inouye 
and  their  staffs,  as  well  as  Senators  Lott  and  Lautenberg,  for  put-
ting  together  what  we  believe  is  a  good  legislative  proposal.  We 
hope  that  the  Committee  will  act  quickly  to  get  a  bill  passed  this 
year. 

In our opinion, the Pipeline Safety Act of 2002 has been working 
well,  and  only  minor  adjustments  should  be  considered  at  this 
point, with one exception. Our companies have identified one major 
area we believe requires considerable improvement, and that is ex-
cavation damage prevention. 

The term ‘‘excavation’’ as I use it here, and as defined by the De-
partment  of  Transportation  in  its  regulations  includes  all  types  of 
digging, demolition, tunneling or construction activities. 

Congressional  attention  to  more  effective  state  excavation  dam-
age  programs  can  and  will  result  in  real,  measurable  decreases  in 
the  number  of  incidences  occurring  on  natural  gas  distribution 
pipelines  each  year.  Excavation  damage  is  the  single-largest  cause 
of  natural  gas  distribution  pipeline  incidents,  and  we  are  very 
pleased that S. 3961 addresses this very important issue. 

I’m pleased to report here also today that natural gas utilities do 
a  good  job  in  minimizing  incidents  that  they  can  control.  The 
record  shows  that  between  2002  and  2005,  82  percent  of  all  re-
ported incidents were the result of excavation damages by a third- 
party,  not  under  the  control  of  the  utility.  In  many  cases,  the  typ-
ical ‘‘little or no control’’ incident involves a party that is even out-
side the jurisdiction of authorities overseeing pipeline safety. 

Most  unfortunately,  during  this  same  4-year  period,  incidents 
due to third-party excavation more than doubled. Excavation dam-
age  thus  represents  the  single  greatest  threat  to  distribution  sys-
tem  safety,  reliability  and  integrity.  AGA  and  APGA  are  pleased 
that the provisions of S. 3961 outline nine elements of an effective 
state damage prevention program in the legislation, and provide for 
additional  funding  for  state  implementation  of  the  program.  The 
Associations  also  urge  Congress  to  provide  continued  funding  au-
thority  over  the  upcoming  reauthorization  period  for  grants  to 
states  to  support  One-Call  programs,  and  to  the  Common  Ground 
Alliance. 

I  might  digress  a  minute  and  say  while  I  was  sitting  here,  I  re-
ceived  a  page  saying  that  there  was  a  gas  main  struck  by  third- 
party excavation in Laurel and 37 homes are impacted. This is not 
an unusual occurrence. I get sometimes one, sometimes two, some-
times even three of these a day. 

The  other  issues  of  importance  I  would  like  to  highlight  briefly 
for the Committee have to do with gas transmission pipeline integ-
rity management, and pipeline controller fatigue management. 

With regards to pipeline integrity, GAO suggests allowing opera-
tors to reassess their systems at intervals based on technical data, 
risk  factors  and  engineering  analyses.  AGA  and  APGA  agree  with 
using technically-based assessment intervals. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00047 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

44 

Finally, AGA and APGA support the proposed directive that DOT 
proscribe  standards  to  reduce  risk  associated  with  managing  fa-
tigue  in  pipeline  controllers.  However,  we  are  concerned  about  the 
possibility  of  complex  regulations  on  ‘‘mandatory’’  working  hours. 
DOT, in fact, recently held a public meeting on that topic, and the 
excellent  information  exchanged  served  to  reinforce  our  belief  that 
controller functions in the natural gas transmission, hazardous liq-
uid  and  gas  distribution  industries  are  too  diverse  to  be  addressed 
by a one-size-fits-all regulation. 

In summary, AGA and APGA believe that Congressional passage 
of  Pipeline  Safety  reauthorization  this  year  will  result  in  timely 
and  significant  distribution  system  safety  improvements.  We  com-
mend  the  Committee  for  putting  together  a  solid  bill  and  commit 
to  working  with  you  to  secure  passage  of  the  final  bill  this  year. 
Thank you for the opportunity to appear here today. 

[The prepared statement of Mr. Bender follows:] 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF E.  FRANK BENDER,  VICE PRESIDENT,  GAS DISTRIBUTION 
AND NEW BUSINESS DIVISION,  BALTIMORE GAS AND ELECTRIC COMPANY;  ON 
BEHALF OF THE AMERICAN GAS ASSOCIATION AND THE AMERICAN PUBLIC GAS 
ASSOCIATION 
Good  morning,  I  am  pleased  to  appear  before  you  today  and  would  like  to  thank 
the Committee for convening this hearing on the important topic of pipeline safety. 
My name is Frank Bender, I am Vice President of Gas Distribution and New Busi-
ness Division of Baltimore Gas and Electric Company, a subsidiary of Constellation 
Energy. BG&E delivers natural gas to 634,000 customers in Maryland. 

I  am  testifying  today  on  behalf  of  the  American  Gas  Association  (AGA)  and  the 
American Public Gas Association (APGA). Together AGA and APGA represent more 
than  850  local  natural  gas  utilities  serving  more  than  56  million  customers  nation-
wide. 

I  would  like  to  begin  my  testimony  by  first  commending  the  Committee,  particu-
larly  Chairman  Stevens  and  Co-Chairman  Inouye  and  their  staffs,  as  well  as  Sen-
ators Lott and Lautenberg, for putting together what we believe is a good legislative 
proposal. We hope that the Committee will act quickly to get a bill passed this year. 
In  our  opinion  the  Pipeline  Safety  Act  of  2002  has  been  working  well  and  only 
minor adjustments should be considered at this point with one exception. Our com-
panies  have  identified  one  major  area  we  believe  requires  considerable  improve-
ment: excavation damage prevention. Congressional attention to more effective state 
excavation  damage  programs  can  and  will,  result  in  real,  measurable  decreases  in 
the  number  of  incidents  occurring  on  natural  gas  distribution  pipelines  each  year. 
Excavation damage is the single largest cause of natural gas distribution pipeline in-
cidents—and  we  are  very  pleased  that  S.  3961  addresses  this  very  important  issue. 
There are two kinds of incidents involving natural gas distribution systems: Those 
caused by factors the pipeline operator can to some extent control (such as improper 
welds,  material  defects,  incorrect  operation,  corrosion  or  excavation  damage  by  a 
utility’s contractor) and those caused by external forces, which are due to factors the 
pipeline  has  little  or  limited  ability  to  control,  such  as  excavation  damage  by  a 
third-party, earth movement, floods, vandalism, lightning and structure fires). 

The term ‘‘excavation’’ as I use it here and as defined by the Department of Trans-
portation  in  its  regulations  includes  demolition,  excavation,  tunneling  or  construc-
tion  activities.  Excavation  is  wide  spread—from  directional  boring  for  new  cable 
lines to installation of fences. 

I am pleased to report here today that natural gas utilities do a good job in mini-

mizing incidents that they can control. 

The  record  shows  that  between  2002  and  2005,  82  percent  of  all  reported  inci-
dents  were  the  result  of  excavation  damage  by  a  third-party  or  other  factors  the 
utility  company  had  little  or  no  control  over.  In  many  cases,  the  typical  ‘‘little  or 
no  control’’  incident  involves  a  party  that  is  outside  the  jurisdiction  of  authorities 
overseeing pipeline safety. 

However—and  most  unfortunately—during  the  same  four-year  period,  incidents 
due to 3rd party excavation more than doubled. Excavation damage thus represents 
the single greatest threat to distribution system safety, reliability and integrity. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00048 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

45 

The  Common  Ground  Alliance  (CGA)  is  a  member-driven  organization  dedicated 
to  ensuring  public  safety  by  reducing  damage  to  underground  facilities.  Along  with 
pipeline  operators,  the  CGA  membership  includes  excavators,  locators,  road  build-
ers, electric utilities, telecommunications, regulators and other stakeholders. Efforts 
by  the  Common  Ground  Alliance  damage  prevention  organization,  such  as  the  na-
tionwide  education  program  to  educate  the  citizenry  about  the  three-digit  One  Call 
‘‘8-1-1’’  number  to  prevent  excavation  damage,  are  steps  in  the  right  direction.  But 
clearly more is needed. 

AGA and APGA are pleased that the provisions of S. 3961 outlines nine elements 
of  an  effective  state  damage  prevention  program  in  the  legislation  and  provide  for 
additional funding for state implementation of the program. 

Other issues of importance that I would like to highlight briefly for the Committee 

are: 
Gas Transmission Integrity Management 

The  Department  of  Transportation  and  pipeline  operators  have  put  forth  a  tre-
mendous amount of effort to implement the gas transmission pipeline integrity man-
agement requirements of the Pipeline Safety Act of 2002. The Government Account-
ability Office (GAO) recently issued a report on the subject of transmission integrity 
management  reassessment  intervals.  The  report  states  that  the  gas  integrity  man-
agement program appears to be working. 

The GAO also suggested allowing operators to reassess their systems at intervals 
based  on  technical  data,  risk  factors  and  engineering  analyses.  AGA  and  APGA 
agree with using technically-based assessment intervals. 
Safety Orders 

AGA  and  APGA  believe  that  the  language  in  S.  3961  that  allows  a  safety  order 
to  be  issued  for  ‘‘any  condition  that  poses  a  risk  to  public  safety,  property,  or  the 
environment’’ is overly broad. DOT already is using its authority to issue corrective 
action  orders  to  enforce  safety  rules  on  facilities  that  are  determined  to  present  a 
hazard to life, property and the environment. 
Human Risk Factors Risk Management 

AGA  and  APGA  support  the  proposed  directive  that  DOT  prescribe  standards  to 
reduce risks associated with fatigue, but we are concerned about the possible devel-
opment of complex regulations on ‘‘mandatory’’ working hours. 

DOT  recently  held  a  public  meeting  on  the  topic,  and  the  excellent  information 
exchanged served to reinforce our belief that controller functions in the natural gas 
transmission, hazardous liquid, and distribution industries are too diverse to be ad-
dressed by a ‘‘one-size-fits-all’’ regulation. 
Funding for One Call Grants and the Common Ground Alliance 

AGA  and  APGA  urge  Congress  to  provide  continued  funding  authority  over  the 
upcoming  reauthorization  period  for  grants  to  states  to  support  One  Call  programs 
and to the Common Ground Alliance. 
Enforcement Transparency 

We support the idea of enhancing enforcement transparency, so long as due proc-
ess  is  preserved  and  confidentiality  during  the  administrative  process  of  individual 
cases  is  protected.  The  Department  of  Transportation  has  a  system  where  notices 
of probable violations are issued and operators are given an opportunity to promptly 
respond.  If  transparency  during  enforcement  activities  improves  public  confidence, 
we support enhancements with administrative due process. 
Summary 

AGA and APGA believe that Congressional passage of pipeline safety reauthoriza-
tion  this  year  will  result  in  timely  and  significant  distribution  system  safety  im-
provements. We commend the Committee for putting together a solid bill, and com-
mit to working with you to secure passage of a final bill this year. 

Thank you for the opportunity to appear here today. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Well  thank  you  all  very  much.  We’re  pleased 
with  the  general  endorsement  of  the  work  we’ve  done  so  far,  Sen-
ator Inouye and I have agreed we will ask the staff to prepare the 
final  draft  and  have  a  vote  to  report  this  bill  out  this  afternoon, 
sometime after the vote around five o’clock. We’ll be prepared to go 
to conference with the House when we get back from having an op-
portunity for both the House and Senate staff to work on trying to 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00049 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

46 

get a compromise ready for us so we can get it done for the 2 weeks 
we’re back in December. 

We generally thank you for your positive comments. None of you 
mentioned  the  certification  by  CEOs  of  the  safety  program—did 
any of you find objections to that provision? 

Mr. BOSS. No, sir. 
The CHAIRMAN. Good, thank you. 
It’s  my  understanding  that  there  are  a  number  of  gas  trans-
mission lines in high consequence areas that cannot be pigged. And 
these  are  inspected  using  different  methods.  Is  there  anything 
that’s  going  to  come  forward—new  technology  or  a  new  process  or 
new  procedure  that  will  give  us  the  same  protection  that  pigging 
might  give  in  those  areas?  Would  any  of  you  wish  to  comment  on 
that? Mr. Bender? 

Mr.  BENDER.  Yes,  sir,  I’d  like  to  comment.  We  have—even 
though  we’re  a  distribution  company—because  we  have  about  150 
miles of distribution pipeline that operates at the pressure that re-
quires that it comes under the transmission integrity management 
program.  About  54  of  those  miles  are  in  what  we  call  high  con-
sequence areas. 

We actually have an improving, very effective means of detecting 
problems  in  that  pipe  with  a  process  called  Direct  Assessment.  In 
fact,  the  picture  that  Admiral  Barrett  had  on  display,  that  situa-
tion  was  discovered  by  using  Direct  Assessment,  which  is  essen-
tially  measuring  along  the  path  of  the  pipe  externally  at  the 
ground  level  with  electronic  sensing  devices  to  determine  defects 
and  things  of  that  nature.  So  we  feel  that  pigging  is  not  appro-
priate,  and  that’s  of  course  what  makes  distribution  systems  so 
much different. 

Many  of  those  lines  in  the  distribution  system  don’t  have  alter-
nate feeds, so if you have to shut down that line to pig, in all likeli-
hood  you’re  inconveniencing  customers  and  taking  them  out  of 
service.  So,  the  Direct  Assessment  technique  is  finding  defects,  so 
it  is  working,  and  we  think  in  our  case  that  technology  is  proving 
its effectiveness. 

The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Boss? 
Mr. BOSS. Yes, I agree with Frank on that subject. In my former 
life I worked as, handling research for pipeline integrity. That tech-
nology  is  very  good,  it  is  a  flexible  technology,  so  as  new  tools  be-
come  available—and  the  key  to  this  technology  is  the  integration 
of separate tools to give you refined information about the location. 
And  the  way  the  regulation  is  designed  it  gives  the  flexibility  as 
new  technology  comes  along  to  incorporate  it  to  improve  it  as  we 
move forward. But we feel it’s a very effective technology in finding 
some of these things. 

The CHAIRMAN. In looking at what happened to our transit lines 
in  Alaska,  I  was  surprised  to  find  that  in  places  there  was  corro-
sion,  erosion  inside  the  pipeline  that  eliminated  almost  80  percent 
of the thickness of the pipeline in a small location, but that’s what 
lead to the failure of the pipeline. 

I  was  told  we’re  developing  some  things  like  ultrasound  and 
other  things  that  will  be  able  to  locate  that  kind  of  a  defect.  Are 
you all working on similar technologies? Do you have similar prob-
lems? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00050 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

47 

Mr.  BOSS.  There  have  been  extensive  programs  going  on  for 
many  years  with  Pipeline  Research  Committee  and  GTI,  PHMSA 
has  a  significant  amount  of  funds  that  they  are  using  for  those 
technologies,  and  we  are  proving  a  lot  of  those  technologies  out. 
One  thing,  we’re  a  very  conservative  industry,  we  want  to  be  sure 
the technology really does work before we do apply it, so there are 
a lot of efforts going that way. The thing that we had talked about 
on the Direct Assessment work is that it puts a very, a lot of rigor 
into the process, so that people do a very much step-by-step process 
which helps significantly. 

The CHAIRMAN. Would Direct Assessment find where the pipeline 

integrity has been weakened by corrosion and erosion inside? 

Mr.  BOSS.  There  are  standards  for  both  external  corrosion  and 
internal corrosion, and like I said, the National Association of Cor-
rosion Engineers have published this, those have been incorporated 
into the regulation and it’s a matter of using the right tools in com-
bination  with  that  rigorous  process  to  help  find  some  of  those 
areas. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  It’s  hard  for  this  Senator  to  imagine  the  ability 
of  using  Direct  Assessment  on  thousands  of  miles  of  pipe.  That 
comes  to  my  mind—how  do  you  deal  with  thousands  of  miles  of 
pipe and say that the system works? 

Mr.  BENDER.  In  the  case  of  distribution  systems,  pigging  is  just 
not  a  good  option,  so  even  though  it  is  expensive  to  use  Direct  As-
sessment, we have found it a useful tool to do, you know, the miles 
that we have, at least as a distribution company under the Pipeline 
Integrity  regulation.  Distribution  systems—if  you  looked  at  a  dis-
tribution system on a map, essentially they would look like, almost 
like  spaghetti,  a  lot  of  elbows,  a  lot  of  turns,  a  lot  of  regulators,  a 
lot of valving, different sizes, different soil conditions, so Direct As-
sessment,  we  find,  works.  So,  to  Mr.  Boss’s  point,  we’re  not  cur-
rently just using one method, we’re using three methods and corre-
lating  the  effect.  So,  it’s  not  an  inexpensive  approach,  but  by  the 
time  we  took  customers  out  of  service,  by  the  time  we  had  to  deal 
with  elbows  and  regulators  and  valving,  Direct  Assessment  still 
would  be  less  expensive  than  pigging,  and  more  effective  in  our 
system than pigging. 

The  CHAIRMAN.  Most  of  those  pipelines  are  buried,  aren’t  they? 
Mr. BENDER. That’s correct, Senator. 
The CHAIRMAN. Mr. Boss? 
Mr. BOSS. Yes, and that’s a very important part of the 7-year re-
assessment.  If  you’re  actually  inspecting  these  lines  quite  a  bit 
more often than you need to be, given the risk that’s involved with 
those,  and  the  deterioration,  the  expense  of  doing  this  Direct  As-
sessment  process  does  not  depreciate  over  the  years,  it’s  a  very, 
very expensive process. 

The CHAIRMAN. Senator Lautenberg? 
Senator LAUTENBERG. We talked earlier about access to the map-
ping  data.  Now,  I  ask  you,  Mr.  Weimer,  and  I  asked  Admiral  Bar-
rett  about  this  as  well—do  you  believe  that  there  are  valid  secu-
rity-related  concerns  about  having  more  public  access  to  the  map-
ping? 

Mr.  WEIMER.  I  guess  my  answer  would  be  the  same  as  Admiral 
Barrett’s that there probably are valid security concerns, depending 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00051 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

48 

on  the  level  of  information  provided.  We’ve  been  having  this  argu-
ment  in  Washington  State,  because  Washington  State  is  about  to 
put  maps  on  the  Internet  live  that  they’ve  went  out  and  collected 
the  data  on  themselves.  And  what  they’re  doing  is  providing  just 
the  maps  of  the  line  pipe  and  not  all  of  the  attributes  on  those 
pipes,  so  they’re  not  showing  where  the  valves  are  and  where  the 
taps  are  and  those  types  of  things,  they’re  just  showing  a  map  at 
a  1-to-24,000  scale  that  would  allow  local  governments  to  know 
where  the  maps  run  in  relation  to  proposed  housing  developments 
and  hospitals  and  schools  and  those  types  of  things.  And  at  that 
level, I don’t think that there is a security concern. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Yes,  you  know  one  of  the  things,  unfortu-
nately,  in  the  age  in  which  we  now  live,  this  question  arises  in 
many  ways.  For  instance,  chemical  plant  storage  facilities,  do  you 
put out an alert to the community that these are highly dangerous 
facilities if attacked, incinerated in any way, and so we have to de-
cide  between  safety  from  the  routine  causes,  and  that  which  could 
invite an attack of some sort. And I don’t think that you get by by 
not disclosing this information, this is of significant value. We talk 
about  excavations  being  a  primary  cause  of  problems,  accidents  in 
pipes,  and  so  I  think  it’s  awful  hard  to  eliminate  public  access  to 
mapping.  How  do  any  of  you  feel  about  it?  Is  there  a  difference  in 
view? 

Mr. FELT. Sir, I have a little bit of a concern, we will support the 
bill  and  whatever  is  finally  decided,  but  we  personally  meet  with 
the  communities,  we  meet  with  the  homeowners  and  homeowner’s 
associations,  we  spend  considerable  money  trying  to  educate  the 
public  on  the  location  of  the  pipeline  and  what  to  look  out  for  on 
a  pipeline.  There  are  markers  all  over  the  place,  and  yes,  the  ter-
rorists could see the markers, but so could the public. It’s been my 
experience—and  I  don’t  say  that  this  is  the  case  all  over—but  we 
can meet with communities and they don’t seem to have a concern 
until  there’s  an  issue.  We’ve  met  with  communities,  for  example, 
on  new  developments  and  shopping  centers  where  people  know 
there’s  a  pipeline  there,  they  want  to  pave  over  it  and  they  want 
to  put  a  building  right  next  to  it.  We’ve  met  with  the  local  city 
council  and  expressed  our  opinions,  but  the  developer  would  win 
out. Now, we’ve actually met with Mr. Weimer and some of his as-
sociates,  and  they’re  going  to  help  come  to  some  of  these  commu-
nities and help educate them. Because until they have an accident, 
they  don’t  appreciate  it.  Having  the  maps  there  ahead  of  time,  to 
me,  makes  it  easier  for  someone  looking  to  do  damage  by  having 
access  to  the  entire  scope  of  all  of  the  pipes  in  the  country,  which 
makes  it  easier  for  them—yes,  they  could  do  the  research,  but 
make them do the research. Someone interested in their local com-
munity  is  better  off  getting  the  information  locally.  We  are  very 
willing  to  have  that  information  available  to  the  communities  and 
to  the  homeowners,  I’m  just  not  sure  that  the  National  Pipeline 
Mapping  System—with  too  much  information—is  the  best  way  to 
do that. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. There are questions raised, but as life has 
its  risks,  normally,  crossing  roads  and  that  kind  of  thing,  at  some 
point  I  think  we’re  better  off,  we’ll  continue  to  know  what’s  there, 
and  to  be  able  to  take  the  precautions.  And  I  think  as  has  been 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00052 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

49 

said, if the community is made aware of the fact that this is where 
these  pipes  run,  but  particularly  on  permits  on  excavation  and  so 
forth to be fairly reliably managed is a critical issue. 

Mr. Weimer, the excess flow valves—what do you think we might 
do to improve the bill with respect to requiring excess flow valves? 
First  of  all,  are  these—these  are  safety  devices,  not  without  cost. 
And,  what’s  the  value  in  these?  To  try  and  implant  these  all  over, 
especially in new construction? 

Mr.  WEIMER.  Right,  this  is  one  of  the  things  that  the  National 
Transportation Safety Board has been recommending for some time 
that  PHMSA  hasn’t  implemented,  and  PHMSA  is  going  through 
the  process,  through  the  distribution  integrity  management  pro-
gram of looking at this. What the bill says, I think, is commendable 
and  probably  goes  exactly  where  we  want  to  go  to  encourage  the 
criteria  to  be  developed  that  requires  these  excess  flow  valves  in 
just  new  pipelines  and  pipelines  that  are  being  replaced.  Depend-
ing who you talk to, and excess flow valve costs from seven to thir-
ty  dollars,  fifteen  dollars  is  what  we  hear  most  of  the  time.  So,  if 
you’re putting in a new pipeline that’s already exposed, it’s not that 
costly to install one of those. 

The  problem  we  saw  with  the  bill  is  the  language  in  there  talks 
about  the  criteria  would  be  based  on  feasibility  and  risk  analysis, 
and  that  kind  of  provides  a  lot  of  wiggle  room  for  a  company  to 
argue  that  it’s  not  feasible  because  of  cost  or  not  feasible  because 
of  some  other  reason.  Where  I  think  it  should  be  turned  around, 
let  the  company  prove  that  it’s  not  feasible  for  their  own  system, 
and if they can’t prove that, then they should be installed. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Well,  if  the  question  of  cost  is  really  not 
significant  you’re  saying  it  is  seven  dollars—did  I  understand  you 
correctly?″ 

Mr. WEIMER. Yes, seven to thirty dollars is what the valve itself 

costs and then—— 

house or within the house? 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  Are  these  things  one  per  leg,  close  to  the 

Mr.  WEIMER.  Typically  it  would  be  one  per  house  between  the 
main  on  the  street  and  where  the  house  is,  because  they  operate, 
if the line is—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Tell me what you can do for seven dollars 
to  put  something  in  that’s  not  a—it’s  obviously  not  a  mechanical 
thing—seven—a soda pop almost costs seven bucks in some places. 
What do you get with a—? 

Mr.  WEIMER.  It’s  a  little  valve  that  automatically  shuts  if  the 
pressure breaks in the pipeline. So it shuts off the gas coming from 
the main to the house if there is excavation damage, or if a home-
owner is out shoveling and breaks the—— 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Does it buildup pressure behind the valve? 
Mr. WEIMER. No, because that’s already, that pressure is already 
in  that  pipeline  and  it  just  stops  it  at  that  point  so  it  doesn’t  con-
tinue to leak into people’s basements or into the house, causing an 
explosion. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  It  sounds  like  a  pretty  good  investment, 

Mr. Bender? 

Mr.  BENDER.  I’d  just  like  to  say  that  AGA,  APGA  supports  the 
legislation,  the  current  wording  in  the  legislation.  We  don’t  con-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00053 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

50 

sider  cost  when  we’re  talking  about  our  customer’s  safety,  so  the 
word  feasibility  to  us  means,  although  excess  flow  valves  do  work, 
there are certain conditions where they don’t work. If the gas pres-
sure,  if  the  house  is  on  a  low  pressure  main,  which  is  essentially 
a  third  of  a  pound,  it’s  almost  like  puffing  on  a  soda  straw.  Our 
belief  and  from  the  manufacturers  of  these  excess  flow  valves  is 
that  you  have  to  have  at  least  10  pounds  of  pressure  for  them  to 
work. So, I think PHMSA’s approach is the right approach because 
you  don’t  want  to  mandate  something  where  you  could  be  re-
directing  that  effort  and  those  resources  to  something  that  could 
really make a difference. So we like the wording as it currently ex-
ists, and support PHMSA’s approach. 

I  would  say  also  that  use  of  excess  flow  valves  is  increasing 
across  the  country  by  many  utilities,  and  so  I  think  utilities  on 
their  own  are  finding  the  benefit  of  excess  flow  valves  and  are  in-
troducing them in new construction as well and I’ve got to tell you, 
PHMSA’s  made  it  pretty  clear  they  expect  to  see  the  use  of  excess 
flow valves increase. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  What  kind  of  a  record  do  you  have  that 
highlights the number of incidents that result from excess pressure 
building up? Is that a frequent occurrence? 

Mr.  BENDER.  In  our  service  territory,  we’ve  never  seen  a  case 
where  we  thought  an  excess  flow  valve  being  installed  would  have 
prevented  a  house  explosion.  We’ve  seen  house  explosions  many 
times,  people  try  to  commit  suicide,  believe  it  or  not,  by  dis-
connecting  the  gas  line.  But  nationally  I  know  down  in  Virginia, 
the  case  down  in  Virginia,  was  it  Riding,  Virginia?  They  felt  that 
an excess flow valve would have prevented that there. So, we’re not 
disputing that. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. It’s not a high incidence of accident, I take 
it? Are there numbers of these reported where the pressure became 
excessive and an explosion or a fire resulted? 

Mr. WEIMER. If I can try to answer that, I think you could prob-
ably get the best accurate answer if you ask the National Transpor-
tation Safety Board to provide their information, they’ve been look-
ing  at  that.  Certainly  as  we’ve  heard,  third-party  damage,  exca-
vation  damage  to  these  types  of  distribution  pipelines  is  the  high-
est cause of damage, so any time you have—between the main and 
the  house—some  kind  of  excavation  damage,  these  valves  can  po-
tentially save people’s lives. 

Senator  LAUTENBERG.  I  have  one  last  question,  Mr.  Chairman. 
The  PHMSA  inspections—do  you  support  making  the  results  of 
these inspections publicly available? 

Mr. WEIMER. I certainly support that, that was in our testimony. 
We  don’t  support  everything,  we  don’t  need  to  have  the  pig  data 
and  all  of  that  stuff,  but  a  basic  cover  sheet  that  talks  about  the 
company’s  name,  what  section  of  the  pipeline  was  inspected,  what 
was found, when it was fixed, and the company’s response to that, 
so both sides of the stories are shown, seems like a relatively easy 
thing to put up along with the enforcement transparency that we’re 
talking  about.  That’s  already  done  in  certain  states,  I  know  in 
Washington  State  you  can  go  onto  the  Internet,  type  in  any  com-
pany’s  name,  and  all  of  the  intrastate  pipelines  that  Washington 
State  is  in  control  of,  you  can  look  at  the  inspection  records.  And 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00054 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

51 

it  helps,  I  think  people  realize  how  often  pipelines  are  inspected 
and  how  good  the  companies  are  doing,  so  I  think  it  would  be  a 
benefit to both the public and the company. 

Senator LAUTENBERG. Seems so to me. Any objection to—— 
Thanks, Mr. Chairman. 
The CHAIRMAN. Senator Pryor? 

STATEMENT OF HON. MARK PRYOR, 

U.S. SENATOR FROM ARKANSAS 

Senator  PRYOR.  Thank  you,  Mr.  Chairman.  I  have  a  couple  of 
questions  for  Mr.  Boss,  if  I  may,  about  the  reassessment,  which  I 
understand—or assessment—as I understand that’s your term used 
for inspections and you, as I understand, you do not like the 7-year 
inspection. Is that arbitrary? Is that why you don’t like it? And you 
prefer kind of a risk-based formula, is that right? 

Mr. BOSS. Yes, Senator, there is an engineering consensus stand-
ard  out  there  from  the  American  Society  of  Mechanical  Engineers 
that makes recommendations on how to do it. I would use an anal-
ogy,  it  basically  gives  you  some  idea  on  when  to  change  the  oil, 
every  3,000  miles.  Right  now  as  we’re  looking  at  this,  it’s  looking 
to  change  our  oil  every  thousand  miles.  We’re  looking  at  a  lot  of 
new technology that will be very similar to some of the automobiles 
that  basically  tell  you  when  to  inspect  this  and  turn  to  the  find-
ings. So, we think it’s very arbitrary and it’s taking a lot of invest-
ment  to  these  areas  that  don’t  need  to  be  done  at  this  time  where 
we could use that investment otherwise. 

Senator PRYOR. I’d say from the regulators standpoint, it’s easier 
to  have  a  flat  rule,  like  a  7-year  investment,  you  force  industry  to 
look every 7 years on every part of their system, and you have sort 
of  done  that  and  you  know  it’s  up  to  standards  and  blah,  blah, 
blah,  it  may  be  a  little  overkill,  but  it  does  seem  to  be  a  safe  ap-
proach.  From  a  regulator’s  standpoint,  or  from  an  oversight  stand-
point  from  the  government’s  perspective,  if  you  go  into  some  dif-
ferent  approach,  some  different  formula,  calculation,  whatever  it 
is—how does the public know that you are maintaining a safe pipe-
line?  One  of  the  things  you’re  saying  is—7  years  costs  too  much 
money.  How  does  the  public  out  there  know,  well,  these  pipeline 
companies  aren’t  going  to  skimp,  and  they’re  going  to  push  their 
pipeline  safety  issues  out  to  the  very  edge,  the  very  limit  and 
maybe  to  the  breaking  point  and  maybe  then  your  system  is  dan-
gerous over time—what assurance does the public have there? 

Mr.  BOSS.  Well  as  mentioned  in  the  GAO  studies,  there  are  ex-
tensive inspections that go on by PHMSA inspectors up to 3 weeks 
at a time with these different companies, look at these details. The 
engineering  standards  are  built  with  a  lot  of  different  safety  fac-
tors,  to  give  an  example,  a  table  may  say  every  5  years,  every  10 
years, every 15 years, simplifying that sort of thing, and there’s ex-
tensive work being used in all the international communities where 
the regulators look at, on a risk-based methodology, in Canada and 
also in Europe. 

Senator  PRYOR.  So,  you  like  the  risk-based  because  you  get  to 
look  at  each  section  of  the  pipe  based  on  all  of  the  circumstances 
around  it,  based  on  all  of  the  circumstances  around  it,  based  on 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00055 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

52 

whatever  environmental  circumstances  and  whatever  capacity  it 
has, and all of the various factors you take into consideration. 

Mr.  BOSS.  Senator,  since  1953,  the  engineering  standards  had 
specific  requirements  for  high-density  population  areas  for  natural 
gas  transmission,  PHMSA  adopted  those  in  regulation  in  the 
1970s.  We’ve  had  risk-based  standards  for  high  population  density 
areas.  This  program  has  added  to  that  effort  on  the  assessment 
area on that. 

Senator  PRYOR.  So,  in  other  words,  you’re  comfortable  with  the 

risk-based assessment. 

Mr.  BOSS.  Yes,  and  there  are  limits  and  believe  me,  PHMSA  is 
out  there  checking  very  hard  to  be  sure  things  are  being  done 
right. 

Senator PRYOR. And in your industry, from your perspective, the 

7-year flat rule just doesn’t make a lot of sense. 

Mr.  BOSS.  No,  there  are  some  places  where  we  may  have  to  do 
it more often, there are some cases where we should be doing it at 
a longer period. 

Senator  PRYOR.  Mr.  Bender,  let  me  ask  you  in  your  testimony, 
you  mention  Section  15  of  S.  3961  and  you  talk,  I  think  you  said 
it was a one-size-fits-all regulation. 

Mr. BENDER. Right. 
Senator  PRYOR.  I’d  like  to  get  a  little  more  detail  on  your 
thoughts on that because the way I read it, and maybe I misunder-
stand  it,  but  it  looks  like  the  approach  that  we’re  taking  actually 
recognizes  the  diversity  and  the  varying  circumstances  on  pipe-
lines, so could you tell me what you mean by ‘‘one-size-fits-all?’’ 

Mr.  BENDER.  Thank  you,  Senator.  The  distribution  systems  and 
how  they’re  operated  are  different  than  liquid  pipelines  and  gas 
transmission  pipelines—the  control  rooms,  the  equipment,  the 
pressures,  the  amount  of  gas  that  you’re  moving,  the  risk  of  inap-
propriate  action,  the  staffing  of  a  control  room,  you  may  have  two 
or  three  people  in  a  control  room,  you  may  only  have  one  person 
in  a  control  room.  To  have  a  mandatory  limit  or  prescription  re-
garding  schedules,  and  I  guess  the  example  I’ll  give  is  we  have 
three  people  normally  in  our  control  room  and  we,  in  flu  season, 
somebody may call in sick. And if the mandatory restriction or win-
dow  or  plan  has  been  submitted  that  an  operator  won’t  work  past 
8 hours, that would not be good for us because you’ve got to some-
times  say,  ‘‘Tell  the  operator  that  he  or  she  may  have  to  stay  over 
and work a second shift.’’ Now that is within their realm of ability, 
it’s not a physical job and we do that frequently, and plus there are 
other  people  in  the  control  room,  there’s  not  a  case  where  some-
body’s going to be asleep at the throttle. 

Now I’m not saying there are cases where working a second shift 
wouldn’t  be  appropriate,  depending  on  the  circumstances  of  the 
staffing  of  the  control  room,  of  the  system  and  what  was  going  on 
in  the  system,  so  that’s  when  I  say,  really,  one  size  doesn’t  fit  all, 
and that’s our concern. You know, it’s not, it’s just, we are just con-
cerned that because the systems are different, we wouldn’t want to 
have very prescriptive regulation regarding the schedules. 

Senator PRYOR. Mr. Chairman, that’s all I have, thank you. 
The CHAIRMAN. Thank you, Senator. We thank you—all of you— 
for  your  testimony  and  for  your  support  of  our  endeavors  so  far. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00056 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

53 

We’re  going  to  do  our  best  to  get  this  bill  passed  this  year,  and 
we’ll  be  obviously  in  a  period  of  some  negotiation  with  the  House 
when  we  come  back  in  December  if  we  can  get  the  bill  out  of  here 
today  or  tomorrow.  We’d  be  happy  to  have  your  comments  along 
the line, this is a bill we want no surprises, we’re pleased with the 
general  support  we  have  now,  you’ve  made  some  suggestions  here 
this morning, I’ve asked the staff to pursue those suggestions. We’ll 
do  our  best  to  make  sure  we  have  a  good  bill  and  I  do  thank  you 
for  your  attitude,  it  is  very  supportive  of  what  we  want  to  do,  and 
increases  the  confidence  in  this  inspection  and  safety  system. 
Thank you very much. 

[Whereupon, at 11:25 a.m. the hearing was adjourned.] 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00057 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00058 Fmt 6633 Sfmt 6601 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

A P P E N D I X 

Hon. JIM DEMINT, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Senator DeMint: 

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Washington, DC, December 4, 2006 

The Senate may have an opportunity this week to reauthorize the pipeline safety 
program  by  adopting  the  Pipeline  Inspection,  Protection,  Enforcement,  and  Safety 
Act  of  2006.  I  am  writing  to  urge  your  support  for  reauthorization  and  to  explain 
how the Pipeline and Hazardous Materials Safety Administration (PHMSA) intends 
to  use  its  statutory  authority  in  connection  with  the  current  requirement  (codified 
at 49 U.S.C. § 60109(c)(3)(B)) that operators of natural gas pipelines reassess the in-
tegrity of their pipelines at intervals not to exceed 7 years. 

As  you  know,  the  Administration’s  reauthorization  proposal  would  have  granted 
the  Secretary  of  Transportation  authority  to  establish  through  rulemaking  risk- 
based  reassessment  intervals  that  would  have  superseded  the  seven-year  statutory 
standard.  Our  proposal  was  strongly  supported  by  industry  and  endorsed  by  the 
Government Accountability Office in a report issued earlier this year, but it appears 
doubtful that any bill considered this week would propose the new authority. 

Nevertheless,  as  I  testified  before  the  Committee  on  Commerce,  Science,  and 
Transportation  last  month,  PHMSA  is  prepared  to  address  the  need  for  risk-based 
reassessment intervals under its existing authority. The Secretary of Transportation 
has specific authority under existing law to modify the seven-year reassessment re-
quirement on a case-by-case basis through issuance of regulatory waivers. Under 49 
U.S.C.  60109(c)(5),  the  Secretary  may  waive  or  modify  the  7-year  reassessment  re-
quirement  if  the  Secretary  determines  that  such  a  waiver  is  ‘‘not  inconsistent  with 
pipeline safety.’’ In making waiver determinations, the Secretary may consider ‘‘any 
relevant factor,’’ including the need to maintain local product supply or the unavail-
ability  of  inspection  equipment.  Waiver  applications  under  the  current  provision 
must  be  decided  in  accordance  with  the  Act’s  general  waiver  provision  (Section 
60118(c)),  which  imposes  certain  procedural  requirements,  including  notice  and  op-
portunity for a hearing. 

Under that standard, an operator requesting a waiver of the seven-year reassess-
ment requirement would have an opportunity to demonstrate that a longer interval 
is  justified  considering  all  of  the  relevant  operating  parameters  and  conditions  on 
the pipeline. PHMSA is inclined to grant such a waiver where an operator can dem-
onstrate  that  the  subject  pipeline  is  covered  by  an  integrity  management  program 
that has been reviewed by PHMSA and determined to provide appropriate risk anal-
ysis and control; a baseline assessment has been completed; the data on the current 
condition of the pipeline is sufficient to validate its integrity; and the proposed inter-
val is consistent with the overall risk profile of the line. 

In  the  circumstances,  with  the  Congress’  support,  we  expect  to  be  able  to  accom-
plish  the  objective  underlying  our  rulemaking  proposal—moving  to  a  risk-based  re-
assessment  program—even  though  the  specific  provision  proposed  by  the  Adminis-
tration  will  not  be  adopted.  My  staff  has  discussed  this  matter  with  the  staffs  of 
the authorizing committees, and we understand that a risk-based approach such as 
I  have  described  has  been  specifically  contemplated  in  the  drafting,  staff  delibera-
tion, and pre-conference processes. 

Thank you for your continued interest in, and support of, the pipeline safety pro-
gram.  If  I  may  be  of  assistance  to  address  any  additional  concerns,  please  do  not 
hesitate to contact me. 

Sincerely and very respectfully, 

THOMAS H. BARRETT, 

Administrator. 

(55) 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00059 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

56 

DEPARTMENT OF TRANSPORTATION 

Washington, DC, November 28, 2006 

Hon. TED STEVENS, 
Chairman, 
Senate Committee on Commerce, Science, and Transportation, 
Washington, DC. 
Dear Mr. Chairman: 

On behalf of the Administration, I want to thank you and your Committee for the 
commitment  you  have  shown  to  pipeline  safety  and  to  the  continued  improvement 
of  programs  administered  by  the  U.S.  Department  of  Transportation.  When  I  ap-
peared  before  the  Committee  as  a  nominee  in  September,  I  pledged  to  make  reau-
thorization  of  the  pipeline  safety  program  a  top  priority.  I  urge  Congress  to  do  the 
same as it heads into the final weeks of the session. 

As you know, four pipeline reauthorization proposals are pending before this Con-
gress. Each of the bills would give the Department and our state partners new tools 
to  address  safety  risks,  including  growing  risks  posed  by  construction-related  dam-
age  to  underground  pipelines,  an  unfortunate  and  largely  preventable  consequence 
of our growing economy. The Administration and the Department are committed to 
addressing this problem, but we need additional authority to be successful. 

The rate and severity of construction-related pipeline incidents are growing. These 
incidents  hit  close  to  home—on  distribution  lines  that  run  through  neighborhoods 
where  families  live  and  schools  are  located.  And  the  consequences  are  tragic;  exca-
vation  damage  is  the  overwhelming  cause  of  pipeline  accidents  in  which  people  are 
injured or killed. 

To  reduce  these  accidents,  we  need  to  better  support  and  strengthen  our  state 
partners. State pipeline safety agencies oversee nearly 1.7 million miles of the pipe-
line distribution system that is at greatest risk of serious construction damage. Con-
sistent  with  sound  integrity  management,  the  Department  needs  greater  flexibility 
to  put  pipeline  safety  resources  where  they  are  needed  most.  When  it  comes  to  ad-
dressing construction-related damage, this means fostering comprehensive programs 
for enforcing existing ‘‘one-call’’ laws, as a few States have demonstrated with posi-
tive results. 

Beyond helping states with damage prevention and overall integrity management, 
each  of  the  legislative  proposals  builds  on  the  success  of  past  safety  reforms,  with 
somewhat  varying  detail  and  emphases.  I  would  be  happy  to  share  our  views  on 
particular  provisions  or  to  assist  the  Congress  in  any  other  way  in  reconciling  dif-
ferences  among  the  four  bills.  In  the  final  analysis,  however,  what  the  bills  have 
in  common  is  vastly  more  important  than  any  one  or  combination  of  their  dif-
ferences.  I  urge  Congress  to  reauthorize  the  pipeline  safety  program  this  year  to 
give  us  more  authority  to  help  save  lives.  By  preventing  damage  to  pipelines,  Con-
gress  will  also  strengthen  the  Nation’s  energy  highways,  improve  the  reliability  of 
critical energy supplies, and, in the case of one-call enforcement, enhance the protec-
tion  of  other  underground  infrastructure  and  utilities,  including  communications 
and electrical distribution. 

Thank you for the opportunity to provide the Department’s views on reauthoriza-
tion  of  the  pipeline  safety  program.  We  would  be  pleased  to  provide  assistance  as 
legislation is considered by the Congress. The Office of Management and Budget has 
advised  that  there  is  no  objection  to  the  presentation  to  Congress  of  these  views 
from the standpoint of the Administration’s program. 

An  identical  letter  has  been  sent  to  the  Co-Chairman  of  the  Senate  Committee 
on  Commerce,  Science,  and  Transportation,  and  the  Chairmen  and  Ranking  Mem-
bers of the House Committees on Transportation and Infrastructure and Energy and 
Commerce. 

Sincerely yours, 

MARY E. PETERS, 

Secretary of Transportation. 

PREPARED STATEMENT OF STEPHEN E. SANDHERR, CEO, 

ASSOCIATED GENERAL CONTRACTORS OF AMERICA 

On  behalf  of  the  Associated  General  Contractors  of  America  (AGC),  I  appreciate 
the opportunity to comment on S. 3961, the Pipeline Inspection, Protection, Enforce-
ment and Safety Act of 2006. AGC is especially concerned about Sec. 4(a) which cre-
ates  a  new  permanent  Federal  one-call  enforcement  program.  While  this  provision 
may be good to encourage the few states that do not have strong one-call laws that 
include  enforcement  and  civil  penalties,  it  takes  a  step  back  from  the  progress  we 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00060 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

57 

have  made  to  ensure  a  strong  partnership  for  damage  prevention.  The  success  of 
the Common Ground Alliance and the successful records of state one-call laws comes 
from  the  participation  of  the  construction  industry,  the  locating  industry  and  the 
underground facility owners in a true partnership committed to damage prevention. 
AGC  believes  that  Federal  enforcement  provisions  do  not  further  the  partnership 
that we have been committed to for the last 8 years. A permanent Federal program 
is  unnecessary.  AGC  and  the  Common  Ground  Alliance  both  support  the  premise 
that the best place for enforcement decisions to be made is in the states themselves. 
The  Federal  Government  should  encourage  states  to  adopt  policies  and  procedures 
that promote effective one-call programs, then withdraw and allow the states to op-
erate and enforce them. 

We  strongly  believe  that  the  most  important  thing  the  Committee  can  do  to  im-
prove safety would be to modify the bill to ensure that all owner/operators, locating 
personnel,  and  excavators  share  equally  in  the  responsibility  for  facility  integrity, 
and  most  importantly  public  and  worker  safety.  Absent  this  focus  in  the  enforce-
ment language, the successful partnership may begin to falter. 

AGC  is  proud  of  our  history  as  a  construction  industry  sponsor  of  the  Common 
Ground  Alliance  (CGA).  AGC  believes  that  in  the  spirit  of  ‘‘shared  responsibility,’’ 
a  concept  promoted  by  the  CGA,  owner/operators  and  locating  personnel  must  be 
held to just as high a standard as excavators for damage prevention process enforce-
ment  to  be  equitable.  States  such  as  Virginia  and  Minnesota  have  demonstrated 
that  enforcement  works—when  it  is  equally  applied  to  all  stakeholders  to  the  dam-
age prevention process across the board. We are pleased that these state’s One-Call 
programs were used as models for the nine points listed in the Administration’s pro-
posal. the House Transportation and Infrastructure Committee’s bill and the House 
Energy and Commerce Committee’s bill as well as S. 3961. 

AGC  supports  best  practices  as  outlined  by  the  CGA.  AGC  members  call  before 
they dig; wait the required amount of time for utilities to locate and mark their fa-
cilities;  dig  with  care;  and  so  much  more.  It  is  just  as  important,  if  not  more  so, 
that utilities respond in a timely manner and that locators mark the facilities clear-
ly and accurately as prescribed by law. 

The Commonwealth of Virginia provides an excellent example of how an effective 
program  operates.  They  enjoy  a  successful  partnership  between  the  excavators,  the 
facility  owners,  the  locators  and  the  state.  One  of  their  hallmarks  is  strict  enforce-
ment—across all stakeholder groups. Virginia has data from 1996 to 2005 indicating 
a 60 percent increase in one-call excavation notices while documenting a 50 percent 
reduction in excavation damage to gas pipelines. 

Clearly,  no  one  wants  to  cause  damage.  Criminal  penalties  are  not  appropriate 
for any stakeholder be they a locator, utility owner, professional excavator or a pri-
vate citizen operating in good faith. They should not be included in any reauthoriza-
tion of the Pipeline Safety Act. Civil penalties, however, send a strong message that 
stakeholders must operate in a responsible, safe manner. 

AGC also urges the Committee to include authorizations for funding for the Com-
mon  Ground  Alliance,  promotion  of  8-1-1  three-digit  nationwide  dialing  for  one-call 
(which  goes  online  in  2007),  and  for  technology  development  grants  to  enhance  lo-
cating  technologies  and  render  underground  utilities  more  locatable.  These  pro-
grams are critical to getting universal adoption of our common best practices. 

Again,  AGC  encourages  the  Committee  to  promote  successful  damage  prevention 
programs.  But  the  most  important  lesson  we  have  learned  from  our  successful  ef-
forts  in  the  Common  Ground  Alliance  are  that  these  laws  must  take  into  account 
the  entire  damage  prevention  process,  not  simply  focus  on  the  excavator.  AGC  en-
courages  leveling  the  playing  field  between  stakeholders—easing  the  inequitable 
burden  included  in  the  bill  which  currently  lies  primarily  with  the  excavator  when 
it should recognize that to be successful these programs must recognize the role that 
all  parties  have  in  public  and  worker  safety,  facility  integrity  and  damage  preven-
tion. 

Again,  thank  you  for  the  opportunity  to  comment  on  this  important  issue.  I  look 
forward to working with the Committee to enact meaningful and fair legislation re-
authorizing the Pipeline Safety Improvement Act. 

Thank you. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00061 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

58 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

THOMAS J. BARRETT 

Question  1.  I  understand  that  the  Administration  generally  supports  the  enforce-
ment  provisions  of  S.  3961,  with  some  added  changes  that  were  incorporated  into 
the House Energy and Commerce Committee’s bill. The 2000 El Paso Pipeline acci-
dent in New Mexico, which killed an entire extended family of twelve, triggered the 
need  for  the  provision.  The  Pipeline  agency  originally  announced  a  proposed  $2.52 
million  fine.  Today,  6  years  later,  no  penalty  has  ever  been  collected.  Can  you  pro-
vide  the  Committee  with  information  regarding  the  status  of  that  penalty  and 
whether any funds have been collected from the operator? 

Answer. PHMSA proposed a $2.52 million fine against El Paso Natural Gas Com-
pany  following  the  New  Mexico  accident  and  we  remain  determined  to  bring  this 
matter to a just resolution. We are working with the Department of Justice to apply 
our  strongest  options  available.  The  United  States  is  in  nonpublic  discussions  with 
the company at this time. 

Question  2.  Do  you  believe  that  a  similar  enforcement  transparency  policy  might 
be a good practice for your hazardous materials enforcement actives at the Pipeline 
agency or the other DOT administrations? 

Answer. Yes, we believe this to be a good practice. PHMSA’s hazardous materials 
enforcement  program  has  led  our  effort  in  enforcement  transparency,  making  com-
prehensive  enforcement  data  available  on  a  PHMSA  webpage.  We  have  designed  a 
new  webpage  about  our  pipeline  safety  enforcement  actions,  which  will  provide  in-
formation on each action and current status. I am committed to making our inspec-
tion and enforcement activities more transparent. 

Question 3. Some feel that the security restrictions imposed on the National Pipe-
line  Mapping  System  (NPMS)  do  little  to  improve  security,  but  do  hamper  safety 
efforts to reduce building encroachment near pipelines and third-party damage. Ad-
ditionally, I understand that the removal of the NPMS from the public domain has 
forced some states, such as Washington, Texas and Louisiana, to spend their limited 
state  dollars  to  duplicate  this  mapping  system  so  local  government  and  the  public 
have  access  to  this  valuable  information.  Are  you  considering  reinstating  public  ac-
cess to the NPMS so local governments can plan safely and the public can be aware 
of the pipelines that run through their area? 

Answer.  Yes.  PHMSA  is  working  to  restore  public  access  to  the  NPMS  informa-
tion that will be available in mid-2007, in a way that accommodates both public and 
security concerns. We believe the restored information will meet the needs for envi-
ronmental,  emergency,  land  use  and  other  planning  activities.  We  are  consulting 
with  all  relevant  parties—including  pipeline  safety  advocates,  the  Department  of 
Homeland  Security’s  Transportation  Security  Administration,  other  Federal  agen-
cies, the pipeline industry and our state partners in developing our approach. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

E. FRANK BENDER 

Question 1. In your testimony, you seem to suggest that Section 15 of S. 3961 re-
quires  the  development  of  a  ‘‘one-size-fits-all’’  regulation  to  address  pipeline  con-
troller fatigue and other human factors. In fact, our bill requires each pipeline oper-
ator to develop their own rules on worker’s hours of service, consistent with current 
science on fatigue management. This approach recognizes the ‘‘diversity’’ of pipeline 
controller  functions  among  different  pipeline  operations  by  letting  operators  devise 
their own strategies to reduce human factors. What about this approach is troubling 
to your members? 

Answer.  We  commend  the  Senate  for  the  recent  passage  of  the  Pipeline  Inspec-
tion,  Protection,  Enforcement,  and  Safety  Act  of  2006,  which  includes  requirements 
for controller work plans to address fatigue and other human factors. I acknowledge 
the  flexibility  that  was  provided  in  the  Senate  bill.  The  language  should  be  suffi-
cient for DOT to develop regulations that provide the needed flexibility for the more 
than  1,100  natural  gas  distribution  operators,  whose  control  operations  are  vastly 
different from gas transmission and hazardous liquid operators. 

Question 2. Regarding third-party damage, I believe much of the prevention effort 
has focused on the commercial excavation community, including contractors, utility, 
cable  and  telecommunications  companies.  Is  there  also  a  third-party  damage  prob-
lem  from  ordinary  citizens  engaged  in  routine  excavation  near  their  property,  par-
ticularly  in  urban  areas?  If  so,  should  our  damage  prevention  programs  take  this 
into account? 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00062 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

59 

Answer. Yes, and I believe the language in the reauthorized Pipeline Act success-
fully addresses that problem. There is the potential for problems with ordinary citi-
zens  engaged  in  routine  excavation  near  their  property  causing  damage  to  under-
ground  utilities.  The  reauthorized  Pipeline  Safety  Act  states  in  49  U.S.C.  60134(b) 
that and effective damage prevention program includes ‘‘A process for fostering and 
ensuring active participation by all stakeholders in public education for damage pre-
vention activities.’’ 

Some  operators  are  already  working  to  educate  ordinary  citizens  about  the  dan-
gers of not using one-call before digging. The Common Ground Alliance best practice 
for  public  education  includes  children  and  property  owners  as  target  audiences,  as 
well as excavators and contractors.1 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

TERRY BOSS 

Question  1.  Under  existing  authority  and  the  nonemergency  waiver  provision  of 
S.  3961,  gas  transmission  pipeline  operators  would  be  able  to  request  a  waiver  of 
the  seven-year  reassessment  interval.  While  I  know  INGAA  had  hoped  that  the  in-
terval would be changed statutorily, why wouldn’t this approach work just as well? 
In effect, the seven-year interval would become a back-stop and operators who could 
demonstrate to the Pipeline agency that a longer interval would not have an impact 
on safety, would be allowed to change it. 

Answer. INGAA agrees that gas transmission operators can request waivers from 
the  seven-year  reassessment  interval.  Senator  DeMint  had  raised  this  issue  with 
PHMSA  Administrator  Thomas  Barrett  prior  to  the  passage  of  H.R.  5782  in  the 
Senate.  Administrator  Barrett’s  response  (see  pages  55  and  56)  makes  it  clear  that 
PHMSA does intend to entertain waiver requests of this nature, so long as the oper-
ator  can  ‘‘demonstrate  that  a  longer  interval  is  justified  considering  all  of  the  rel-
evant operating parameters and conditions on the pipeline.’’ We appreciate the will-
ingness  of  Administrator  Barrett—and  the  Congress—to  support  these  waivers 
where  they  can  be  justified.  INGAA  remains  convinced,  however,  that  waivers  are 
a temporary solution. 

Congress  chose  to  enact  a  specific  statutory  requirement  for  reassessment  inter-
vals in 2002. The seven-year requirement was never based upon an actual analysis 
of the safety and engineering associated with natural gas transmission lines; it was 
instead  the  product  of  political  compromise.  This  is  why  the  provision  in  the  2002 
bill  requiring  an  analysis  by  the  Government  Accountability  Office  (GAO)  was  so 
important.  The  GAO  was  able  to  spend  over  a  year  gathering  and  analyzing  data 
on this issue so that it could recommend a more reasoned alternative. As you know, 
the  GAO  (Report  06–945)  did  recommend  to  Congress  that  the  statute  be  changed 
to  allow  PHMSA  to  undertake  a  rulemaking  for  changing  the  seven-year  interval 
to one in which reassessment intervals are based upon risk analysis. Until the stat-
ute is changed by Congress, though, the seven-year requirement remains the stand-
ard—even though it does not have any justification from an engineering standpoint. 
PHMSA has the authority to review waiver requests, but those requests do not have 
to be acted upon, and if granted, can be revoked at any time. INGAA also has con-
cerns  about  the  consistent  application  of  waiver  authority  across  a  large  number  of 
pipelines.  INGAA’s  members  have  consistently  advocated  regulatory  certainty  in 
such  matters—an  opportunity  to  participate  in  the  rulemaking  process  and  a  clear 
understanding  by  both  operators  and  regulators  of  the  requirements.  The  waiver 
process leaves much more uncertainty for both parties to manage. 

In  terms  of  using  the  seven-year  requirement  as  a  ‘‘back-stop,’’  INGAA  would  be 
much more comfortable with using a time-frame that actually has some justification. 
The  GAO  report  highlights  the  work  that  has  been  done  by  the  American  Society 
of  Mechanical  Engineers  (ASME),  which  has  recommended  prescriptive  intervals  of 
10 years for most high-stress natural gas pipelines (i.e., the vast majority of INGAA 
member  company  pipelines).  This  ten-year  standard  has  undergone  review  and  ap-
proval  by  the  American  National  Standards  Institute,  and  therefore  has  been  dem-
onstrated  to  have  a  scientific  and  engineering  justification.  If  there  is  to  be  any 
back-stop on reassessment intervals, the ASME standard is the one that makes the 
most sense. 

The  reauthorization  bill  approved  by  Congress  requires  PHMSA  to  report  back 
within  60  days  on  a  legislative  provision  for  enacting  the  GAO  recommendation. 
INGAA hopes that Congress will seriously consider and approve the legislative pro-

1 Common Ground Alliance Best Practices, Version 3.0 Public Education and Awareness Prac-

tice Statements & Description. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00063 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

60 

posal  from  PHMSA.  Granting  waivers  from  the  seven-year  requirement  is  a  short- 
term solution at best. There is no reason why Congress cannot allow PHMSA to de-
velop  a  more  logical  and  justifiable  reassessment  interval  policy  for  the  long-term. 
INGAA believes this development is best accomplished through the rulemaking pro-
cedure, with public notice and participation, consideration of comments by all inter-
ested parties, and advice from the Technical Advisory Committee. 

Question 2. In the GAO report on the seven-year reassessment interval, the GAO 
noted  that  it  was  difficult  to  evaluate  the  nature  and  cause,  such  as  corrosion,  of 
individual  pipeline  problems  discovered  during  initial  pipeline  assessments  because 
the  Pipeline  agency  does  not  require  pipeline  operators  to  report  such  information. 
Would you be opposed to providing such information to the Pipeline agency? 

Answer. No, INGAA would not be opposed. We are in the process of surveying our 
own  association  members  as  to  the  nature  and  causes  of  the  defects  that  were  re-
paired in the high consequence areas subject to Integrity Management Program for 
years 2004–2006 and plan on sharing the results of that information with PHMSA. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTIONS SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

TIMOTHY FELT 

Question 1. In your testimony, you reference the Association of Oil Pipe Lines’ op-
position  to  the  requirements  in  S.  3961’s  section  3  that  all  low-stress  pipelines  be 
subject to Federal incident reporting and National Pipeline Mapping System regula-
tions. Can you explain your opposition to these regulations? 

Answer.  In  our  testimony  we  supported  the  House  Energy  and  Commerce  Com-
mittees  bill  language  that  significantly  broadens  the  regulation  of  low-stress  pipe-
lines  and  exceeds  the  Administration’s  proposed  requirements  for  these  lines.  This 
bill  language  would  subject  oil  pipelines  operating  at  low-stress  that  are  similar  to 
the  Prudhoe  Bay  lines  that  leaked  in  March  2006  to  the  same  regulations  as  oil 
transmission pipelines operated at high-stress. 

We oppose additional DOT mapping and reporting requirements for the remaining 
lines  operated  at  low-stress  that  would  not  be  covered  by  the  House  bill.  These  re-
maining lines are: 

I. regulated by the Coast Guard; or 
II.  serving  refining,  manufacturing,  or  truck,  rail  or  vessel  terminal  facilities, 
if  the  pipeline  is  less  than  1  mile  long  (measured  outside  the  facility  grounds) 
and  does  not  cross  an  offshore  area  or  a  waterway  currently  used  for  commer-
cial navigation. 

These are the reasons for this opposition: 

1. With respect to I., we recommend against dual regulation of facilities or dis-
rupting  existing  regulatory  arrangements  by  shifting  regulatory  responsibility 
from one agency to another unless there is a very good reason. The Coast Guard 
is  not  lax  in  its  attention  to  the  facilities  it  regulates.  Pipelines  regulated  by 
the  Coast  Guard  should  be  all  the  Coast  Guard’s  responsibility,  not  part  the 
DOT’s and part the Coast Guard’s responsibility. 
2.  With  respect  to  II.,  these  pipelines  are  short  and  so  closely  associated  with 
the facilities they serve that mapping details would be obscured and not helpful. 
The  facilities  served  by  these  pipelines  are  not  subject  to  DOT  regulations  cur-
rently,  and  we  do  not  believe  adding  DOT  reporting  requirements  for  them  is 
merited. 
3.  Also  with  respect  to  II.,  leak  reporting  for  these  pipelines  could  be  required 
by  PHMSA  under  existing  law  if  the  benefits  would  justify  the  costs.  PHMSA 
has not chosen to do so, most likely because the benefits do not justify the costs. 
These facilities are for the most part inside a company’s fence. So are the infre-
quent  and  generally  quite  small  leaks,  which  occur  primarily  at  valves  rather 
than  in  pipe  itself.  Rather  than  a  Congressional  mandate  for  a  program  to  col-
lect data on leaks from these facilities, it would be better for PHMSA to propose 
such a program through the administrative process and tailor it to meet a cost- 
benefit test. 

Question 2. In your testimony, you note that oil pipelines are subject to a baseline 
assessment  period  of  7  years  and  a  reassessment  period  of  5  years  under  integrity 
management rules. Do you anticipate problems or difficulty in meeting the five-year 
reassessment interval for your members’ pipelines in high consequence areas? 

Answer.  When  these  requirements  were  proposed  by  PHMSA’s  predecessor  in 
2000–2001,  we  were  concerned  that  the  vendor  capacity  available  for  pipeline  as-

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00064 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

61 

sessment—internal  inspection  devices  and  the  people  to  interpret  the  output  of  the 
devices—might  not  be  sufficient  to  the  requirements  of  the  regulations.  We  have 
worked  through  these  concerns,  in  part  because  the  vendor  community  has  re-
sponded to the need and in part because PHMSA’s regulations provide flexibility to 
the  operator  to  design  assessment  schedules.  The  oil  pipeline  industry  is  on  track 
to  meet  the  pipeline  integrity  regulatory  requirements  applicable  to  our  pipelines. 
Our industry has embraced integrity management as good business. The application 
of  integrity  management  is  successfully  making  lasting  improvements  in  the  oil 
pipeline infrastructure, and not just in those portions of the infrastructure that are 
in high consequence areas. 

RESPONSE TO WRITTEN QUESTION SUBMITTED BY HON. DANIEL K. INOUYE TO 

CARL WEIMER 

Question. In your testimony, you recommend that Congress consider studying the 
imposition  of  financial  responsibility  requirements  for  pipelines  as  it  already  does 
for  other  companies  under  the  Resources  Conservation  and  Recovery  Act  (RCRA) 
and the Oil Pollution Act (OPA). Can you further explain why this is needed? 

Answer. Thank you for the opportunity to expand on our testimony regarding the 
possible  need  for  financial  responsibility  (also  referred  to  as  financial  assurance) 
measures  for  pipelines  to  increase  protection  of  communities  and  the  environment. 
As stated in our earlier testimony because of the corporate structuring of pipeline 
companies  as  independent  companies  owned  solely  by  larger  corporations  there  ex-
ists  the  potential  to  under-capitalize  these  pipeline  companies,  and  thus  avoid  or 
significantly  delay  large  liabilities  caused  by  accidents  by  simply  declaring  bank-
ruptcy. This in fact was exactly what happened with the Olympic Pipeline Company 
after  the  Bellingham  tragedy,  where  two  of  the  largest  corporations  in  the  world, 
(British Petroleum and Shell), allowed their solely-owned pipeline company to enter 
bankruptcy. 

There  are  a  number  of  Federal  statutes  that  include  financial  assurance  clauses 
to  prevent  this  type  of  liability  dodging,  and  also  to  help  ensure  that  safety  will  be 
internalized  into  a  company’s  management.  Financial  assurance  is  required  under 
the  Oil  Pollution  Act  (OPA),  the  Comprehensive  Environmental  Response,  Com-
pensation,  and  Liability  Act  (CERCLA,  or  Superfund),  the  Resource  Conservation 
and  Recovery  Act  (RCRA),  the  Safe  Drinking  Water  Act,  the  Outer  Continental 
Shelf  Lands  Act  (OCSLA),  the  Federal  Land  Policy  and  Management  Act,  and  the 
Surface Mining Control and Reclamation Act (SMCRA). 

A number of studies have been done that show the value of such financial assur-
ance.  A  Programmatic  Regulatory  Assessment  of  OPA  90  done  by  the  U.S.  Depart-
ment of Transportation in 2001 showed that the single largest contributor to reduc-
ing  spills  was  the  financial  responsibility  rule  within  OPA  90.  Other  studies  done 
by the independent group Resources For The Future have shown a similar success-
ful effect of financial responsibility rules in a number of different statutes. 

Here  is  a  list  of  what  we  have  found  to  be  the  most  relevant  studies,  and  where 
they  can  be  found.  We  have  also  attached  copies  of  these  studies  for  your  conven-
ience. * 

OPA  90  Programmatic  Regulatory  Assessment  (PRA)—Benefit,  Cost,  and  Cost  Ef-
fectiveness  of  Eleven  Major  Rulemakings  of  the  Oil  Pollution  Act  of  1990  (May 
2001)—Prepared by: Economic Analysis Division, John A. Volpe National Transpor-
tation  Systems  Center,  Cambridge,  Massachusetts  http://www.uscg.mil/hq/g-m/ 
regs/PDF/pra-main.pdf. 

Financial  Assurance  Rules  and  Natural  Resource  Damage  Liability:  A  Working 
Marriage?  James  Boyd  (March  2001)—Discussion  Paper  01–11  http://www.rff.org/ 
rff/Documents/RFF-DP-01-11.pdf. 

Financial  Responsibility  for  Environmental  Obligations:  Are  Bonding  and  Assur-
ance  Rules  Fulfilling  Their  Promise?  James  Boyd  (August  2001)—Discussion  Paper 
01–42 http://www.rff.org/rff/Documents/RFF-DP-01-42.pdf. 

While  it  is  clear  to  us  that  financial  assurance  rules  do  serve  as  a  valuable  way 
to  prevent  spills  and  internalize  the  costs  of  such  prevention  for  many  industries, 
we are not as clear on what benefits these rules would provide to pipelines. Because 
of the lack of public information on the bankruptcies of pipeline companies, and the 
collection of fines and total damages, there is no way for us to assess whether such 
additional  rules  are  needed.  For  this  reason,  in  our  testimony  we  suggested  that 

* The information referred to has been retained in Committee files. 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00065 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6621 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

62 

Congress  ask  for  a  study  of  the  need  and  benefit  for  such  financial  assurance  rules 
for  pipelines.  We  still  believe  that  such  a  study  is  called  for,  and  should  be  able  to 
answer whether financial assurance rules would be beneficial to increasing pipeline 
safety. 

Thank you again for this opportunity to provide additional testimony. 

Æ 

VerDate Nov 24 2008  10:50 Jun 22, 2011 Jkt 066984 PO 00000 Frm 00066 Fmt 6601 Sfmt 6611 S:\GPO\DOCS\66984.TXT SCOM1 PsN: JACKIE

